(lp0
(dp1
S'tags'
p2
(dp3
S'Photography'
p4
S'Peaches & Mint'
p5
sS'Stationery For Pearl & Godiva '
p6
S' Magva Design & Letterpress'
p7
sS'Venue'
p8
S'Crom Castle'
p9
sS'Cake '
p10
S'Lily Cupcake'
p11
sS'Decor '
p12
S'Pearl & Godiva '
p13
sS'Florals For Pearl & Godiva '
p14
S'Floral Earth'
p15
sS'Planning, Production, Art Direction & Styling'
p16
S'Pearl & Godiva'
p17
ssS'original_link'
p18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/12/11/intimate-castle-wedding-in-northern-ireland/'
p19
sS'categories'
p20
(dp21
S'styles'
p22
(lp23
S'elegance'
p24
asS'seasons'
p25
(lp26
S'summer'
p27
asS'colors'
p28
(lp29
S'gray'
p30
aS'light-blue'
p31
aS'light-pink'
p32
asS'settings'
p33
(lp34
S'castle'
p35
assS'paragraphs'
p36
(lp37
S'If you ve ever wondered what it s like to marry with an Irish fairytale wedding this, SMPers, is the answer. Beginning with a boat ride along the Lough Erne, guests trekked to the ceremony at an ancient stone chapel followed by a celebration at Crom Castle. The creative gurus behind Pearl & Godiva orchestrated every gorgeous moment and Peaches & Mint captured behind the lens. More here!'
p38
aS'From Pearl & Godiva Many couples dream of an intimate wedding, sharing these magical moments with just their nearest and dearest, on a day which reflects their own personal style from start to finish. We were so honoured to make this a reality for Grace and Paul, which took place in the spell-bounding environs of the Crom Castle on Lough Erne in Northern Ireland.'
p39
aS'Crom Castle is an enchanting historic castle which sits beside Lough Erne, the perfect backdrop for an exquisite wedding. This waterside kingdom was a huge inspiration for the day, given that guests took a boat ride along Lough Erne to join the couple celebrate their their wedding ceremony in the ancient stone chapel.'
p40
aS'Inspired by the words of Henry David Thoreau, we began creating a day completely unique to such a loving couple.'
p41
aS' If you have built castles in the sky\n Let not your dreams go to waste;\n Just build the foundations under them. \n ~ Henry David Thoreau.'
p42
aS'Following months of preparation, on a glorious June morning we made our way to Crom Castle to create a timeless and elegant wedding for Grace and Paul. To see our design come to life was dreamlike, from the bespoke stationery, hand-crafted linens, to the luscious florals, tumbling out of every nook, adorning all surfaces. Together with Magva Design & Letterpress we drew inspiration from the wooden boats that sail by the castle. Painterly blooms by Floral Earth crept across hand dyed tablecloths, with florals barely contained in their over-sized urns, teaming beautifully with glinting gold flatware and gold rimmed glassware.'
p43
aS'Grace and Paul s love was captured in the low light of dusk, as mist raised from the lake and cloaked the landscape with cool wispy light.\n'
p44
asa(dp45
g2
(dp46
S'Private Villa'
p47
S'Castell De L Alberg'
p48
sS'Wedding Dress'
p49
S'Maria Lluisa Rabell'
p50
sS'Shoes'
p51
S'Badgley Mischka'
p52
sS'Photography'
p53
S'Mireia Cordom '
p54
sS'Makeup & Hair'
p55
S'Diana Gal '
p56
sS'Stationery'
p57
S'Project Party Studio'
p58
sS'Flowers'
p59
S'Oh Fleurs! '
p60
sS' Bridal Shoes & Headdress Hair'
p61
S'Mr Right'
p62
sS'Production & Stylist Event Planning:'
p63
S'Bodas Deluxe '
p64
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/12/11/romantic-pink-navidad-wedding-inspiration/'
p65
sg20
(dp66
g22
(lp67
S'elegance'
p68
asg25
(lp69
S'summer'
p70
asg28
(lp71
S'blush'
p72
aS'cream'
p73
aS'pink'
p74
asg33
(lp75
S'villa'
p76
assg36
(lp77
S'I m kind of wishing this rosy pink Maria Lluisa Rabell skirt was mine right about now. I d get my twirl on for a good while, that s for sure. But alas, it isn t hanging in my closet, so I m soaking up every bit of it s loveliness   la this darling shoot from Mireia Cordom . With it s sweet hints of the upcoming Navidad, every pretty capture emits a festive femininity like no other. Commence swooning right here!'
p78
aS'From Mireia Cordomi We had inspired in a Pink and white christmas wedding shoot with a perfect girl. At night she became a free girl.'
p79
aS'She was a good girl, obedient and polite. She didn t like to upset and she didn t like to disappoint. A glimmer of a smile always played on her lips, but it was a sad smile made of dreams and memories. Her need to be perfect was her golden cage, a cage she dreamed of breaking free from to a hidden place, a secret place where there was no one to judge. She longed to escape for a day, an hour, a second; to run from herself toward her liberation.'
p80
aS'She was on the brink of a new life, she was leaving behind her role as the perfect daughter to become the ideal wife. It was expected of her, she had no choice. But she knew that she would never be free from her own shackles if she was deceiving herself.'
p81
aS'So she chose to marry at Christmas time, her favorite time of year. And like her, her day was sweet, elegant and perfect in every way, a joyous celebration in pinks and whites. To her Christmas would always be pink, it was about new beginnings and purity, it was about light and love. On that day she made a vow to herself, she decided she would remain that perfect girl and a perfect wife. But on the evening of Christmas Eve each year, once the last candle had been blown out, she would return to that day and to her true self. She would be untied from her restraints of perfection and would set herself free, running away from her home and back to nature for one night only. That grey still evening was hers alone. In the Christmas night air, the frosty ground crackling under her feet, she would dance, run, and finally escape. With red leaves falling about her like snowflakes, the perfect girl glowed beneath the light of the Christmas moon.    Memories, like life itself, shine brighter at Christmas    Charles Dickens. \n'
p82
asa(dp83
g2
(dp84
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/12/11/colorful-puerto-aventuras-wedding/'
p85
sg20
(dp86
g22
(lp87
S'romantic'
p88
asg25
(lp89
S'summer'
p90
asg28
(lp91
S'blush'
p92
aS'hot-pink'
p93
aS'light-blue'
p94
aS'orange'
p95
aS'turquoise'
p96
asg33
(lp97
S'beach-resort'
p98
assg36
(lp99
S'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than this relaxed and romantic affair. Dreams Puerto Aventuras was the perfect destination  I Do  for these young loves and with Elizabeth Medina behind the lens every image is more beautiful than the last. From the bright blooms to the sandy white beaches, every detail from this day is sure to castaway the winter blues.'
p100
aS'From the Bride  There are a lot of movies and books out there about finding a lost love or reuniting with a first true love. I d like to think our story takes the cake, and our wedding would be the ultimate movie ending to one amazing adventure.'
p101
aS'Andy and I met when we were just 12 years old when we were learning how to snowboard for the first time. He was the only brave soul kind enough to ride the chairlift with me, knowing that I would definitely fall as we attempted to glide off. Before eventually becoming high school sweethearts, we were best friends and had some great times together growing up. But, like most young loves, we split up and went our separate ways before college, only to find ourselves randomly reunited seven years later. It took a lot of courage for me to go up and say hi to Andy the bartender. I hate admitting it, I shook like a leaf, but he stuttered and couldn t find words. So, we ll call it even!'
p102
aS'We picked up almost right where we left off, and a few years later, we were planning a wedding. I m sure most little girls have extravagant and beautiful ideas about their wedding that carry throughout adulthood. But for me, aside from having the perfect groom, I just wanted to walk barefoot on sand with the waves behind me.'
p103
aS'We thought we had found a decent New England wedding venue that would work well   until my mom stumbled upon Style Me Pretty and found a wedding in Mexico featuring Elizabeth Medina as the photographer. Not only did we know right then and there that we hit the jackpot for photographers, but we also realized a destination wedding in one of our favorite locations was beyond perfect. And what could be better than a week long celebration with your family and friends in one of the most stunning spots in the world?'
p104
aS'Photography was a huge aspect of the wedding. It single handedly convinced everyone that this Mexico idea was the best idea we ve ever had. There is no one that compares to Elizabeth Medina in terms of talent, but she also knew exactly how to show off this relaxed and happy wedding in the most elegant and timeless of ways.'
p105
aS'Our wedding look completely reflects both of our personalities. You can see our typical New England roots in the JCrew and Sperry Top Sider styled bridal party, mixed with our absolute love for tropical flair reflected in the bright flowers and turquoise accents. Chantilly s Place, a local Massachusetts bridal boutique, outfitted the bridesmaids in petal pink dresses. The flowers were a mix of local and tropical flowers with succulents (my favorite!), which was created by my amazing wedding planner, Jacki Muir. Gotta love Pinterest for inspiration, a wedding planner who knows you well, and having an amazing in-house florist at the resort!'
p106
aS'The small details paid bigger tributes to our overall wedding story: walking down the aisle to one of my dad s favorite songs  Somewhere Over the Rainbow  by IZ Kamakawiwo ole, our first dance to  Then  by Brad Paisley, and a piece of my mom s wedding veil wrapped around my bouquet. A beautiful piece of driftwood was personalized with our names on it, while a  Se or and Se ora  signs hung over our bride and groom reception chairs. Not to mention, we had an incredible mariachi band during the cocktail hour   an absolute must for our Mexican wedding!'
p107
aS'The venue was already stunning, but it just needed a few personal touches. I m a huge fan of Etsy and preferred to have our decorations from small businesses that could customize little details for us. Each piece had their unique look, from the table numbers on wooden blocks to our personalized  guest book . Molded together, it created a rustic, casual, beachy vibe.'
p108
aS'Above all, what we wanted most for our wedding was for it to be fun. There s so much stress that comes with wedding planning, and we re glad we were able to enjoy most of it just knowing that all of our guests would be able to dig their toes in the sand, sip on tequila, and really help us celebrate this amazing love story.\n'
p109
aS"Photography: Elizabeth Medina | Wedding Planner: Jackie Muir (Dreams Puerto Aventuras Onsite Planner) | Wedding Planner: Jacki Muir (Dreams Riviera Cancun Onsite Planner) | Stationery:  JP Stationery | Stationery:  Sea Of Love Studios | Bride's Shoes: Steve Madden | Bridesmaids' Dresses: Bill Levkoff | Groomsmen's Attire: JCrew | Bride's Dress: Maggie Sottero | Bridesmaid's Attire: Chantilly Place | Bride s Accessories: Nordstrom  | Decorations & Guestbook: LovetheUnique, SweetNCCollective, EvivArt | Dreams Puerto Aventuras: Puerto Venturas, Mexico | Floral Decor: Dreams Puerto Aventuras | Getting Ready Pijamas: Victoria's Secret | Groom And Groomsmen Shoes: Sperry Top Sider | Photography - Assistance: Lindsey Medina"
p110
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p111
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p112
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p113
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p114
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p115
aS'A ...'
p116
aS'When ...'
p117
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p118
aS"The only thing more beautiful than this wedding - and believe me, it's stunning - is the..."
p119
asa(dp120
g2
(dp121
S'Photography'
p122
S'Matteo Crescentini '
p123
sS'Flowers & Decor'
p124
S'Roberto Fiori'
p125
sS'Wedding Venue'
p126
S'Fattoria La Loggia'
p127
sS'Second Phototographer'
p128
S'Paolo Manzi'
p129
sS'Caterer'
p130
S'Preludio Catering'
p131
sS'Wedding Planning'
p132
S'Rossana Sapori At Weddings In Italy'
p133
sS'Music For The Day'
p134
S'Alma Project'
p135
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/12/11/rustic-tuscan-fall-wedding/'
p136
sg20
(dp137
g22
(lp138
S'rustic'
p139
asg25
(lp140
S'fall'
p141
asg28
(lp142
S'cream'
p143
aS'gray'
p144
aS'navy'
p145
asg33
(lp146
S'hotel'
p147
assg36
(lp148
S'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This wedding, captured by Matteo Crescentini and orchestrated by Rossana Sapori of Weddings In Italy, has sealed the deal and I m officially obsessed with Tuscany s rolling hills and all the wonders they possess. So until I can make my Italian dream a reality, join me as I swoon over every inch of this gallery right this way.'
p149
aS'From Rossana Sapori at Weddings In Italy  Jen & Struan s rustic Tuscan destination wedding captured the oh-so-romantic atmosphere of Italy flawlessly! We can t get enough of the stunning couple s portraits over the lush, rolling landscape of Italy, as well as the adorable blue theme of the day. Matteo Crescentini s artistic eye turned the lush and romantic day into a collection of stunning photographs where Fattoria La Loggia and the incredible collection of contemporary arts masterpieces, played an important role. With no detail left forgotten, I m certain that olive groves garlands and the rustic table setting, personally made by Roberto Il Fiorista, will forever remind the guests of this beautiful weekend in Chianti. The romantic ceremony celebrated by Marcus Mattia opened a long lasting day of celebrations. Nothing was left behind thanks to Rossana Sapori from WeddingsInitaly.it and their planning and coordination service, including the Italian traditional  never-ending courses  meal   Preludio Caterer created an incredible choreography of food and wines!\n'
p150
asa(dp151
g2
(dp152
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/12/10/horse-farm-wedding-in-italy/'
p153
sg20
(dp154
g22
(lp155
S'rustic'
p156
asg25
(lp157
S'fall'
p158
asg28
(lp159
S'gray'
p160
aS'yellow'
p161
asg33
(lp162
S'private-residence'
p163
assg36
(lp164
S'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by LoveFolio Wedding Photography brings up some serious nostalgia. I swear I dreamt of a day like this my entire life. Planned and designed by Italian Wedding Designer, they whipped up a perfectly rustic yet sophisticated day I m sure the guests are still talking about to this day. See even more here.'
p165
aS'For the reception we decided to arrange a long table in the main stable, that we decorated with red apples, that come down on the guests  heads, Scuderie Palandri horses were very lucky after this event!! After the dinner guests moved into the round pen, where was setting the lounge area with sofa made by hay bales and tables made with pallets, and where we settled the amazing Sweet table with different types of handmade pies, candy and lemonade. Red apples, wild herbs, candles and withe roses were the protagonists of the this real country style setting.\n'
p166
aS'Photography: LoveFolio Wedding Photography | Bridal Gown: Rosa Clara | Venue: Scuderie Palandri  | Wedding Planner & Designer: Italian Wedding Designer'
p167
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p168
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p169
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p170
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p171
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p172
aS'A ...'
p173
aS'When ...'
p174
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p175
aS"The only thing more beautiful than this wedding - and believe me, it's stunning - is the..."
p176
asa(dp177
g2
(dp178
S'Videographer'
p179
S'Matteo Castelluccia Videomaker'
p180
sS'Wedding Planner'
p181
S'SposiamoVi'
p182
sS'Wedding Dress'
p183
S'Mori Lee By Madeline Gardner'
p184
sS'Groomsmen Attire'
p185
S'Ascot Formal Wear'
p186
sS'Photography'
p187
S'Lisa Poggi Photography'
p188
sS'Bridesmaids Dresses'
p189
S'Dessy'
p190
sS'Invitations'
p191
S'Beacon Lane'
p192
sS'Bridal Shoes'
p193
S'Alan Pinkus'
p194
sS'Band'
p195
S'Cool Vibes'
p196
sS'Earrings'
p197
S'Swarovski Crystal'
p198
sS'Castle'
p199
S'Castello Vicchiomaggio'
p200
sS'Flowers'
p201
S'Nadia Stiatti'
p202
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/12/10/romantic-florence-vineyard-wedding/'
p203
sg20
(dp204
g22
(lp205
S'rustic-elegance'
p206
asg25
(lp207
S'summer'
p208
asg28
(lp209
S'coral'
p210
aS'gray'
p211
asg33
(lp212
S'castle'
p213
assg36
(lp214
S'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team that is SposiamoVi, and the result is this sweetly ethereal soiree in Italy. Filled with contagious smiles and darling details tucked in every corner, it s no wonder we re smitten with the imagery from Lisa Poggi Photography. Take a little looksie for yourself in the gallery.'
p215
aS'From the beautiful Bride My name is Kellie Minogue and my Husband is Brian Minogue. My husband and I still reminisce about our wedding and all our family and friends still talk about it. It was the best weekend of our lives. Brian and I live in Melbourne but we re from Ireland, Brian proposed to me in Sept 2011 in the rolling hills of the vinyards of the Yarra Valley, Melbourne.'
p216
aS'We spend two busy years organising our wedding. We firstly chose our destination which we decided on Florence and next was to choose our wedding planner. Francesca from SposiamoVi was amazing. She was there for every question and the choosing of all my vendors. The ease we had with language and paperwork we would not have been able to achieve what we did without her.'
p217
aS'Our wedding was a fairy tale wedding, we both were on cloud nine the whole day, I felt like I was floating through the ceremony, photos and reception. All our family flew from Ireland and all our friends flew from Australia.'
p218
aS'There are so many memories and special moments. I loved the peace and serenity of us getting ready in the bridal suite. Was so nice to have my Mum, Mother-in-law, my Nanny, my sister and my best friend with me. They all said I was the most relaxed bride ever. My Dad had said the day previous,  if you are relaxed and chilled out everyone around you will feed off your presence .'
p219
aS'The rolling hills and beautiful tall Cyprus trees framed our wedding back drop. We laughed and smiled the whole way through the day and night. It was so unique heading down to the vineyard and olive grove to have our photos taken. Having our friends and family around us that had traveled so far made us feel very humble and grateful that we are so loved. Everyone said it was a fairy-tale wedding. I will never forget every minute of our wedding and it surely was a dream come true.'
p220
asa(dp221
g2
(dp222
S'Make Up Bride'
p223
S'Ylva Langenskiold'
p224
sS'Jewelry'
p225
S'Tiffany & Co.'
p226
sS'Assistant Photographer'
p227
S'Gert Huygaerts'
p228
sS'Reception Venue'
p229
S'Ch teau Grimaldi'
p230
sS'Photography'
p231
S'Greg Finck'
p232
sS"Make Up Bride's Maids"
p233
S'Camille Bonardi'
p234
sS'Hair'
p235
S'Carol Bonnet'
p236
sS"Bride's Shoes"
p237
S'Christian Louboutin'
p238
sS'Event Design'
p239
S'Lavender And Rose'
p240
sS"Bride's Gown"
p241
S'Caroline Castigliano'
p242
sS'Floral Design'
p243
S'Wayne Riley Flowers'
p244
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/12/09/classic-french-chateau-wedding-in-provence/'
p245
sg20
(dp246
g22
(lp247
S'elegant'
p248
asg25
(lp249
S'summer'
p250
asg28
(lp251
S'blush'
p252
aS'gray'
p253
asg33
(lp254
S'chateau'
p255
assg36
(lp256
S'When Greg Finck and Lavender And Rose join forces, amazing French weddings unfold. Case in point? This summertime chateau affair nestled in the heart of Provence. Complete with a host of pretty blooms by Wayne Riley Flowers and the most stunning lavender field you ever did see, there s more than enough reason to pause your work day (we won t tell!) and get lost in the gallery.'
p257
aS'From Greg Finck It can be tricky to attend to the wedding of an English and a German during the soccer worldcup. England had just been beaten by Uruguay the day before, and Germany was heading to being the next world champion. This however didn t even bring a cloud over Nicky and Daniel s chateau wedding in Provence.'
p258
aS'Nicky and Daniel are a wonderful couple from London, who had decided to tie the knot under the blue sky of sunny Provence. A fabulous day at Ch teau Grimaldi, a private chateau in Aix-en-Provence, with a stunning scenery and a pool embedded in the middle of castle ruins. This place vehicles all the beauty and magical light of Provence. Everything here is about pastel colors, soft and warm light, and the smell of lavender and olive groves.'
p259
aS'Nicky and Daniel s day had been perfectly designed by Lavender&Rose, with their usual touch of beauty and elegance. Floral design by Wayne Riley Flowers, perfectly matched the location s softness, with in particular splendid rose bouquets for the bride and bride s maids. Nicky s effortless beauty had been enhanced by a bespoke Caroline Castigliano s gown, and a pair of Christian Louboutin s high heels.'
p260
aS'The ceremony took place in Ch teau Grimaldi s private chapel, adding much intimacy to that very emotional moment. Once more the design was fabulous, with candles illuminating that intimate dark chapel. The cocktail took place just near by the pool, in the middle of castle ruins, while a jazz band was playing and guests savoring some Champagne. We leveraged the beautiful afternoon light for a lovely couple session in the middle of olive groves.'
p261
aS'The day ended with an elegant outdoor diner, set just in front the chateau, with beautiful table setting for Lavender&Rose, and Wayne Riley Flowers. The sun was setting on a beautiful, and I could not help but taking our lovely couple in a lavender field, just nearby, for some last shots with the last rays of sun and a fabulous light.'
p262
asa(dp263
g2
(dp264
S'Wedding Dress'
p265
S'Justin Alexander'
p266
sS'Photography'
p267
S'Dwayne Larson Photography'
p268
sS'Photography - Assistance'
p269
S'Victorian Anne Photography'
p270
sS'Invitations And Stationery'
p271
S'Jaime Alissa Design'
p272
sS"Bride's Shoes"
p273
S'Badgley Mischka'
p274
sS'Wedding Planning And Travel Agent'
p275
S'Travel & Events With Style'
p276
sS'Beach Set Up'
p277
S'Riu Tropical Bay '
p278
sS'Floral Design'
p279
S'Taiflora'
p280
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/12/09/coral-gray-jamaica-wedding/'
p281
sg20
(dp282
g22
(lp283
S'casual-elegance'
p284
asg25
(lp285
S'winter'
p286
asg28
(lp287
S'coral'
p288
aS'gray'
p289
asg33
(lp290
S'resort'
p291
assg36
(lp292
S'Winter is upon us New Englanders so I m officially in hibernation mode. For the next several months I ll be daydreaming of warm weather and beaches, starting off with this beautiful wedding in Jamaica. Under the guidance of Travel & Events With Style and captured by Dwayne Larson Photography, this celebration has me soaking up every single seaside photo and craving more.'
p293
aS'From The Bride  Sean and I wanted to chose a destination that would reflect us as a couple   Sean has been brought up with a Jamaican influence and it has shaped his life since he was a child. When we decided we wanted a beach wedding it seemed like a natural choice for us. Plus it gave everyone an excuse to escape one of the coldest cities in Canada!'
p294
aS'As a graphic designer, I started with the stationery design, and the everything else seemed to roll out from there. We wanted our wedding to evoke simple, casual elegance and compliment the gorgeous natural backdrop of Negril. Our color palette was coral, greys, white and a light seafoam green. I based our invitations off a casual handdrawn script I made of our names, and since it was a beach wedding I chose to incorporate stripes to give it a nautical feeling. I chose coral as our main color because it felt tropical and I knew it would look great with the clear blue water as a backdrop. I had custom rubber stamps made with a graphic of the island with a heart overlaying Negril to customize various items. I had the main invitation letter pressed, and tied the pieces together with grey and white bakers twine.'
p295
aS'Once the invitations were tackled I got to work planning craft nights with my friends to ensure we had decor that reflected us as a couple. One of our favourite things to do as a couple is to go to see live music, and travel to music festivals. My maid of honour found vintage sheet music at a thrift store that we used to make table runners, and pinwheels to label the bride and groom chairs. We made a backdrop for the guest table out of garland made with music sheets and paper in the color palette I chose. I chose to incorporate shells to tie in the beach theme, and made boutonnieres for the wedding party and family with starfish, grass and music sheets.'
p296
aS'We had our ceremony on the beach with the waves crashing just feet away from us. We wanted an intimate feel for the ceremony. The aisle was lined with white lanterns with ribbons flowing from the chairs, and flowing white curtains on bamboo framed the altar. For our guestbook, we really wanted something that would encourage guests to write something more personal, so we made a book with various questions for guests to answer on each page.'
p297
aS'Making sure our friends and family had fun at the reception was really important to us, and our choices for music reflected that. We had prepared our own playlist with a wide range of motown, soul, reggae, funk and hip hop, and had spin the bottle dance offs. A highlight of the night was when guests wanted us to kiss, we made them hula hoop. To end the night we set off Chinese Lanterns over the ocean.'
p298
aS'My friend Dwayne Larson did our photography, and my maid of honour who is lead photographer with Victoria Anne Photography couldn t help but snap a few shots for us when she wasn t fulfilling her attendant duties. It was so great having two people that we feel comfortable with there to capture our day.'
p299
aS'I cannot express enough about how much our wedding planner Jaime Valdes- Riench did for us. Planning an event from so far away adds a lot of stress and she made the process unbelievably simple and stress free   she kept us on track with decisions, gave us honest feedback, coordinated meetings with hard-to-nail down vendors and seamlessly planned the flow and sequence of our event.\n'
p300
asa(dp301
g2
(dp302
S'Photography'
p303
S'Em The Gem'
p304
sS'Photography - Assistance'
p305
S'Ashley Kelemen'
p306
sS'Hair + Makeup'
p307
S'Lona Bali Make Up Artist'
p308
sS'Concept + Styling'
p309
S'A & B Creative'
p310
sS'Floral'
p311
S'Chantelle Madison'
p312
sS"Bride's Shoes"
p313
S'Badgley Mischka'
p314
sS'Wedding Stationary'
p315
S'Eza Nasir'
p316
sS'Cake'
p317
S'C For Cupcakes'
p318
sS'Wedding Gown'
p319
S'Angela Marcuccio Bridal Couture'
p320
sS'Ceremony Venue, Reception Venue'
p321
S'Kayumanis Nusa Dua '
p322
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/12/08/organic-bali-destination-wedding/'
p323
sg20
(dp324
g22
(lp325
S'elegant'
p326
asg25
(lp327
S'summer'
p328
asg28
(lp329
S'blue'
p330
aS'light-blue'
p331
aS'taupe'
p332
asg33
(lp333
S'villa'
p334
assg36
(lp335
S'The only thing more beautiful than this wedding   and believe me, it s stunning   is the love story leading up. It s what happens when love surpasses 5 years and 5,000 miles to an  I do  that was most certainly worth the wait. Scroll on for the story in the bride s own words, and brace yourself for full gallery perfection designed in the hands of A & B Creative and photographed by Em The Gem.'
p336
aS'From The Bride The inspiration for our wedding was curated around our love story.'
p337
aS'King and I first met at church small group in Beijing, just 3 months before I had to return to Melbourne Australia for my career move. I didn t expect to be in a relationship at the time let alone a long-distance one. Neither did I expect a guy would like to be in one, especially with a girl who d be 5,000 miles away. But chemistry has its own way to creep into your better judgement and so 3 weeks after we got to know each other, say hello to a new couple in the group. As if the idea of long-distance wasn t challenging enough, we are also different nationalities. When you re dating a foreigner for 3 months but have to live thousand miles apart, you can t have expectations for the future if you don t wish to be heartbroken. So we took it easy and we took it by faith; that if we were meant to be together, God would do miracles. So after developing and growing our relationship for almost 5 years apart, gladly to say, God truly brought us through. And so did technology!'
p338
aS'A passage from Joshua Harris   Boy Meets Girl  sums it perfectly:'
p339
aS' It s a simple story really \n Two people learning to trust God\n Two winding paths that God made straight\n Two straight paths that He chose to cross just at the right time\n The Creator of romance, the Maker who arranged\nthe first  boy meets girl  in the garden so long ago,\n is still at work. '
p340
aS'King and I believe that we wouldn t have come this far if it wasn t by God s grace. So we wanted to bring our story back to him. We designed and framed the passage as part of the wedding detail that reflects the story of our journey.'
p341
aS'We decided to have destination wedding in Bali because it s close to home where I was from which is Jakarta, Indonesia. It was also perfect for a lot of our overseas friends and families to travel as far from North america, Australia, and other parts in Asia and make an exotic holiday out of it. We chose Kayumanis Villa Nusa Dua for it s perfect space for intimacy, as well as its unique architectural structure that has Indonesian, Italian and Western influence, giving it a mix of modern minimalist and rustic feel. Not to mention the greenery around the venue, which all worked perfectly together for my love in rustic and french provincial style.'
p342
aS'From the genuine promise of  we ll stay in touch  through the occasional complaints  are we ever gonna be together?  to the happy finale  will you marry me? , our journey is summed up in 3 words in Jenna Rainey of Mon Voir s calligraphed banner  Worth The Wait  that was beautifully styled and hung as our ceremony backdrop, and still kept for my wedding memoir.'
p343
aS'Last but not least, my favourite & best moment of my wedding day was not even the ceremony nor the reception. But it was after the last guests had left the venue, and it was just my husband and I, under very dim moonlit walking back to our honeymoon suite villa, with my bare foot. Just seconds when we were standing in front of the door to get in, that was the moment where I could finally be IN THE MOMENT and realised that we ve made it!'
p344
asa(dp345
g2
(dp346
S'Bridal Shoees'
p347
S'Jimmy Choo'
p348
sS'Wedding Planner'
p349
S'Rossana Sapori'
p350
sS'Venue'
p351
S'Fontelunga Hotel & Villas'
p352
sS'Photography'
p353
S'L&V Photography'
p354
sS'Hairs & Make Up'
p355
S'Tendenza Cortona'
p356
sS'Rings'
p357
S'Tiffany & Co.'
p358
sS'Vintage Car'
p359
S'Club 500'
p360
sS'Music'
p361
S'Lorenzo Borneo'
p362
sS'Caterer'
p363
S'Preludio Catering'
p364
sS'Flowers'
p365
S'Robero Fiorista '
p366
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/12/08/elegant-pozzo-della-chiana-wedding/'
p367
sg20
(dp368
g22
(lp369
S'elegant'
p370
asg25
(lp371
S'spring'
p372
asg28
(lp373
S'blush'
p374
aS'gray'
p375
aS'green'
p376
aS'ivory'
p377
asg33
(lp378
S'hotel'
p379
assg36
(lp380
S'If I had to reach into the wedding vault and pull a few soirees that encompass what pretty means to me, you d find me with a handful of weddings that shine with a simple kind of beauty a day filled to the brim with love and accented with darling bits of detail, like this one from the WeddingsInItaly team. With a breathtaking Tuscan scene, olive branch detailing and florals from Robero Fiorista, we have this sweet gallery from L&V Photography to peruse.'
p381
aS'From Rossana Sapori Looking at Rachel and George beautiful wedding, you d think this hidden part of Tuscany, between Cortona and Montepulciano, could offer such an incredible setting. And that s exactly what the two girls from L&VPhotography captured with their collection of stunning photographs. The rolling hills all around Fontelunga Villas  are the icing of the cake of a romantic real Tuscan wedding and no day has been so incredibly perfect and well-planned.'
p382
aS'From the ceremony in the local chapel of Pozzo della Chiana and the traditional gelato at the exit of the Church, from the long family style table and to the incredible floral arrangements: a real triumph of peonies from Roberto Il Fiorista. To complement the peach tones of the venue, a muted color palette of blush, green and ivory was chosen for the day, together with the symbol of the region: olive leaves. The gourmand moment was taken care by Preludio Caterer with their well-known great selection of foods and drinks.'
p383
aS'The result: a refined and elegant family dinner. That  exactly what Rossana Sapori and her team at WeddingsInItaly was hoping to achieve when she started planning the event. Enjoy it!\n'
p384
asa(dp385
g2
(dp386
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/12/05/chic-harbour-island-destination-wedding-at-three-bees-villa/'
p387
sg20
(dp388
g22
(lp389
S'casual-elegance'
p390
asg25
(lp391
S'spring'
p392
asg28
(lp393
S'gold'
p394
aS'navy'
p395
aS'turquoise'
p396
asg33
(lp397
S'villa'
p398
assg36
(lp399
S'Navy stripes are my neutral, so when they are stylish scattered throughout a soiree as chic as this one   my heart does cartwheels. And rightfully so, because this ridiculously gorgeous Three Bees Villa wedding captured by Sabrina Lightbourn and planned by Little Island Designs is honestly my definition of perfection, and you can see why here.'
p400
aS'Once we decided on Harbour Island for our wedding I knew that I HAD to work with Ben Simmons from Little Island Designs. I knew as much what I DID NOT want as what I DID for the wedding weekend. For example, we both felt strongly about having a church ceremony, rich with tradition, and I had my heart set on the reception at Three Bees Vila, Arki Busson s home. Furthermore, while I wasn t looking for the traditional  beach wedding , I also wasn t looking to recreate a Manhattan wedding in Harbour Island. I envisioned the style to be sophisticated and chic, yet understated. I wanted to make a statement, while still complimenting the natural beauty of the location.'
p401
aS'We hosted a Welcome Party the night before the wedding for all 150 guests, whom had travelled far and wide to be with us. My parents, Rob, Ben and I agreed that we wanted our guests experiences on Friday and Saturday nights to be as different as possible. As Saturday night would be a more formal sit down dinner on the bay side of the island, we planned the Welcome Party to be a casual Bahamian Beach Dinner on the ocean. Ben built out an area with sail clothes, long white farm tables decorated with local grasses and sea urchins and LOT S of candles and lanterns. We served a buffet of popular local dishes   fresh conch salad prepared right before guests, grilled fish and chicken, coleslaw and peas and rice, etc. Guests drank specialty drinks put of coconut shells, the local Harbour Island band  The Brilandrs  created a very Bahamian Calypso feel, a fire dancer entertained and guests lounged by a big beach bonfire after it got dark.'
p402
aS'For the actual wedding reception, I wanted to use a color palette different than the soft pastels people normally use down there. The classic look of navy and white has always been a personal favorite. Put it against the chic West Indies, safari-like aesthetic of Three Bees, and pepper in variations of aqua/green/turquoise   the colors of the water down there   and I quickly had a color scheme. Years ago, I came across a picture of a black and white dance floor in Beverly Hills that I fell in love with. I showed Ben the picture and asked if he could recreate it in navy and white  before I knew it we had a custom dance floor right on the waters edge! It was certainly one of my favorite style elements of the night. Another favorite style detail is the way Ben so elegantly lights an outdoor area  several shabby chic white chandeliers hanging from trees is an image that will forever be in my mind. Having worked in PR for the past 15 years, I have learned that the difference is in the details. So . we personalized the space with other details like monogrammed pillows for all the white couches; personalized cups, napkins and matches. We tied beige and blue pashminas to the back of all the women s bamboo dinner chairs and also provided either blue or turquoise leather  dancing shoes  for all the women, which were separated by size in four different blue and white striped canvas containers. The flowers were green or white only and the centerpieces were tall vases of palm fronds with tea lights h and small white bouquets in mirrored vases around the base. We accented the table with navy and white striped runners on top of white table clothes. The combination of the blue and white with bamboo chairs and chargers and the natural looking palm centerpieces with punches of white flowers was beautiful yet understated.'
p403
aS'It was really important to both me and Rob to utilize as many local vendors, and to include as many Bahamian traditions as possible. Examples of some of the traditions that we included were the  Sister Act-like  church choir, wedding procession through town after the ceremony and Junkanoo, which paraded guests from dinner to dancing and desert. A few other entertainment and style elements that made our wedding so special include:'
p404
aS'   Transportation for all guests to and from Three Bees by boat, including our arrival\n   Spectacular fireworks\n   The gift bags   personalized straw bags that contained a custom belt with our coral motif, personalized sunscreen and Frisbee (again with coral motif and the wedding date), a stamped pre-addressed Harbour Island postcard to me and Rob (we are still receiving them, which is really fun!), bottled water with custom labels, a bag of Sea Salt potato chips as well as goldfish and Swedish fish gummy candies, welcome book and a GREAT map of the island by my sister\n   DIY turquoise burgees with everyone s name and our coral motif, laminated and stuck to each person s golf cart\n   Our wedding cake melted before anyone could see it, but we didn t even care!\n   The smile on both my and Rob s face all weekend long  it was the BEST weekend of our lives!'
p405
aS"Event Coordinator: Little Island Designs | Wedding Dress: Vera Wang From Mark Ingram Atelier | Invitations: The Printery  | Bridesmaids' Dresses: Donna Morgan From The Wedding Library | Band: The Sultans Of Swing | Custom Belts For All Guests: Elizabeth McKay | Groom And Groomsmen Flip Flops: The Leatherman | Groom And Groomsmen's Custom Ties: Vineyard Vines | Photography : Sabrina Lightbourn | Printed Materials : DFM Stationery  | Wedding Cake : Swiss Pastry Shop | Wedding Reception: Three Bees Villa | Welcome Party: On The Beach At The Ocean View Club"
p406
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p407
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p408
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p409
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p410
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p411
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p412
aS'A ...'
p413
aS'When ...'
p414
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p415
asa(dp416
g2
(dp417
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/12/05/romantic-island-elopement-in-kauai-at-kilohana-plantations/'
p418
sg20
(dp419
g22
(lp420
S'elegance'
p421
asg25
(lp422
S'summer'
p423
asg28
(lp424
S'blush'
p425
aS'navy'
p426
asg33
(lp427
S'beach'
p428
assg36
(lp429
S'When it comes to themes, we ve seen it all on SMP, but this Bride and Groom s theme of  enjoying our day and just going with the flow  might just be my favorite. They created a romantic elopement that highlighted their love, and thanks to the talented  Blenda Montoro we get to enjoy the results right here.'
p430
aS'Now, to pick the date The most important part of our planning was to find an amazing photographer. We were blown away by Blenda Montoro Miller and her artistic eye for capturing love. Before we even contacted her we knew we would just pick our date around her availability. When she said June 28th was available that is when we set our date for our elopement! Our vision for our secret wedding was a romantic island elopement where elegance meets simplicity. I found my dress through the J Crew wedding collection. I had two pairs of shoes, a flowery sandal for walking on the beach and for my something blue, a fun pair of blue heels from Badgley Mishka. I had  borrowed  my moms pearl necklace and Louis gave me pearl earrings as a wedding gift. Kristy at The LAB Salon did a beautiful job with my hair and makeup. She hit it spot on with a beachy romantic hairstyle and a statement peony on the side. The talented designers at Martin Roberts Design created the beautiful soft romantic peony bouquet. Louis dressed the part looking sharp in his blue suit with custom made cuff links reading  lucky me . Even though our vision for our wedding was simple and laid back, these small details made it really special to us.'
p431
aS'Keeping with the theme of just enjoying our day and going with the flow, we weren t exactly sure where we were going to have the ceremony. At the time of our wedding we met our photographer Blenda and officiant, Kelvin Ho in front of the resort we were staying at. We were thinking of having the ceremony right there on Shipwrecks beach but with the advice of Blenda and Kelvin we decided to take a little walk up to the cliffs above the beach where we found the most dramatic, intimate and perfect spot to say  I DO!  The skies were blue, the wind was cleansing and the love between us was undeniable. Our officiant Kelvin spoke such beautiful, heartfelt words during the ceremony rituals. We could not have asked for a better officiant to share this special moment with as we start our lives together as husband and wife. It took our breath away. After the ceremony Blenda, her husband Raymond, Louis and I went to a second location at The Kilohana Plantation to celebrate with champagne and take some fun photos. We couldn t have asked for a better day and we have the most amazing photographs that captured these moments to share with family and friends.\n'
p432
aS'Photography: Blenda Montoro Photography | Floral Design: Martin Roberts Design Floral And Event Decor | Ceremony Venue: Shipwrecks Beach Kauai  | Reception Venue: Kilohana Plantations  | Bride Dress : J. Crew Weddings | Bride Shoes : Badgley Mischka | Hair And Make Up : Kristy Love (The LAB Salon) | Wedding Officiant : Kelvin Ho '
p433
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p434
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p435
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p436
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p437
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p438
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p439
aS'A ...'
p440
aS'When ...'
p441
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p442
asa(dp443
g2
(dp444
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/12/04/intimate-summer-wedding-in-prague/'
p445
sg20
(dp446
g22
(lp447
S'elegance'
p448
asg25
(lp449
S'summer'
p450
asg28
(lp451
S'blush'
p452
aS'gray'
p453
aS'pink'
p454
asg33
(lp455
S'hotel'
p456
assg36
(lp457
S'I had the opportunity to visit Prague this summer and haven t stopped thinking about it since. The city has a bit of magic and this elegant affair captured that spirit beautifully. With Stepan Vrzala behind the lens and Exclusive Weddings in Prague coordinating it all, the finished result is breathtaking. So excuse me while I gaze longingly through this gallery and remember all the love within those city walls.'
p458
aS'From The Bride  We wanted our wedding to be an intimate family and close friends affair but we still wanted it to be fun. We chose Prague in Czech Republic for our wedding because we ve visited this city a few times before and were always fascinated by its beauty. It s so romantic and perfect for a wedding. I am originally from Slovakia, a neighboring country to Czech Republic so Prague was a great location for my family and the guests coming from the United States to meet and celebrate together. Choosing our venue was a lot harder though. There s so many beautiful gardens, hotels, and castles to choose from. Unfortunately, due to our busy schedules we were unable to travel to Prague and see venues in person before the wedding. So we chose a wedding agency that has a lot of experience planning weddings in Prague to help us make all the arrangements. This was unbeatably one of the best decisions we ve made and we highly recommend to have a local wedding planner to anyone planning a destination wedding. After a year of long-distance planning, Skyping and hundreds of emails we were both very anxious to see it all come together when we arrived in Prague. Most importantly, we could not wait to see our venue, the Augustine Hotel. I remember how nervous I was the day we went to see it. Once we got there I was both relieved and even more excited for the wedding. The venue was beautiful. The staff was very friendly and it felt intimate just as we wished. The small hotel near the Prague Castle has a rich history dating back to the 13th century. It consists of seven buildings surrounding the Saint Thomas Church and Monastery. A few practicing friars still live in an adjoining quarter. Underneath the hotel is a small brewery making the Saint Thomas beer which was served at our reception. Our ceremony took place in an intimately enclosed Sundial garden, followed by a cocktail reception. My husband and I went to take pictures by the nearby Charles River and in the Wallenstein garden. The dinner took place in a cloistered terrace and was followed by our first dance to Michael Buble s  Can t help Falling in Love  underneath a 19th century Baroque fresco ceiling of the Litchfield bar. Even though we only had little bit over 30 guests we had lots of fun on the dance floor. Our DJ really did a great job at keeping us dancing. For us a small wedding worked out great and we loved that we were surrounded by our dearest family and friends and had a chance to talk to everyone. This was something that felt true to us and was the most favorite thing about the wedding. '
p459
aS'Photography: Stepan Vrzala | Florist: Inspirito | Wedding gown: Casablanca | Ceremony Venue: The Augustine | Reception Venue: The Augustine | Shoes: Betsey Johnson | Engagement ring: Tiffany Weddings | DJ: Jiri Brezina | Grooms Attire: Calvin Klein | Ceremony music: Klarovo string quartet | Earrings: Nina Bridal | Graphic Design: Graphite | Hair and make-up: Kamila Simankova | Wedding planning and design: ExclusiveWeddingsinPrague'
p460
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p461
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p462
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p463
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p464
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p465
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p466
aS'A ...'
p467
aS'When ...'
p468
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p469
asa(dp470
g2
(dp471
S'Shoes'
p472
S'Badgley Mischka'
p473
sS'Photography'
p474
S'Amanda K Photography'
p475
sS'Venue'
p476
S'Hacienda Siesta Alegre'
p477
sS'Invitations'
p478
S"Bride's Grandma Dagmar Merritt"
p479
sS"Groom's Apparel (tie And Shoes)"
p480
S'ASOS'
p481
sS'Florist'
p482
S'M&M Flower Market & Deco'
p483
sS'Wedding Gown'
p484
S'Claire Pettibone'
p485
sS'Wedding Planner'
p486
S"Bride's Grandma Dagmar Merritt"
p487
sS'Leather Suspenders'
p488
S"Groom's Friend Jeremy Thompson"
p489
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/12/03/rustic-spring-wedding-in-puerto-rico/'
p490
sg20
(dp491
g22
(lp492
S'rustic'
p493
asg25
(lp494
S'spring'
p495
asg28
(lp496
S'blush'
p497
aS'gray'
p498
aS'khaki'
p499
asg33
(lp500
S'bed-breakfast'
p501
assg36
(lp502
S'With Mother Nature making it clear to us New Englanders that it s time to bundle up, I m desperately dreaming of sunshine and warmth. This colorful spring wedding at Puerto Rico s Hacienda Siesta Alegre provides the perfect mental escape and with Amanda K s gorgeous photos, I ll be soaking up this sunny celebration for the foreseeable future.'
p503
aS'As I only had six months to plan the wedding, the dress was one of the first things I tried to find. After trying on different dresses, I decided to order a custom dress online. Unfortunately, the dress did not come in as it was described. So with only three months to spare, it was truly crunch time. I knew I could no longer order a dress from a shop, so I went to oncewed.com and found the exact dress I had fallen in love with for a fraction of the price. And bonus, the owner was local and my exact same size! She was so sweet, and we have even kept in touch. As she said perfectly,  the dress has had a very special existence. '
p504
aS'Our vision was romantic and soft with a touch of simplicity & elegance, but we still wanted it to feel relaxed. With it taking place in Puerto Rico, we also wanted to make sure we didn t lose the feel of the culture. We go to lots of weddings, so we decided to do away with all traditions that are just that, traditions. We kept it simple and did not have a bridal party other than the flower girls. We had a first look, didn t smash cake in each others faces, kept our first dance at 30 seconds, and did away with Daniel going up my dress to take off my garter, along with other traditions.  We ve always wanted a destination wedding, and since my family is from Puerto Rico, that was our first pick. As soon as I laid my eyes on the Hacienda, it was love at first sight. It was everything I wanted to evoke on our day. The scenery was perfect; the cozy bed and breakfast had an old Spanish feel, and it was located in the mountains in the rainforest. Also, having a venue that could host both the ceremony and reception was important to us as many of our family members were traveling from abroad.'
p505
aS'My head piece, party favors, wedding invitations, and linens were all handmade by my grandma, with a little help from us. She is crafty by nature, so she was thrilled to help in every avenue possible. The invitations were a daunting task, and the wedding would have never been the same without her. My favorite detail was by far my jewelry. Daniel bought me the jewelry while in Iraq in 2009, and I have been saving it for this day since. I ve been telling him it s too pretty to wear with just anything, so it was a surprise when he finally saw me wear it on our wedding day. It was special and unique to us.'
p506
aS'My most memorable moment was our first look. There are very few moments throughout the day that you get to spend alone with your groom, and those are the moments I treasure most. We exchanged heartfelt notes, and he bought me a bouquet of flowers. We soaked in the last few hours before saying  I do,  and I m glad our photographer, Amanda, was there to capture that. In keeping the Hispanic culture alive, we had a live band (a Batucada) during the reception unlike anything I ve ever experienced. They played traditional music with drums and trumpets and got the guests involved by teaching them typical dances. It was the highlight to our evening. We also incorporated traditional food, and piraguas (traditional shaved ice desert) were served by a pirag ero, in a small colorful pushcart.'
p507
asa(dp508
g2
(dp509
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/12/03/elegant-charleston-wedding-at-gibbes-museum-of-art/'
p510
sg20
(dp511
g22
(lp512
S'elegance'
p513
asg25
(lp514
S'summer'
p515
asg28
(lp516
S'blush'
p517
aS'gold'
p518
aS'gray'
p519
asg33
(lp520
S'art-gallery'
p521
aS'church'
p522
assg36
(lp523
S'If I could relocate to anywhere in the United States, it would be Charleston. I adore its perfect mix of Southern charm and chic city life, and this wedding captured that vibe to a T. With beautiful florals by Branch Design Studio, and a couple who look like they had one fabulous time at their celebration. Amelia + Dan snapped up every moment and I ll be living vicariously through this gallery for the rest of today.'
p524
aS'From The Bride  Our story is perhaps a quintessential Washington, D.C. love story. Although we had been living in D.C. for many years, and had some friends in common, our paths did not cross until the fall of 2008. We had great conversations and felt a spark the night we met, but I became consumed with working on the Presidential campaign and we did not see each other again until an inauguration party in January. We went on our first date the following month, and the rest is history '
p525
aS'A shared appreciation for travel led to our decision to do a destination wedding away from our base of Washington, D.C. Charleston immediately came to mind, because I spent several childhood vacations at Kiawah. We selected the Gibbes Museum early on, with its gorgeous blank canvas of a courtyard and interior art galleries. Both of us are detail-oriented and experienced in events, and were very hands-on throughout the process of creating our dream event, with the assistance of Sweetgrass Social.'
p526
aS'I had not given much thought to my wedding dress until I started shopping for one, but quickly discovered I wanted something unique, which posed a bit of a challenge in a sea of traditional dresses. After trying on some Vera Wang gowns, the saleswoman showed me the Mira dress. They only happened to have the dress for an upcoming runway show and had not even received their sample, but it fit close to perfectly and I knew instantly that it was the one. It was the last dress I tried on. '
p527
aS'As soon as we saw the incredible wedding photography of Amelia + Dan, we knew we wanted them to capture our wedding. They have an ability to render moments and details in an artistic and beautiful manner, and are unobtrusive in their style of shooting. They also are a lovely couple and true pleasure to work with. The bouquets and floral arrangements, created by Branch Design Studio, were thoughtfully decided upon given the significance of flowers and gardening for us as a couple. The color palette for the wedding was ultimately inspired by the flowers, blush, light sage, and ivory, along with gold and charcoal. We worked closely with family friend and stationer extraordinaire, Rachael Blessinger of R Studio, on all stationary for the wedding weekend. I drew by hand and painted with watercolor a map that we enclosed with the invitation.'
p528
aS'We chose the Unitarian Church on Archdale for the ceremony due to our respect and appreciation for Unitarianism, and the gorgeous architectural details. After the ceremony, guests took pedicabs or strolled along Gateway Walk, the garden path beside the Church, to reach the Gibbes Museum, where servers greeted guests with Airmail cocktails, and an assortment of hors d oeuvres.'
p529
aS'We danced our first dance to Sade, Kiss of Life, and rarely left the dance floor for the remainder of the evening and were constantly surrounded by guests enjoying the fun dancefloor vibe. We chose a smaller two-tiered wedding cake, made of yellow cake with chocolate buttercream frosting. The Bride loves to bake and has a serious sweet tooth, and the Groom grew up among bakers, so the couple also chose an assortment of mini-desserts.'
p530
aS'One DIY detail entailed a Polaroid camera area for guests in lieu of a photo booth (we used the Fujifilm Instax Mini 8). By the end of the evening, guests had taken almost one hundred polaroids for the couple, and took the same number of shots for themselves. Guests also enjoyed late night passers of Southern Fried Chicken and Waffle Sliders and Parmesan Truffle Fries, before a sparkler-filled sendoff for the happy couple, and more dancing at the after-party location, Leaf Caf , a short walk or pedicab away from the Gibbes Museum.'
p531
aS'There was a shared feeling of joy and festiveness in the air, and many guests commented on how moved they felt by the wedding, that it was the  best wedding they had ever been to!  and that it looked like it was  out of a magazine.  It was the happiest day for the couple, and the euphoria of being surrounded by loved ones, and joining in matrimony their lives and their families,  lasted for weeks. Pulling off this wedding was a labor of love for the couple and their families. We are so grateful for our parents  support.\n'
p532
aS"Photography: Amelia + Dan Photography | Floral Design: Branch Design Studio | Wedding Dress: Saks Jandel | Wedding Dress: Vera Wang | Cake: Wildflour Pastry | Stationary: Studio R  | Ceremony Venue: The Unitarian Church In Charleston | Reception Venue: Gibbes Museum Of Art | Bridesmaids' Dresses: Jim Hjelm | Catering: Cru Catering | Lighting: TEC | DJ: DJ Dirty Hands | Coordination: Sweetgrass Social Event + Design | Hair And Make-up: Paper Dolls Makeup | Rentals: Event Works | Rentals: Snyder | Rentals: 428 Main | Transportation: Tri-County Transportation"
p533
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p534
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p535
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p536
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p537
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p538
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p539
aS'A ...'
p540
aS'When ...'
p541
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p542
asa(dp543
g2
(dp544
S'Workshop '
p545
S'Moda E Arte'
p546
sS'Ring Box '
p547
S'The Mrs. Box'
p548
sS'Tuxedo '
p549
S'Jcrew'
p550
sS'Hair And Makeup'
p551
S'Mia Jeppson'
p552
sS'Photography'
p553
S'KT Merry Photography'
p554
sS'Hotel'
p555
S'Hotel Caruso'
p556
sS'Headpiece'
p557
S'Jannie Baltzer'
p558
sS'Linens '
p559
S'La Tavola Linen'
p560
sS'Cake '
p561
S'Farfalla Di Zucchero'
p562
sS'Film Lab'
p563
S'Richard Photo Lab'
p564
sS'Video'
p565
S'MG Image'
p566
sS'Location'
p567
S'Villa Cimbrone'
p568
sS'Stationery'
p569
S'Written Word Calligraphy'
p570
sS'Ring'
p571
S'Classic Vintage Rentals'
p572
sS'Gown '
p573
S'Samuelle'
p574
sS'Design & Florals'
p575
S'Joy Proctor Design (formerly Joy De Vivre)'
p576
sS'Ribbon'
p577
S'Silk + Willow'
p578
sS'Tabletop'
p579
S'Classic Vintage Rentals'
p580
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/12/01/amalfi-coast-wedding-editorial/'
p581
sg20
(dp582
g22
(lp583
S'romantic'
p584
asg25
(lp585
S'spring'
p586
asg28
(lp587
S'gold'
p588
aS'gray'
p589
aS'taupe'
p590
asg33
(lp591
S'coast'
p592
assg36
(lp593
S'Just imagine escaping to coastal Italy with some of the industry s brightest talent. Imagine a shoot styled to utter perfection by Joy Proctor Design, and the KT Merry as a photography mentor by your side. It s exactly the idea behind Moda e Art and the proof is in the pudding. We ve got the snaps from the latest workshop right at your fingertips. Pssst: Exciting news for 2015 Moda e Art hopefuls below!'
p594
aS'NOW OPEN: Moda e Art Waitlist'
p595
aS'From Joy Proctor of Joy Proctor Design  Inspiration abounds throughout Italy and is beautiful landscapes. The incredible gem that is the Amalfi Coast serves as one of the best examples of the marriage between natural beauty and the incredible history so often found in Italy. The participants of this Falls Moda e Arte Workshop had the distinct pleasure of photographing and experiencing what is arguably, one of the treasures of the Amalfi Coast, the Villa Cimberone. The 11th century estate sits atop the cliffs of Ravello, overlooking the grand expense of the Amalfi Coast. Famous for its Terrazzo del lnfinito, or Terrace of Infinity, and expansive gardens, the Villa is an UNESCO World Heritage site.'
p596
aS'The inspiration for the shoot came from the location, set high above the seas below. With a color palate, and textures that evoked the feeling of air and light, we aimed to create something that was ethereal, an homage to the Italian history of the Palace of the Gods set amongst the clouds. The motif of a golden lyre was used throughout the paper suite created by Written Word Calligraphy. We chose to use a combination of paper and vellum for the invitation and paper goods   further adding to the light and ethereal feel of the look. An airy palate of cream, white and gold were played against the weathered stone and marble of the Villa.'
p597
aS'The brides gown, a stunning creation by Samuelle Couture was another ethereal piece that played up the light nature of the look. The gowns soft tulle draped around the brides feet, with the slightest ruching at the top of the gown   another homage to the Roman history of the location. The mother of pearl cameo ring from Classic Vintage Rentals hinted to the location set above the sea. A simple green garland and gold leaves adorned the brides hair.'
p598
aS'An intimate ceremony was set in front of a dome covered statue, with an aisle of chiffon covered chairs, wrapped in raw silk ribbon. As if a cloud of its own, the table set on the Terrace on Infinity was draped in La Tavola Linens Organdy in white, with an underlay of Topaz Fog. The exquisite gold chargers and intricate mother of pearl flatware from Classic Vintage Rentals played up the elegance of the ethereal linen. Vellum menus with gold calligraphy sat scrolled on each charger, with the name of each guest ribbed between the mother of pearl forks. Glass candlesticks and cut glass votives sat between the wild and organic florals arrangements.'
p599
asa(dp600
g2
(dp601
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/12/01/glamorous-caribbean-inspiration/'
p602
sg20
(dp603
g22
(lp604
S'casual-elegance'
p605
asg25
(lp606
S'summer'
p607
asg28
(lp608
S'gold'
p609
aS'pink'
p610
aS'purple'
p611
asg33
(lp612
S'villa'
p613
assg36
(lp614
S'It s no surprise that when a labor of love unites the photo talents of Lesley Castle with the event design and styling of Island Style Weddings every detail turns out to be perfectly vibrant and relaxed. Combining Caribbean flair with glamorous glitter, everything from the arrangements by Roses too to the hair stylings by Grapevine Salon captured to create a gallery fit for paradise.'
p615
aS'From Mary Bartolucci After months of brainstorming, pinning, and sharing collective inspiration, Island Style Weddings  first styled photo shoot came to fruition in this labor of love! What a delight it was to work with such a talented group of island friends on this collaboration.Our creative juices were flowing with visions of romance, whimsical Caribbean colors and glamorous gold accents. We hit the ground at the crack of dawn to capture the morning light at Carolina Corral, on the east side of the island. Leah, our stunning model was a great sport in calming her horse to get just the right shot!'
p616
aS'The cocktail hour shoot burst with colors and island flavors. MJ of Motu Bar, our mixologist nailed our vision right on the dot with the tropical garnishes and lush flavors. The cocktails, were not only lovely but quite tasty! A Caribbean inspired shoot wouldn t be complete without coconuts and rum of course! Loved these playful shots drinking from the coconuts. Colleen Kramper and Michelle Collins of Grapevine salon, used all the tricks of their trade to keep our models looking fresh and camera ready in the tropical heat.'
p617
aS'There was no shortage of laughs Lesley Castle Photography did an incredible job capturing all of the details throughout the weekend! Not a moment was missed with her attention to detail and creative eye. Based in Los Angeles, Lesley is no stranger to the islands. Having been raised on St John helped Lesley explore the essence of the island through her camera lens. Jessica, from Roses Too transformed our color inspirations and vision into stunning arrangements! The bouquets were a festive mix of textures, colors, and whimsy   absolutely breathtaking.'
p618
aS'The table setting at Villa Rapture of St John Ultimate Villas continued with our vibrant color and gold accent theme. The gorgeous sun setting in the distance made the  golden hour  beautifully romantic! A champagne toast was the perfect end to our busy day.'
p619
aS'Although this dream team works together regularly on real weddings, this was our first inspired shoot. As long time island residents and wedding professionals, it was magical to see our vision come together. We hope that this shoot warms your heart as much as it did ours. Enjoy!\n'
p620
aS'Photography: Lesley Castle  | Event Design: Mary Bartolucci | Event Design: Leah Burris | Event Stylist: Mary Bartolucci | Event Planning: Island Style Weddings | Floral Design: Roses too  | Beach: VI National Park- Honeymoon Beach | Decor: Island Style Weddings | Hair and Makeup : Grapevine Salon | Luxury  Villa: Rapture | Mixologist: Motu Bar | Model: Jessica Aubain | Model: Leah Burris | Model: Jessie Ludwig | Stables: Carolina Corral | Styist: Island Style Weddings'
p621
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p622
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p623
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p624
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p625
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p626
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p627
aS'A ...'
p628
aS'When ...'
p629
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p630
asa(dp631
g2
(dp632
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/11/28/romantic-roman-wedding-at-st-peters-basilica/'
p633
sg20
(dp634
g22
(lp635
S'traditional-elegance'
p636
asg25
(lp637
S'summer'
p638
asg28
(lp639
S'black'
p640
aS'blush'
p641
aS'cream'
p642
asg33
(lp643
S'church'
p644
aS'hotel'
p645
assg36
(lp646
S'I m a big fan of church ceremonies; I find them beautifully traditional. But a ceremony at St. Peter s Basilica is on a whole other level. This stunning Roman wedding evokes an almost regal feel, orchestrated by the Getting Married In Italy team and captured by the talented David Bastianoni. As we enter into the weekend, I ll be living la dolce vita as I get lost in this stunning gallery.'
p647
aS'From Getting Married In Italy  Getting married at the Vatican for a Catholic couple is more than just a dream. Maritess & Irwin fulfilled their wedding dream with a solemn Catholic marriage at the Vatican, the largest church in the world. They were surrounded by history and the holy during their private and intimate ceremony in the Choirs Chapel of the Basilica of St. Peter whose doors were closed for the event to pilgrims coming from all over the world.'
p648
aS'After the ceremony, they indulged in a photo shoot inspired to the Roman Dolce Vita around the eternal city with stops at Castel Sant Angelo, Colosseum and Lungotevere. '
p649
aS'Their wedding lunch was held at a private panoramic neoclassical villa dating back to the XIX and overlooking Rome, one of the most beautiful point of view of the city. A private veranda was set up with a long imperial table, decorated in black and white colors with a touch of gold: phalaenopsis, roses, hydrangeas, dahlias and anemones brightened the atmosphere against black chiffon table runners.'
p650
aS'The bride creatively worked on wedding stationery from glittered fans to fabric bags and kids favors. The Italian taste was completed with small bottles of limoncello liqueur to thank their guests and toast to La Dolce Vita.\n'
p651
aS"Photography: David Bastianoni | Videography: David Bastianoni | Event Planning: Getting Married In Italy | Wedding Cake: Casina Valadier | Stationery: Kate Aspen | Reception Venue: Casina Valadier | Bride's Shoes: Christian Louboutin | Catering: Casina Valadier | Favors: Pallini | Church: St. Peter's Basilica | Flower Design: Dordas"
p652
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p653
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p654
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p655
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p656
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p657
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p658
aS'A ...'
p659
aS'When ...'
p660
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p661
asa(dp662
g2
(dp663
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/11/27/romantic-wedding-inspiration-shoot-in-paris/'
p664
sg20
(dp665
g22
(lp666
S'elegance'
p667
asg25
(lp668
S'winter'
p669
asg28
(lp670
S'gold'
p671
aS'gray'
p672
aS'silver-2'
p673
asg33
(lp674
S'eiffel-tower'
p675
assg36
(lp676
S'I am an absolute francophile. And Paris? Well, it s my favorite place in the whole wide world. Loren Routhier s images are proof that with a glittering Adrianna Papell  gown and sparkling Jimmy Choo shoes even a dreary day in Paris is utterly romantic. I can honestly say that after peeking through the gallery, I will actively be planning my return to the City of Lights.'
p677
aS'From Loren Routhier A styled shoot in the City of Lights full of sparkles, metallics and gold! Our gorgeous model, Liz, was styled elegantly in an Adrianna Papell gown that was a throwback to 1920 s art deco Parisian chic. We accessorized her with an ivory fur stole by Adrienne Landau, Givenchy earrings and a gorgeous pair of sparkly Jimmy Choos. Our handsome groom, Jared, wore a classic black suit from H&M. The table settings and glassware were all vintage from Paris. In true Parisian form, we staved off the rain long enough to get dramatic shots of the Eiffel Tower and even managed to catch a brief ray of sunshine before the first drops fell from the sky. We shot all around Paris and took in the iconic sites such as the Eiffel Tower and Notre Dame.\n'
p678
aS"Photography: Loren Routhier | Gown: Adrianna Papell  | Invitations: Mac & Murphy | Bride's Shoes: Jimmy Choo | Calligrapher: Hope Riley | Groom's Suit: H&M | Bride's Fur: Adrienne Landau | Earrings : Givenchy | Stylist: Loren Routhier | Venue: Notre Dame | Venue: Eiffel Tower"
p679
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p680
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p681
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p682
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p683
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p684
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p685
aS'A ...'
p686
aS'When ...'
p687
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p688
asa(dp689
g2
(dp690
S"Groom's Attire"
p691
S'Brooklyn Tailors'
p692
sS'Wedding Dress'
p693
S'Enzoani'
p694
sS'Bridesmaid Jumpsuit'
p695
S'Etro'
p696
sS'Photography'
p697
S'Facibeni Fotografia'
p698
sS"Bridesmaids' Dresses"
p699
S'Jenny Yoo'
p700
sS"Bride's Shoes"
p701
S'Jimmy Choo'
p702
sS'Il Wedding Planner'
p703
S'Canto Di Imeneo'
p704
sS'Country Property'
p705
S'La Bandita'
p706
sS'Invitations'
p707
S'The Village Invites'
p708
sS'Floral Design'
p709
S'Tuscany Flowers'
p710
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/11/26/colorful-la-bandita-wedding/'
p711
sg20
(dp712
g22
(lp713
S'rustic'
p714
asg25
(lp715
S'summer'
p716
asg28
(lp717
S'blush'
p718
aS'gray'
p719
aS'lavender'
p720
aS'pink'
p721
asg33
(lp722
S'villa'
p723
assg36
(lp724
S'This stunning Bride and I? We share some common ground. We re both obsessed with beautiful blooms. And I can only hope that my Big Day is bursting with as many pretty petals as hers, thanks to the team at Tuscany Flowers. They re woven in all the lovely imagery from Facibeni Fotografia and set the romantic tone for this al fresco Italian fete. Head to the gallery for so much more!'
p725
aS'From the beautiful Bride When Nick and I got engaged, we knew that we wanted to have a destination wedding. Yet, at the same time, both of us loved the idea of an intimate backyard setting that focused on food, wine, friends and music.'
p726
aS'As we started to look at locations everywhere from Mexico to Europe, those two ideas started to feel a little contradictory. But when we found La Bandita, everything came together.'
p727
aS'Not only did we have the incredible food and wine of Tuscany, that backyard we always dreamed of ended up being a gorgeous Tuscan hillside (and a few dozen sheep.)'
p728
aS'Planning isn t exactly my strong-suit, but miraculously it worked out. The miracle behind that miraculousness was named Francesca, our wedding planner from il Canto Di Imeneo based in Montepulciano together with Martina, a short drive from Pienza where our events were based.'
p729
aS'Once a month, Nick and I would Skype with her at 8am before work to talk details. I gave up any sense of control early on in the planning process, (we were dealing with another country and another language), but the one detail I obsessed over were the flowers. Il Canto di Imeneo suggested us Tuscany Flowers and were amazing to work with. We went back and forth via email through Francesca and Martina about specific flowers to include or exclude.'
p730
aS'Our other godsend was John Voightmann, owner and manager of our villa and ceremony site, La Bandita. He was available and patient throughout the planning period. His staff were ninjas of gourmet perfection. Together with our wedding planners, they executed an amazing event that included a family-style seated dinner and a late-night, brick oven pizza snack   crucial to keep our friends dancing.'
p731
aS'A friend recently told me,  I wish your wedding were a destination so that we could all go back and visit it.  I do, too. And I wish I could have another helping of that handmade gnocci and bucatini. \n'
p732
asa(dp733
g2
(dp734
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/11/26/a-story-of-hope-and-healing/'
p735
sg20
(dp736
g22
(lp737
S'elegance'
p738
asg25
(lp739
S'summer'
p740
asg28
(lp741
sg33
(lp742
S'resort'
p743
assg36
(lp744
S'I tried really hard to get through this post without crying, and I ll have you know I made it through a whole ten words of the description below from Del Sol Photography before the tears started to fall. And then I just couldn t help myself. This gorgeous Bride lost the love of her life 52 days before their wedding, and writing that sentence just sends shivers up my spine. But this beautiful shoot is so much more than a collection of gorgeous images, it is her way of letting go and finding her new happily every after. Trust me, it s a story you ll definitely want to take some time to read today '
p745
aS'My name is Matt Adcock and this is the first time I ve been inspired to do anything like this in my 10 year career as a destination wedding photographer. After I heard Janine s story, I really wanted to do what I could to create a magical adventure for her. She told me that she felt a strong connection with the element of water, for its cleansing and purifying qualities and the sense of freedom she felt while swimming. I knew that the natural aquatic wonders of the Riviera Maya would offer great comfort and would be the perfect vehicle for her healing process.'
p746
aS'I began to develop a plan, one that would involve a symbolic and ceremonial liberation from grief. The shoot was designed to have several points that would serve as memory markers for her, the balloon release and the falling into the cenote both representing elements of letting go of the past and opening herself to the future.'
p747
aS'This is by far the most emotional I have ever been while working on a project. I was brought to tears when I started to bring the story to life in the editing room. I am humbled to have been able to meet and work with Janine and am inspired by her words and her courage in sharing her message of hope. I would like to thank Zuko and our friends at AM Resorts and Dreams Tulum for helping us bring this idea to life.'
p748
aS'I laughed and cried with Janine. Her spirit and energy are contagious and I really hope her story touches someone else going through a tough time. Janine had the courage to express herself in a way others can t even imagine.'
p749
aS'After the shoot, we interviewed Janine. She shared these thoughts with us:'
p750
aS'From Janine When I finally decided that I wanted to keep my wedding dress and not sell it because of what it means to me, I started to Google  photography  and  underwater bride . Del Sol Photography came up more than once so I finally looked at their website. I was in awe of their work so I said to myself,  What are you going to lose? Just go for it. So I filled out the  contact us  part of their website and they got back to me in 24 hours.'
p751
aS'My expectation was to find a certain closure and to have a photo shoot of my dress in a different way that not your average bride would even think of doing. I wanted to be free and I wanted to do something different.'
p752
aS'The day of the shoot I woke up at Dreams Tulum very excited, but I was also very nervous. My dress was huge and I didn t know what to expect while I was in the water. I had no idea what a cenote was. But I was also curious to see what Matt had in store for me. He ran a bunch of ideas past me and so I was eager to find out how the day was going to go.'
p753
aS'This day was very emotional. At the end of the day I felt so accomplished and I felt more alive than I have ever felt since May 1st. I really felt that Johnny was smiling down at me and finally giving me closure that I can live my life in a positive way, but never forgetting why I was here. I want to move on and explore the world. I want to meet people who I can share that with. After the shoot I felt like all this was possible.'
p754
aS'If I could reach out to anyone suffering from a loss, I would tell them this. Listen to YOUR heart! You are the most important person and only YOU can help yourself. What I experienced isn t for everyone but I do want people to know that you are not alone in all this, if you have family that ask if they can help SAY YES! You are grieving and you need this time to really think about what you are going to do next. You have the right to cry and you have the right to be alone (but not too much alone) If you are close to family or friends lean on them. Also, try something new! When I did this photo shoot I had the best time I actually had fun for the 1st time in 3 month since Johnny passed away. Reach out for help and never apologize for your actions because you are strong and you will get through this!'
p755
aS'Photography: Del Sol Photography | Hair & Makeup: Sara Tamargo | Hotel: Dreams Resorts'
p756
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p757
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p758
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p759
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p760
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p761
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p762
aS'A ...'
p763
aS'When ...'
p764
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p765
asa(dp766
g2
(dp767
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/11/25/italian-farm-wedding-inspiration/'
p768
sg20
(dp769
g22
(lp770
S'elegance'
p771
asg25
(lp772
S'summer'
p773
asg28
(lp774
S'coral'
p775
aS'light-blue'
p776
aS'light-pink'
p777
aS'pink'
p778
asg33
(lp779
S'garden-venue'
p780
assg36
(lp781
S'I ve been Googling Italian countryside escapes for the past hour all because of this stunning shoot. From the overflowing florals to the scrumptious sweets, I ve just about passed out from pure glee, all thanks to the talents of Ricevere Constile and the magic eye of 2 Brides Photography. Until I regain my composure, I ll be swooning over every little leaf, petal and treat in the full gallery here.'
p782
aS'From Ricevere Constile  This is the way we love it and we do it! It s all about atmosphere. Italian style means a chic, easy and romantic wedding. It means unforgettable food, awesome landscapes, stunning nature, precious materials, handmade and tailored details. It means smiles and love, simple things that become wonderful. This is our concept of  a perfect wedding.  True Italian style.\n'
p783
aS'Photography: Isabelle Hesselberg / 2 Brides Photography | Event Design: Ricevere Constile | Floral Design: Officina Dei Fiori | Invitations: Calligraphando | Desserts And Cake: Le Cose Buone | Film Lab: Carmencita Film Lab | Ribbons: Silk And Willow | Tulle Skirt: Vlab Store | Vintage Rental: Chiara Antiques | Wedding Venue: I Giardini Di Ararat'
p784
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p785
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p786
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p787
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p788
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p789
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p790
aS'A ...'
p791
aS'When ...'
p792
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p793
asa(dp794
g2
(dp795
S'Wedding Dress'
p796
S'Vera Wang'
p797
sS'Catering'
p798
S'Marrou'
p799
sS'Photography'
p800
S"O'Malley Photographers"
p801
sS'Venue'
p802
S'Domaine Des Grottes'
p803
sS'Floral Design'
p804
S'Laetitia C'
p805
sS'Hair'
p806
S'Gerard Coiffure'
p807
sS'Event Design'
p808
S'Lavender And Rose'
p809
sS'Make-up'
p810
S'Laury Guglielmetti'
p811
sS'Cake'
p812
S'Pamela Brown'
p813
sS'Invitations'
p814
S'Louise Richardson'
p815
sS'Event Planning'
p816
S'Lavender And Rose'
p817
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/11/24/elegant-outdoor-provence-wedding/'
p818
sg20
(dp819
g22
(lp820
S'destination'
p821
asg25
(lp822
S'summer'
p823
asg28
(lp824
S'blush'
p825
aS'light-blue'
p826
aS'peach'
p827
asg33
(lp828
S'estate'
p829
assg36
(lp830
S'Whenever my newly engaged friends come seeking advice, I tell them all the same thing   consider a destination wedding. One, they re beautiful. Two, we all get to travel to someplace utterly fabulous (South of France, anyone?) And three, because you ve got amazing vendors like Lavender And Rose and Laetitia C on location and others like O Malley Photographers willing to travel right with you. It s sort of a win-win-win situation, and you can see more pretty evidence sitting here.'
p831
aS'From O Malley Photographers We have a gorgeous and intimate destination wedding here to share with you! Taken by the gorgeous scenery and surroundings, this couple opted for a stylish, but rustic destination wedding in the south of France. Domaine des Grottes, the hundreds of years old estate, beautifully restored and turned into an idyllic wedding venue in Provence provided the picture perfect back-drop. Guests gathered together at a nearby catholic church to witness the bride and groom say their vows and afterward enjoyed cocktails, live jazz and dinner on the estate. The bride and groom chose to hire Lavender and Rose to plan and design their destination event without flaw. With beautiful furniture, old-world elegance and sweeping views across the rolling foot hills and olive groves, this truly was a dream destination wedding.'
p832
aS'From The Bride We wanted to get married in Provence. We visited a lot of venues, and we really fell in love with this place the first time we went there. It had everything we wanted, the house itself was beautiful, very well decorated, with enough rooms to allow our families to stay with us. The surroundings with the vineyards and olive fields are magical. They have a very beautiful pool with old stone arcades, where we imagined the reception taking place. It was the perfect mix between the Provence authenticity and modernity we were after. Also, the owner was lovely and really helpful. We rented the whole domaine for 3 days and it felt like home.'
p833
aS'We wanted an elegant and  modern  wedding, but as we were in Provence we wanted to incorporate some elements of it in the decor. For example, our stationery was not very traditional but yet very chic, and we used pictures of the domaine, region and images of flowers from the area in it. Our graphic designer thought we should use the idea of travel and designed a series of bespoke little stamps that incorporated some of our styling ideas. We also used names of flowers you can find in the area (lavender, rose, mimosa etc) as table names and Louise created stamps with the name of each flower that we used on our table holders. The RSVP was a postcard as well.'
p834
aS'For the tablescapes we wanted something chic and modern, that s why we chose crystal chairs with grey tablecloth and very neat and structured ceterpieces of peonies, roses and hydrangeas. Our wedding planners and the graphic designer who designed our stationery helped us to achieve what we wanted.'
p835
aS'The color scheme was navy blue, dove grey, blush pink, and peach. We had blue envelopes, pink and grey invitations. The flowers were pink and peach and the tablecloth and napkins were pink and grey. The flower girls and page boys were also in navy blue and blush pink. Even the church was pink! The source of inspiration was the place itself which was an old postal station/ coaching inn from the 18th century.'
p836
aS'Definitely hire a good wedding planner from the area. It is very difficult to find good service providers, caterers, flowers, etc when you are not from there and also you need someone on-site that coordonates everything, the deliveries, the settings etc. I would also send save-the-dates and invitations far in advance to make sure people can book their flights, hotels etc. Our wedding planners also created a website that was very useful for all the guests who travelled to the south of France.\n'
p837
asa(dp838
g2
(dp839
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/11/24/elegant-english-garden-wedding/'
p840
sg20
(dp841
g22
(lp842
S'elegance'
p843
asg25
(lp844
S'summer'
p845
asg28
(lp846
S'blush'
p847
aS'light-pink'
p848
aS'navy'
p849
asg33
(lp850
S'garden'
p851
assg36
(lp852
S'I m not sure what is more romantic than an elegant wedding within an English garden. From the blushing bride and beautiful florals, to one dapper groom, this wedding feels like a fairy tale. Taylor Barnes Photography worked her magic and the joy and love of this day can be seen on each and every one of her stunning photos. '
p853
aS"Photography: Taylor Barnes Photography | Wedding Dress: Maggie Sottero | Bridesmaids' Dresses: Dessy | Groom's Attire: Austin Reed  | Wedding Venue: Larmer Tree Gardens"
p854
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p855
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p856
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p857
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p858
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p859
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p860
aS'A ...'
p861
aS'When ...'
p862
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p863
asa(dp864
g2
(dp865
S'Guest Gift Bags'
p866
S'The Dazzling Details'
p867
sS'Rings'
p868
S'Boscus Designs'
p869
sS'Catering'
p870
S'Plush Catering & Events'
p871
sS"Groomsmen's Attire"
p872
S'Boscus Designs'
p873
sS'Floral Design'
p874
S'The Dazzling Details'
p875
sS'Reception Venue'
p876
S'Villa Romance'
p877
sS'Photography'
p878
S'Figlewicz Photographer'
p879
sS'Event Planning'
p880
S' The Dazzling Details'
p881
sS'Invitations'
p882
S'Designers Fine Press'
p883
sS"Groom's Attire"
p884
S'Evolution Of Style'
p885
sS'DJ & Dance Floor Rental'
p886
S'Sonido Extassis'
p887
sS"Bridesmaids' Dresses"
p888
S'Kirstie Kelly Couture'
p889
sS'Ceremony Venue'
p890
S'Villa Romance'
p891
sS'Cake'
p892
S'Charme Reposteria'
p893
sS'Accomodations'
p894
S'Villa La Estancia'
p895
sS'Ceremony Officiate'
p896
S'Michael Shannon (Father Of The Groom)'
p897
sS'10 Piece Mariachi'
p898
S'Los Aventuras'
p899
sS'Wedding Dress'
p900
S'Reem Acra'
p901
sS'Late Night Tacos'
p902
S'Tacos Saguayo'
p903
sS"Bride's Shoes"
p904
S'Steve Madden'
p905
sS"Groom's Shoes"
p906
S' Sperry Top Siders'
p907
sS'Hair & Makeup'
p908
S'Sebastian Salon'
p909
sS'Coordination'
p910
S'The Dazzling Details'
p911
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/11/24/elegant-puerto-vallarta-beach-wedding/'
p912
sg20
(dp913
g22
(lp914
S'elegant'
p915
asg25
(lp916
S'spring'
p917
asg28
(lp918
S'khaki'
p919
aS'mint-2'
p920
asg33
(lp921
S'villa'
p922
assg36
(lp923
S'Having attended destination I do s in this lovely locale, I can confidently say that Puerto Vallarta is a stunning spot to tie the knot. From the always perfect temps to the soft carpet of sand under your feet and the gorgeous venues like this one, Villa Romance, where The Dazzling Details planned this beach fete to perfection. Captured by Figlewicz Photographer, this tropical gallery is worth a little Monday morning escape!'
p924
aS'From Figlewicz Photographer We first met Jessie and Sean on the beach at Terranea to photograph them getting engaged. I know I have said this before, but we LOVE shooting proposals! We LOVE being there for that first moment. We LOVE hiding in the bushes and we LOVE that look the girl gives her man! It s so candid and real. By the time the wedding rolls around we feel very connected to their story. Sean and Jessie are so special to us! They are a beautiful couple and they love each other so much. We were thrilled when they asked us to fly to Puerto Vallarta for their wedding. We went a few days before the wedding and we had a blast. We got to know everyone and enjoyed watching this family love each other.'
p925
aS'They chose Villa Romance for their wedding venue. All their guests were so excited to finally see this secret location. It was perfect  private beach covered in shells, aqua pool, and a fantastic view! Everyone was in heaven! Jessie is a nanny and all her kids flew down to be in the wedding. The whole team from Dazzling Details did an amazing job at making all the kids feel very welcome. They even had a playhouse filled with toys!\n'
p926
asa(dp927
g2
(dp928
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/11/20/irish-spring-wedding-at-doonbeg-lodge/'
p929
sg20
(dp930
g22
(lp931
S'elegance'
p932
asg25
(lp933
S'spring'
p934
asg28
(lp935
S'green'
p936
aS'navy'
p937
aS'pink'
p938
asg33
(lp939
S'lodge'
p940
assg36
(lp941
S'With rolling green hills as its backdrop, this wedding is the definition of natural beauty. Ireland has been on my list of places to visit for awhile but after soaking up these sights by Elisha Clarke, I m bumping it up to take the lead spot on that wanderlust list. But until that day comes, let s get lost in every one of these pretty photos right this way.'
p942
aS"Photography: Elisha Clarke Photography | Wedding Coordinator: Sylvia Wallnutt | Floral Design: The Informal Florist | Wedding Dress: Paloma Blanca | Cake: Cloudberry Bakery | Bride's Shoes: Badgley Mischka | Bridesmaids' Dresses: J Crew | Band: The Bentley Boys | Groom's Attire: Banana Republic | Hair And Makeup Artist: UpStyle Junkie | Officiant : Dara Molloy | Venue: Doonbeg Lodge"
p943
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p944
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p945
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p946
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p947
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p948
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p949
aS'A ...'
p950
aS'When ...'
p951
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p952
asa(dp953
g2
(dp954
S'Wedding Dress'
p955
S'Celestina Agostino'
p956
sS'Calligraphy & Paper Goods'
p957
S'Studio French Blue'
p958
sS'Photography'
p959
S'Marion Heurteboust'
p960
sS'Floral Design'
p961
S'Laetitia C.'
p962
sS'DJ, Lighting & Sound'
p963
S'Daniel MC'
p964
sS'Reception'
p965
S'Ch teau Grimaldi'
p966
sS'Cake'
p967
S'Made In Cake'
p968
sS'Catering'
p969
S'Marrou Traiteur'
p970
sS'Event Planning'
p971
S'Fete In France'
p972
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/11/19/romantic-villa-wedding-in-provence/'
p973
sg20
(dp974
g22
(lp975
S'elegant'
p976
asg25
(lp977
S'spring'
p978
asg28
(lp979
S'cornflower'
p980
aS'light-blue'
p981
aS'light-green'
p982
aS'navy'
p983
asg33
(lp984
S'villa'
p985
assg36
(lp986
S'Love united a global guestbook at Ch teau Grimaldi for an elegant celebration planned by Fete In France. Filled with subtle nods the couples  Franco-American heritage and shared love of sailing with soft blue Laetitia C. sheaf bouquets, there is no doubt the images from Marion Heurteboust will be a family heirloom for generations to come.'
p987
aS'From F te In France Nicole and Jerome celebrated their wedding in elegant proven al style in a villa near Aix-en-Provence. The Franco-American couple   Nicole is American and Jerome is French   welcomed family and friends from the US and France, as well as Sweden, China, Spain, South Africa, Italy, Romania, Australia amongst other countries!'
p988
aS'The couple shares a love of sailing, and it was this common interest that brought them together and helped give direction to the color theme. The palette of blues, greys and grey-greens fit perfectly in the setting of the historic villa where they held the reception.'
p989
aS'After a traditional blessing at the local church, wedding guests were treated to a cocktail hour on the villa s terrace overlooking the Mont Sainte Victoire. Guests were then invited to see the amazing transformation of the villa s chapel into an elegant reception room.'
p990
aS'There are so many things we loved about this wedding   the bride s romantic lace dress, her vintage-inspired arm sheaf bouquet, the groom s natty 3-piece suit   but our favorite detail was the lovely surprise the bridesmaids planned for the couple. Pre-addressed cards and postcards were set out so that guests could write a note to the couple. The bridesmaids take care of sending out the cards throughout the year so the bride & groom will receive notes reminding them of their special day!\n'
p991
asa(dp992
g2
(dp993
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/11/18/romantic-castle-wedding-in-scotland/'
p994
sg20
(dp995
g22
(lp996
S'elegance'
p997
asg25
(lp998
S'summer'
p999
asg28
(lp1000
S'blush'
p1001
aS'cream'
p1002
aS'green'
p1003
aS'light-pink'
p1004
aS'red'
p1005
asg33
(lp1006
S'castle'
p1007
assg36
(lp1008
S'To say that I m obsessed with this wedding captured by Craig & Eva Sanders is an understatement. Straight out of a fairytale, everything from the immense beauty of Murthly Castle to the relaxed blooms by Coach House Flowers and everything in between  is enchanting beyond words and looks like the perfect storybook romance. Dive in here!'
p1009
aS'From The Bride Alex and I met at a party of mutual friends when I was celebrating my last exam from university. We got engaged four and a half years later on Christmas Eve on Store Beach in Sydney, when we were on holiday visiting Alex s brother and sister who both lived there at that time. We were engaged for a year and a half before our wedding day, so we had plenty of time to plan all the details!'
p1010
aS'The most important thing for us was having all of our family and friends around us, which is why we chose to get married in Scotland where we both grew up. We wanted to create a relaxing and fun day for everyone closest to us. We loved the fact that we could have the ceremony and reception at the same venue, and that we could add our own touches by having a marquee.'
p1011
aS'The weather in Scotland can be very unpredictable, so we planned for the worst case scenario. We had organized umbrellas for all of our guests, but were delighted that the sun shined all day!'
p1012
aS'I loved walking down the aisle and seeing Alex s face for the first time. We were very lucky to have our very good friend s Dad officiate our wedding ceremony, who made the service very personal and special for us both. The chapel was very small, so it created a very close and intimate atmosphere for all our guests. We rented a lodge for the entire wedding party for four nights. I loved that the wedding was not just limited to one day, but that the celebrations just kept on going!'
p1013
aS'The bridesmaids dresses were the most stressful part of the wedding! I originally ordered dresses online, which were delivered late and the sizings were all wrong! Three weeks before the wedding, I was left with the small task of finding new dresses for five bridesmaids! My bridesmaids were amazing and we all scoured the internet to see what we could buy on the high street. As I had five bridesmaids, I liked the idea of mismatched dresses that suited everyone s size and style.'
p1014
aS'I decided not to follow a particular theme for the wedding flowers, but wanted a relaxed summer bouquet with soft colors. The florists captured what we wanted perfectly and I loved the bouquets next to the bridesmaids  dresses.We didn t go for a table centerpiece, but instead we had a random mixture of jars and vases of different sizes, with soft summer flowers. I was quite relaxed about the flowers, as I knew that they didn t need to specifically match anything.'
p1015
aS'We decided that we didn t want a traditional wedding cake, as so often people are full by the time the cake gets served. We decided that a cake table would be a great way to use the wedding cake as part of the wedding breakfast whilst giving everyone a selection of cakes to choose from. We are friends with Linsey Reith from Three Sisters Bake, a gorgeous caf  and craft boutique in the West of Scotland whose cakes are fabulous, so it was really easy to organize and completely stress free.'
p1016
aS'Our friends very kindly lent us their homemade bunting so we decorated the marquee with that and also with pompoms that I had bought on the internet. My brother-in-law was put through sweatshop like conditions by my sister and made the wooden structures for the ribbon and confetti stands, and also all the signs that we had around the venue. We were so touched by the distance people had travelled to join us on our wedding day, so decided to put all of the destinations that people have travelled from and the number of miles to their destination on the signs. We were lucky enough that one of our guests is a very talented artist so she painted the signs the day before the wedding!'
p1017
aS'We set up our own photo booth with costumes and wigs that my friends and I had in our fancy dress boxes. My favorite was the Hawaiian skirt and leis which looked great on the boys! We bought a polaroid camera because we thought it would be fun for people to see the photos instantly. We had a BBQ the next day and it was fun looking through all the photos and outfits with our guests!'
p1018
aS'A tip for all future brides is don t sweat the small stuff! Enjoy the planning and do not let yourself get stressed over the details. The most important thing is your love for one another, and it is your love that will create a perfect wedding that everyone remembers.\n'
p1019
aS'Photography: Craig & Eva Sanders | Videographer: Barry Meek At Adore Weddings | Flowers: Coach House Flowers | Wedding Dress: Liliana Dabic, La Novia | Cake: Three Sisters Bake | Rings: Christine Sadler | Make-up: Molly Sheridan | Hair: Hair Creations By Anna Wade | Castle: Murthly Castle'
p1020
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p1021
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p1022
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p1023
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p1024
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p1025
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p1026
aS'A ...'
p1027
aS'When ...'
p1028
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p1029
asa(dp1030
g2
(dp1031
S'Coordination &  Event Design'
p1032
S'Moana Events'
p1033
sS'DJ'
p1034
S'Kustom Sounds Kauai'
p1035
sS'Hair & Makeup Artists '
p1036
S'Mia Moriguchi'
p1037
sS'Reception Venue'
p1038
S' Na Aina Kai Botanical Gardens'
p1039
sS'Photography'
p1040
S'Sea Light Studios '
p1041
sS'Henna Artistry'
p1042
S'KM Henna Artistry'
p1043
sS'Catering'
p1044
S'Contemporary Flavors'
p1045
sS'Entertainment '
p1046
S'Urahutia Productions '
p1047
sS'Videography '
p1048
S'Zest Kauai Videography'
p1049
sS'Ceremony Venue'
p1050
S'Private Beach, Kauai'
p1051
sS'Floral Design'
p1052
S'Martin Roberts Design'
p1053
sS'Tent Rental '
p1054
S'Kauai Tent '
p1055
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/11/17/intimate-kauai-wedding/'
p1056
sg20
(dp1057
g22
(lp1058
S'elegance'
p1059
asg25
(lp1060
S'spring'
p1061
asg28
(lp1062
S'blush'
p1063
aS'ivory'
p1064
aS'peach'
p1065
asg33
(lp1066
S'beach'
p1067
aS'botanical-garden'
p1068
assg36
(lp1069
S'Every time a Kauai wedding makes it s way across my desk, my heart skips a beat. Maybe it s because my fianc  and I are scouting the area for our honeymoon, maybe it s the breathtaking beaches or maybe it s because they re gorgeously orchestrated by a fabulous team of vendors like this one from Moana Events and Sea Light Studios. Either way, getting lost in the gallery is an easy fete.'
p1070
aS'From the beautiful Bride Given our courtship, which spanned years and continents, our wedding could be anything but typical. From the day we got engaged, we were torn between eloping and having a stereotypically grandiose Indian ceremony, between having something local and accessible rather than something remote and intimate   these are, of course, decisions we never had to make in full, instead indulging ourselves with our favorite parts of each.  We settled on Kauai for our reception because, despite our constantly connected careers and lives, we wanted somewhere completely cut off from technology. Somewhere you don t really need GPS because there s only one road, and where you aren t worried about your bandwidth affecting Netflix streaming quality because you can hardly stay indoors. With endless beaches surrounding lush tropical forests, Kauai seemed like the most remote yet visually rich landscape within several thousand miles of home. It also incorporated my husband s love of the outdoors as well as the preternatural comfort I take in flora and natural beauty.'
p1071
aS'In Dallas, we wanted to make sure to incorporate all the things we couldn t bring with us to Kauai   in addition to bridal mendhi from my sister-in-law Kiran Meghani of KM Henna Artistry, we had the nikkah ceremony in our local mosque (where we coincidentally met for the first time fifteen years earlier), and celebrated both events with some authentic, spicy indian cuisine. We were told to prepare for some interesting and unpredictable weather in Kauai, supposedly the wettest island, but nothing could have prepared us for snow and freezing rain in Dallas   it certainly made us feel loved that our guests braved that weather to celebrate with us.  Once we escaped the Texas frost to sunny Kauai, we were in the able hands of our wedding planner, Morgan Childs, of Moana Events. She really helped us articulate a vision that brought together our eclectic styles and taste into something truly one-of-a-kind. The residence at Na Aina Kai s botanical gardens proved to be the perfect backdrop for our welcome dinner, providing ample space for Bollywood dancing and East African barbecue.  Despite ample rain the entire week, the clouds parted at 3pm, giving way to the sun just minutes before our afternoon ceremony. The style and decor provided by Martin Roberts, in the elegant tent from Kauai tents, were beyond compare   capturing every aesthetic we had both imagined. The dancing and festivities were broken up by an incredible dinner from Contemporary Flavors as well as breathtaking Tahitian and Fire Knife dance performances from Urahutia Productions.  After the wedding, the things we remember fondest are the things that went against plan   the rain, the mud, the groom losing his ring (don t ask). We can scarcely remember the sublime, captivating moments and scenes that Fawne and Sebastian of Sea Light Studios captured so perfectly. Every detail from place settings to floral arrangements to beverage stations reflected our vision perfectly, and the time Morgan took to really understand us before executing really made a difference   the entire affair was perfectly reflective of us.  We re now left with a special attachment to Kauai unlike any other place, as this remote tropical paradise, for one weekend, became  ours    and thanks to the memories, it will forever remain that way.\n'
p1072
asa(dp1073
g2
(dp1074
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/11/17/romantic-south-african-wedding-at-rockhaven-farm/'
p1075
sg20
(dp1076
g22
(lp1077
S'rustic'
p1078
asg25
(lp1079
S'summer'
p1080
asg28
(lp1081
S'gray'
p1082
aS'pink'
p1083
aS'turquoise'
p1084
asg33
(lp1085
S'farm-3'
p1086
assg36
(lp1087
S'I am obsessively in love with this wedding dress. My crush on Jenny Packham has no limit. Sequins, sparkle and the most beautiful billowing tulle is the icing on the cake of this absolutely breathtaking South African wedding. Tasha Seccombe and Boy Meets Girl Cinema transports us away to what can only be described as a dreamland and that is where I ll remain for the rest of the day.'
p1088
aS'From The Bride  From the beginning we kept using the words: relaxed, fun, personal and something a little bit different to describe what type of wedding we wanted. I know that as far as weddings go this is probably a bit of a clich  but as we had decided to invite 40 of our closest family and friends to join us in South Africa from our London base, I thought we, at least, had a good starting point.'
p1089
aS'Originally from South Africa, I moved over to the UK to go to university and met my husband, Nick during the first few weeks. We instantly became known as  Nick and Nic  and after 10 years together, we were a few weeks away for our wedding day. Despite London being my permanent home, I had always known that when I got married I wanted to do it back in South Africa and luckily Nick loves the place as much as I do and shared my sentiments.'
p1090
aS'We chose a place just outside of Cape Town in a little town called Elgin. The area is surrounded by apple and pear farms with the most idyllic scenery. Deciding on a venue was surprisingly one of the easier decisions we made as we both knew that we weren t going to be able to go and do the traditional  recce  of venues that most couples do, so we relied on feedback and lots of photos on blogs and photographers websites. As soon as we saw Rockhaven, we knew this was our place. Its a working farm that caters to weddings with a simple modern-ish barn, gorgeous gardens with views of the valley, and the most charming little  boathouse  overlooking a lake which is where we held the ceremony. With a setting so beautiful I decided I only wanted to enhance it with a soft romantic colour palette of sage, grey, cream and pinks and bring together elements of both South Africa and England.'
p1091
aS'I, of course discovered a love of Pinterest and wedding blogs like Style Me Pretty which were incredibly useful for giving me amazing inspiration but also very overwhelming   there are just so many ideas out there! We did have a brilliant wedding planner in South Africa who I would share all my ideas with via Dropbox. One of the hardest things about getting married abroad is that you can t do much DIY so instead I decided to focus on doing a few things really well and make our wedding as personal as possible. My sister and her boyfriend, who are both architects, helped to design and make all our stationery. '
p1092
aS'I love flowers but hadn t thought that we would be able to afford loads however one of the perks of getting married abroad is that it was a lot more budget conscious and as both our ceremony and reception were held in the same location we were able to move and easily re-use the flowers throughout the day. Our florist was incredible and took my inspiration pictures and put her own creative twist on it and created something breath-taking. A combination of roses, lisianthus, dahlias and hydrangeas combined with Proteas (South Africa s national flower), fynbos, Queens lace and ferns emphasised the English country garden feel. '
p1093
aS'When it came to my dress I d never known exactly what type I wanted   in fact I could tell you all the things I didn t want but not what I liked. Being only 5 2  I knew that I couldn t pull off a frothy gown and with the South African summer I wanted something light and travel friendly. I tried on several different style dresses but kept coming back to this beautiful tulle Jenny Packham dress with fluted sleeves and lots of tiny sequins and paillettes with the smallest of trains. I didn t have any sort of emotional connection to the dress but just kept being drawn back to it   it was so comfortable and flattering and could see myself spending the whole day in it. I borrowed a pair of diamond earrings from my mom and wore a simple pendant necklace that Nick gave me the day before.'
p1094
aS'For Nick, I wanted him to have an equally special suit for the day. Normally weddings in England are the traditional 3 piece suit and tails but this was not going to suit the very warm climate nor the style of our wedding. Luckily my parents live in Dubai so we had the luxury of very good tailors and souks where you can get quality fabric and tailoring at a fraction of the price. After many back and forth photos, phone calls, emails and using internet guides of  how to measure for a suit  with my mom   she delivered everything to the tailor and we waited with bated breath. When I saw Nick in his 3 piece suit in pale grey with a dark grey paisley lining I couldn t believe how dashing he looked and we were even able to personalise the suit with our wedding date embroidered in.'
p1095
aS'We couldn t afford to stretch our budget for a live band for the reception (in the end our DJ was amazing and almost no-one left the dance floor except for when my cricket mad husband and his friends organised an impromptu game at about 11pm!) but did still want some live music. We ended up with a classical duo during the ceremony and an incredible jazz duo during the pre-reception who kept our guests entertained while we were off having some photos. We also got our guests to give us their song choices which we gave to the DJ proving for an amazing party   which eventually only ended at 2:30am in the morning!'
p1096
aS'We knew that we wanted our wedding to be a big party to celebrate our 10 years together. This started with a barbeque on the Friday evening at a local restaurant, the day before the wedding and culminated with a picnic on a wine estate on the Sunday   for most it started the previous week when our guests flew in and we rented a villa near the beach in Cape Town.'
p1097
aS' We couldn t have asked for our wedding to be more of a celebration of everything we have together surrounded by our friends and family   you couldn t wipe the smile off of our faces for weeks afterwards.\n'
p1098
aS"Photography: Tasha Seccombe  | Videographer: Boy Meets Girl Cinema | Flowers: Paradiso Flowers | Wedding Dress: Jenny Packham At Morgan Davies Bridal | Stationery: Family | Brides Shoes: Zara | Bridesmaids Dresses: J Crew | Catering: Rockhaven Farm | Lighting: 4 Every Event | DJ: Capricorn Music | Groom's Attire: Lobos Tailors, Dubai | Groomsmen's Attire: Reiss | Ceremony Music: Play | Bridal Jewellery: Borrowed From Mom | Cake And Desserts: Nelle Cakes | Coordination: Creation Events | Decor Hire: Blooming Wonderful | Farm: Rockhaven  | Groom And Groomsmen Ties: Bows And Ties | Hair & Make-up: Candice Leigh Arnott | Pre-reception Music: Gary Deacon"
p1099
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p1100
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p1101
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p1102
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p1103
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p1104
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p1105
aS'A ...'
p1106
aS'When ...'
p1107
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p1108
asa(dp1109
g2
(dp1110
S'Wedding'
p1111
S'Chateau D estoublon'
p1112
sS'Videographer'
p1113
S'Shark Pig'
p1114
sS'Getting Ready/bbq/brunch'
p1115
S'Le Hameau Des Baux'
p1116
sS'Photography'
p1117
S'Marianne Taylor Photography'
p1118
sS'Makeup'
p1119
S'Camille Bonardi'
p1120
sS'Singer'
p1121
S'Lizzy Parks'
p1122
sS'Hair'
p1123
S'Ahmet Ozismen'
p1124
sS'Stationery'
p1125
S'Cr me De Papier'
p1126
sS'Caterer'
p1127
S'Marrou'
p1128
sS'Florist'
p1129
S'Laetitia C.'
p1130
sS'Wedding Gown'
p1131
S'Monique Lhuillier - Harper Gown'
p1132
sS'Event Planning'
p1133
S'Lavender And Rose'
p1134
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/11/14/summer-chateau-south-of-france-wedding/'
p1135
sg20
(dp1136
g22
(lp1137
S'elegant'
p1138
asg25
(lp1139
S'summer'
p1140
asg28
(lp1141
S'lavender'
p1142
aS'light-blue'
p1143
aS'peach'
p1144
asg33
(lp1145
S'chateau'
p1146
assg36
(lp1147
S'Close your eyes and imagine a wedding tucked away in the quiet French countryside. A day filled with shades of blush, lavender and peach, and stunning chateau views everywhere you look. It s everything you ll find in this summertime affair with planning by Lavender & Rose and florals from Laetitia C. They brought the dream to life, but it s only the beginning. Find all that plus the Welcome BBQ and Farewell Brunch in the gallery from Marianne Taylor.'
p1148
aS'From Marianne Taylor Photography Alev & Can s incredible wedding weekend took place in the South of France and consisted of three events on three separate days, a welcome barbeque, the wedding day itself, and a farewell brunch the day after. Each day was filled with beauty and joy, and it was a huge privilege to get to document it all.'
p1149
aS'From The Bride One of my high school friends who knows Can from his time at Upenn University invited Can to a party in my house. I answered the door and there he was standing in front of me, it was love at first sight. After the day we met, we kept seeing each other for 2 weeks in group meetings before he asked for a date. Can proposed to me at his house, he decorated his whole house with our pictures, flowers and candles, it was very personal and romantic.'
p1150
aS'We wanted to have a personal, small wedding so we decided to do a destination wedding and started looking online, where we stumbled upon Lavender and Rose Weddings website, we hit it off very well with Kerry immediately. The previous May we wanted to go for a venue search and Kerry arranged an engagement shoot for us in Chateau D estoublon, which we fell in love immediately, the place was magnificent, romantic and very dreamy, we knew that our wedding will be there right at that moment.'
p1151
aS'The Chateau D estoublon has their own vineyards and olive gardens so we served our guest the vine and olive oil from the Chateau during our reception; we also had them as a souvenir in their welcome bags. The scenery of the Chateau was magical, our ceremony was right under the main stairs, I came down the stairs with my father from one side while Can was going down with his mother from the other side of the stairs. Two of our closest friends did a symbolic ceremony in Turkish, English and German as we had guests from Holland, Canada, India and Austria.'
p1152
aS'We wanted to have a simple yet elegant wedding with lots of French details. I myself am very obsessed with detail and Kerry was very helpful with creating all our ideas. We decided to use many chandeliers and candles to create even a more romantic atmosphere.'
p1153
aS'During our cocktail we wanted to serve our signature drinks, for my drink we created lavender champagne with real lavenders in them and Can s favorite drinks was Hendricks Mule served elegantly. We had a Whiskey & Cigar bar for the gentlemen to enjoy for the whole evening. Instead of opting for a classic wedding cake we decided to have a Macaron pyramid, our dessert buffet was stunning, filled with more than 10 types of mini French desserts.'
p1154
aS'Kerry, our wedding planner, from Lavender and Rose helped us pick our florist and caterers, which ended up dreamier than what we had hoped for. For our stationery we worked with Cereme de Papier, recommend by Kerry, we wanted to have a theme altogether that was cute and romantic at the same time.'
p1155
aS'We were very detail oriented and bought many different detailed items such as personalized matches, napkins, candies etc from Toronto, NY, LA and Istanbul. We collected different items from all over the world through out a year to create the personalized and special wedding that we dreamed of. Our guests loved the Photobooth from Alban Pichon, at first they were a little shy but when the evening continued the pictures seemed to get even funnier. Our DJ, Thomas Colinet, was a huge success, the whole wedding party danced until 3 in the morning without even getting tired We had the cutest mini Burgers/Cheese Burgers and Hot dogs for our mid night late snack provided by our caterer which finished in minutes.'
p1156
asa(dp1157
g2
(dp1158
S'Arrival And Cocktail Dress'
p1159
S'Rent The Runway'
p1160
sS'Wedding Dress'
p1161
S'Rent The Runway'
p1162
sS'Jewelry'
p1163
S'Sholdt Design'
p1164
sS'Photography'
p1165
S'Sara Wight'
p1166
sS'Grooms Attire'
p1167
S'Sage Lane'
p1168
sS'Hair And Makeup Styling '
p1169
S'Leah Burris'
p1170
sS'Beverage Styling'
p1171
S'Motu Bar'
p1172
sS'Decor Items'
p1173
S'The Nest'
p1174
sS'Brides Robe'
p1175
S'Plum Pretty Sugar'
p1176
sS'Bikini'
p1177
S'Ranifly'
p1178
sS'Design'
p1179
S'Island Style Weddings'
p1180
sS'Private Island'
p1181
S'Great St James'
p1182
sS'Headpiece And Veil'
p1183
S'Hushed Commotion'
p1184
sS'Cake'
p1185
S'Queen Of Tarts'
p1186
sS'Sunset Sail'
p1187
S'Virgin Magic Charters'
p1188
sS'Floral Design'
p1189
S'Roses Too Flowers'
p1190
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/11/14/tropical-st-james-weddingmoon-inspiration/'
p1191
sg20
(dp1192
g22
(lp1193
S'casual-elegance'
p1194
asg25
(lp1195
S'summer'
p1196
asg28
(lp1197
S'lavender'
p1198
aS'light-yellow'
p1199
aS'purple'
p1200
asg33
(lp1201
S'beach'
p1202
assg36
(lp1203
S'Happy Friday, SMPers! Around these parts, sprinkles of snow and wintry cold weather is the norm this time of year, but that doesn t mean we don t like to dream of sand between our toes and a soft ocean breeze. So when a bit of tropical goodness comes our way in the form of this lovely little shoot from Island Style Weddings, you won t hear us complaining. And for those of you considering a weddingmoon? You might want to spend some extra time cozying up to the gallery from Sara Wight!'
p1204
aS'From Island Style Weddings Leah and I toured Great St James, a privately owned island between St Thomas and St John, US Virgin Island as a future wedding and vacation venue. Once we stepped on the island, it was clear we had found the perfect location for Island Style Weddings  styled photo shoot.'
p1205
aS'Inspiration came from  Gift from the Sea , by Anne Morrow Lindbergh. I have always loved this book written in 1955 by Charles Lindbergh s widow. Many of my couples have incorporated passages from the book for their wedding ceremonies. Mrs. Lindbergh s love of the ocean is complimented with her poetic insight into relationships of all kinds.'
p1206
aS'The story begins with a couple traveling to Great St James to begin a new life together on their weddingmoon. Escaping from the rushed world left behind, our couple rediscover the beauty of simplicity and each other. The island s 164 acres provided space for exploration, playfulness, relaxation and romance.'
p1207
aS'Our vision was to enhance the rustic nature of the island, without distraction from the natural beauty that surrounded us. The soft colors of mint and sea foam in the dresses looked gorgeous against the natural colors of the surrounding sand and crystal waters. Accents of purple flowers in all shades helped bring vibrancy to the location. Subtle hints of ombr  and various textures helped create the effortless feeling we were after.'
p1208
aS'One of my favorite parts of working on a styled shoot is collaborating with such a talented group of wedding professional. As wedding designers, photographers, stylists, pastry chefs, caterers, florists and mixologists our usual focus is translating our clients visions for their perfect Caribbean celebration. I love to team up with this group to share ideas and allow our creative juices to flow.'
p1209
aS'A huge thank you to Leah of Island Style Weddings, Sara of Sara Wight Photography, Jessica of Roses Too, Liz of Queen of Tarts, MJ of Motu Bar, The gang at Rent the Runway, Thea of Hushed Commotion, Kalee of Sholdt Design, Missy of The Nest St John, Models Grace Bartolucci & Gabriel Stephen, Karl of Virgin Magic Charters, Mike and Crystal Gillich managers of Great St James, Rani of Ranifly Bikinis, Karl of Virgin Magic Charters and of course DD, the Dumpster Diva Dog of Great St James.\n'
p1210
asa(dp1211
g2
(dp1212
S'Entertainment:'
p1213
S'The Bitband'
p1214
sS'Shoes'
p1215
S'Jimmy Choo'
p1216
sS'Photography'
p1217
S'Gianluca Adovasio'
p1218
sS'Venue'
p1219
S'Private Villa'
p1220
sS'Catering'
p1221
S'Infinity Ricevimenti '
p1222
sS'Hair'
p1223
S'Luigi, CLASS Hair And Makeup, Prato'
p1224
sS'Gift List'
p1225
S'Wedding Gifts'
p1226
sS'Make Up'
p1227
S'Elisa, CLASS Hair And Makeup Prato'
p1228
sS'Venue Stylist/planner'
p1229
S'Barbara Cal , Infinity Weddings And Events '
p1230
sS'Cake'
p1231
S' Infinity Ricevimenti '
p1232
sS'Wedding Gown'
p1233
S'Baccini And Hill'
p1234
sS'Suits'
p1235
S'Godwin Charli'
p1236
sS'Floral Design'
p1237
S' Infinity Wedding And Events '
p1238
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/11/13/authentic-italian-villa-le-colline-wedding/'
p1239
sg20
(dp1240
g22
(lp1241
S'elegance'
p1242
asg25
(lp1243
S'summer'
p1244
asg28
(lp1245
S'green'
p1246
aS'navy'
p1247
asg33
(lp1248
S'villa'
p1249
assg36
(lp1250
S'Details? We love  em. But every now and then a wedding full of raw beauty, graceful, quiet moments and authenticity comes along and captures our attention. The kind of wedding that pulls it s energy from the beautiful people, breathtaking scenery and tradition, like this fete planned by Infinity Wedding And Events. From the full-of-anticipation getting ready moments to the Italian-style dinner, you can see the story unfold in Gianluca Adovasio s lovely imagery.'
p1251
aS'From the beautiful Bride We met whilst working together at a bar in Melbourne in 2006. I was working in marketing and Luke was the new bar Manager. He was constantly making excuses to call me for work purposes and one day plucked up the courage to ask me out.'
p1252
aS'After 6 years together, we went out to celebrate Luke finishing his honours degree. He took me to a small family owned Italian restaurant where we had our very first date. He was being very coy and seemed quite nervous (which is unusual as he is never at a loss for words!) and pulled out a gorgeous diamond ring he d had made and popped the question.'
p1253
aS'From very early on in the relationship we knew. We moved in together after dating for 4 months. We just worked well together and knew we would be together.'
p1254
aS'2 years was the length of our engagement   we knew straight away that we wanted to get married in Tuscany which is a place very special to us, having spent much time there for Luke s studies and work. So we wanted to share the beautiful experience with everyone else and give all of our guests enough time to plan an amazing holiday in Italy.'
p1255
aS'We hired a beautiful 17th century villa called Villa Le Colline in Impruneta for the week, in the countryside, 20 minutes outside of Florence, Italy. We held the ceremony in the garden of the villa overlooking the Tuscan hills.'
p1256
aS'We held a symbolic ceremony in the garden with 40 of our closest friends and family. A good friend who had been there since the start of our relationship was our celebrant, which made the experience so much more special to us. I was very nervous before the ceremony, but when I walked out and saw all of our friends and family and Luke standing there, I was excited and surprisingly calm. Luke s sister sang a song for us,  A thousand years  by Chistina Perri. Luke and I both wrote and chose our vows. Luke memorised and recited William Shakespeare s Sonnet 18 to me as part of his vows. It was a beautiful gesture. The view over the countryside was also breathtaking; it was a perfect day.'
p1257
aS'Our reception was also at Villa Le Colline, we had one long table, Italian style just in front of the villa. The villa was the perfect setting, being an old 17th century home, antique oak doors and shuttered windows with flowering wisteria wrapped around the fa ade. To complement the natural beauty of the property, we set up rustic lanterns lining the grounds of the villa and bistro lights intertwined around the large tree in the garden under which we cut our wedding cake.'
p1258
aS'We held aperitivo by the poolside of the villa with a complete spread of beautiful antipasti. For the reception, we had a five piece jazz band who played Frank Sinatra and Al Green and other classics as well as party songs later into the night. Our caterer and wedding planner was Barbara from Infinity weddings and events, who was incredible. The food was a four-course dinner with beautiful simple Italian food, beef carpaccio to start, ravioli with butter and sage, roast suckling pig with roasted peppers and pinenuts for the main and a traditional Italian wedding cake, millefoglie. Our wedding favours (bonbonniere) included little bottles of organic olive oil and limoncello, each tied together with traditional sugared almonds. After dinner, there was an open bar with grappa, brandy and cigars my father had brought for the boys. There was also plenty of prosecco, coffee, vin santo and cantuccini to finish, Tuscan style!'
p1259
aS'We made a trip to Florence a year earlier and visited a number of different venues. When we first saw Villa Le Colline and met the lovely owner, Andrea (villa has been in her family for generations since it was built), we knew immediately this was where we would have our wedding. It was just spectacular, elegant and beautiful. It certainly did not disappoint for our guests either.'
p1260
aS'Gianluca Adovasio was our wedding photographer; Gianluca and his wife Mary, are incredibly talented photographers. I searched high and low for the perfect photographer in Italy and after seeing their work, there was no one else I would rather have had. We had a pre-wedding shoot in Florence the day before the wedding to get to know them better. They are very funny and made us feel at ease. Neither Luke and I particularly like  staged  photos, but their work and photos just blew us away.'
p1261
aS'Wedding colours were ivory, navy, grey and green. The theme was very simple, elegant to fit in with our style, the villa and Tuscan location. We had olive leaves and branches featuring in the table setting and bridal party flowers (how could we not   it was Tuscany and the villa had its own olive grove!). Flowers included sweet peas, hydrangeas, white David Austin roses and blackberries.'
p1262
aS'I spent hours in the lead up to the wedding, looking over wedding shoots, real wedding articles and inspiration for wedding settings, flowers, cakes, hair and makeup and ideas for bridesmaids dresses.'
p1263
aS'We had three bridesmaids and groomsmen each. My bridesmaids were my two best friends and my brother s girlfriend. I spent a long time looking for bridesmaids dresses, but didn t find anything I liked. In the end I found a beautiful picture of a navy Giambattista Valli dress and had a very talented girlfriend who works on big stage productions in Melbourne recreate the dresses. Luke had his best friend as his best man and his two brothers as his groomsmen. We found their suits at Godwin Charli, a locally made tailored suit store in Melbourne.'
p1264
aS'I am very into the details and knew I wanted something with a vintage style. My dress was a made to measure dress called  Kasia  from Baccini and Hill and it was the second dress I tried on. Although I tried on every other wedding dress in Melbourne (I like to be thorough), I kept coming back to this dress. I knew it was the perfect dress for me, I felt so incredibly elegant in it. I Both my mother and Luke s mother saw me try the dress on and were speechless. I had a headpiece custom made out of the same beading from the cap sleeve on my wedding dress. I also found the perfect matching Jimmy Choo sandals to wear.'
p1265
aS'The whole day was so special, from the ceremony to the reception. It surpassed our expectations in every way. Our caterer and wedding planner Barbara from Infinity Wedding and Events  did an exceptional job, the table setting, the flowers, the food, the music was amazing. She helped pull everything together seamlessly and made planning a destination wedding half way across the world an ease. It felt quite surreal and we couldn t have imagined a more perfect setting and location for the wedding. We even had a Noweigian neighbour come to the villa and ask if he could join the party as the music was so good!'
p1266
aS'I also had a lot of fun getting ready during the day in the lead up to the wedding with my girlfriends and I spending the morning together (there were 18 of us staying at the villa). We had a champagne breakfast before getting ready. Our hair and makeup artists were amazing as well. Luigi and Elisa from CLASS hair and makeup in Prato, and their work has included many fashion shows for designers such as Gucci and Prada as well as tv shows like Italian X-Factor. When they had finished with all of us, I think we were all in awe.'
p1267
aS'It was a perfect destination wedding with all of our favourite people there. It was an intimate setting, which meant we got to spend quality time with all of our guests. Everyone was on holiday so we could truly relax and enjoy the experience together. We had also planned a number of activities during the week for everyone, a private winery tour and lunch in the Chianti overlooking the Tuscan hillside, a rehearsal dinner in a Florentine restaurant which was once an old church and a party the day after the wedding at the villa by the pool. The villa had a pizza oven so we organised a special pizza chef to come and cater. Everyone who came had so much fun and said it was the best wedding they had been to. It was just a magical week.'
p1268
aS'Unfortunate event   The week before we left for Italy, Luke s mum broke her ankle severely and needed to have surgery which meant she was unable to fly and couldn t come to the wedding. We were able to skype the wedding and are having a small second wedding at the registry office back in Melbourne, which means she will be able to attend.'
p1269
aS'Funny   Two of our girlfriends composed a special rap, dedicated just for Luke and I   they took over the stage and microphones after dinner with one beatboxing and the other performing the rap. Everyone was in hysterics.'
p1270
aS'Al Green   Let s stay together was our first dance song. We danced to the song in the garden with the sun setting in the background.'
p1271
aS'My advice to other brides is think about the things that are special to you and what you don t want to compromise. i.e. intimate wedding, perfect dress, great food, good band. Get those things right, and then don t sweat the small stuff. Even if things go wrong before the wedding, it all turns out in the end. Also, take the time to stop and enjoy everything, the day will go very quickly. Pre and post wedding events are a great way to spend extra time with your loved friends and family.'
p1272
aS'Seeing as we were in Europe, we went on to London for a week for our honeymoon (Luke was presenting at a conference in Leeds) and then onto Crete in the Greek Islands. We stayed at the Blue Palace which is a Starwood luxury collection hotel. We had a honeymoon suite with a private infinity pool. Life could not have been much better, it was amazingly relaxing and just what we wanted. Absolutely recommend it to anyone else and would go back in a heart beat.\n'
p1273
asa(dp1274
g2
(dp1275
S"Groomsmen's Shirts"
p1276
S'Daniel Cremieux'
p1277
sS'Videographer'
p1278
S'John Christopher Photographs & Films '
p1279
sS'Planner'
p1280
S'Sweet Pea Events'
p1281
sS'Wedding Dress'
p1282
S'Warren Barron- Vera Wang'
p1283
sS'Ceremony & Reception Venue'
p1284
S'Villa Turquesa (Private Residence)'
p1285
sS'Hair And Makeup'
p1286
S'Suzanne Morel'
p1287
sS'Photography'
p1288
S'Sara & Rocky Photography'
p1289
sS'Invitations & Paper Elements'
p1290
S'Southern Fried Paper'
p1291
sS"Groom's Ring"
p1292
S'David Yurman'
p1293
sS'Invitation Cookies'
p1294
S'Layered Bake Shop'
p1295
sS"Bridesmaids' Dresses"
p1296
S'J. Crew'
p1297
sS"Bride's Ring"
p1298
S'Precision Jewelers '
p1299
sS'Officiant'
p1300
S'Rodrigo Palacio'
p1301
sS"Groomsmen's Suits"
p1302
S'J. Crew'
p1303
sS'Transportation'
p1304
S'Danny Boy Cabo'
p1305
sS'Cake'
p1306
S'Cabo Flowers & Cakes'
p1307
sS'DJ'
p1308
S'DJ System '
p1309
sS'Floral Design'
p1310
S'Mazarte Florals'
p1311
sS"Groomsmen's Ties"
p1312
S'Tie Bar'
p1313
sS'Linens/Lighting/China/Chairs'
p1314
S'Linens, Things And More'
p1315
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/11/12/tropical-cabo-san-lucas-beach-wedding/'
p1316
sg20
(dp1317
g22
(lp1318
S'elegance'
p1319
asg25
(lp1320
S'summer'
p1321
asg28
(lp1322
S'coral'
p1323
aS'gold'
p1324
aS'khaki'
p1325
asg33
(lp1326
S'villa'
p1327
assg36
(lp1328
S'When the getting ready shots include a Bride sporting sparkly earrings once worn by Marilyn Monroe as her  something old , you know the wedding that follows is going to be fabulous as ever. Set that wedding in a gorgeous designation like Cabo San Lucas, put Sweet Pea Events behind the planning and sprinkle it with coral and turquoise, and it reaches a whole new level. Sara & Rocky Photography tagged along for all the fun and thanks to them, you can too.'
p1329
aS'From the beautiful Bride This intimate wedding in Cabo with 30 guests was all about family & friends. Most of the guests stayed at the venue, Villa Turquesa, and it was a week-long celebration overlooking the Pacific Ocean. The groom is a hockey player for the St. Louis Blues and the bride is a sweet southern belle from Dallas.'
p1330
aS'-The bride s earrings were worn by Marilyn Monroe, and were a gift from the bride s father and step-mom as her  something old .'
p1331
aS'-The groom s daughter, Layna, made the bride the blue heart you see in the photos   that was her  something blue .'
p1332
aS'- Seashells were used as twist on the traditional boutonniere.'
p1333
aS'- The seahorse was one of our main design elements and subtly incorporated through the d cor.'
p1334
aS'-All of the linens and pillows were hand-sewn and custom-made just for this wedding.\n'
p1335
asa(dp1336
g2
(dp1337
S'Videographer'
p1338
S'Duncan Wolfe'
p1339
sS'DJ'
p1340
S'Fabrice Deneuchatel'
p1341
sS'Hair Stylist'
p1342
S'Sonja Benhamou'
p1343
sS'Floral Design'
p1344
S'Olivier Gental'
p1345
sS'Mother Of The Bride Dress'
p1346
S'Adrianna Papell'
p1347
sS'Bridesmaid Dress (floral Print)'
p1348
S'Elizabeth & James'
p1349
sS'Invitations'
p1350
S'Aerialist Press'
p1351
sS'Event Planning'
p1352
S'Alliance Par Fete'
p1353
sS'Bridesmaid Dress (blush)'
p1354
S'BCBG'
p1355
sS'Makeup Artist'
p1356
S'Sanni Sorma'
p1357
sS'Photography'
p1358
S'Joseba Sandoval'
p1359
sS'Catering'
p1360
S'Gaulupeau'
p1361
sS'Band'
p1362
S'Octave & Anatole'
p1363
sS"Bride's Earrings"
p1364
S'Lulu Frost'
p1365
sS'Wedding Styling'
p1366
S'Fleur De Sel'
p1367
sS"Groom's Attire"
p1368
S'Burberry'
p1369
sS'Vintage Candlesticks'
p1370
S'Classic Vintage Rentals'
p1371
sS'Bridesmaid Dress (champange)'
p1372
S'Amsale'
p1373
sS'Event Design'
p1374
S'Fleur De Sel'
p1375
sS'Wedding Dress'
p1376
S'Temperley London'
p1377
sS"Bride's Shoes"
p1378
S'Gucci'
p1379
sS'Private Estate'
p1380
S'Villa Blanche'
p1381
sS"Groom's Shoes"
p1382
S'John Varvatos'
p1383
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/11/11/fleur-de-sel-french-destination-wedding/'
p1384
sg20
(dp1385
g22
(lp1386
S'al-fresco'
p1387
aS'destination'
p1388
asg25
(lp1389
S'spring'
p1390
asg28
(lp1391
S'champagne'
p1392
aS'cream'
p1393
aS'gold'
p1394
aS'navy'
p1395
asg33
(lp1396
S'estate'
p1397
assg36
(lp1398
S'As one of our beloved SMP blogger brides, we ve followed Lindsay of Fleur De Sel from  I will  to  I do.  Starting with initial planning to invitation etiquette to floral design, she walked us through the hurdles of designing a destination affair, and you better believe it paid off   BIG time. Joseba Sandoval photographed every beautifully built moment, and the film from Duncan Wolfe is like the cherry on top a perfect cake.'
p1399
aS'From The Bride I am at a complete and utter loss of how to put our wedding day into words. Although I was definitely not one of those brides who had planned my wedding from the time I was a little girl, I can truly say that our wedding felt like a dream come true.'
p1400
aS'Soon after Matt proposed in Paris, we decided that we both wanted an intimate, destination wedding with only our closest friends and family. I am a California girl through and through, with most of my friends and family on the west coast, and Matt is an Englishman, with friends and family all over the UK and Europe. When we stumbled upon a 18th century private estate outside of Versailles, France, with beautiful old bones but a modern interior design aesthetic and the most gorgeous French gardens, the decision was basically made for us.'
p1401
aS'We really wanted to focus on our guests, and to ensure that they had a fantastic time, especially as they were making the long journey to share our special day with us. We hosted a welcome reception the night before the wedding for all of our guests at Verjus in Paris, one of our favorite restaurants, and passed out welcome bags, complete with macarons from Pierre Herme and a French phrasebook.'
p1402
aS'The only real goal we had for the wedding itself was to make it feel less like a wedding, and more like a dinner party. The ceremony was non-traditional   Matt and I wrote our own vows, Matt s father officiated, my father and uncle sang a song, and Matt s mother recited an Irish blessing. Between all of it, everyone was in tears, including Matt and me. The ceremony was followed by a cocktail reception, complete with a Parisian jazz trio, oysters, cheese and charcuterie and champagne. Dinner was served al fresco on the terrace, on long white rectangular tables lined up end to end, with white Napoleon chairs running alongside and a gorgeous eucalyptus garland and vintage bronze candlesticks running down the middle. At one point during dinner, it even rained a bit, but somehow, in the candlelight, it just felt romantic.'
p1403
aS'After dinner, a dance party ensued, started by a first dance to Otis Redding s  That s How Strong My Love Is  and then a more raucous father-daughter dance to Van Morrison s  Brown Eyed Girl . The DJ was amazing, and got everyone, young and old and all of us in between out on the dance floor until 2 in the morning.'
p1404
aS'Deciding to engage Ophelie Tronchet from Alliance Par Fete was one of the best decisions we made, hands down. Not only is she an incredibly sweet person, she was so well organized and professional. She helped us source local vendors, finding us the perfect caterer, floral designer, DJ and hair and makeup artists. She also served as our day-of coordinator and seriously performed miracles. She kept us sane and allowed us to focus on the beauty of the day.'
p1405
aS'The other two best decisions we made were to engage Joseba and Mar Sandoval as our photographers and Duncan Wolfe as our videographer. I found both of these insanely talented artists through Style Me Pretty, and feel so tremendously lucky to have worked with both of them. They captured our wedding day in such a special, beautiful, memorable way. We will cherish the images they created forever.'
p1406
aS'I hate to sound like a broken record, but everything everyone says about a wedding is so true   it absolutely flies by. There will of course be issues   things you didn t plan for, broken pipes, last minute changes, fear of rain. But the best part of it is the love. To look around the room and see our nearest and dearest, all gathered in one place to celebrate love   it truly humbled us, and made us feel so grateful. The word I would use to describe it, like the word I used to describe my first hug with my now husband   magic. I get goosebumps and a bit teary eyed even thinking about it now. And to have found the man that I always knew was out there, and to know I get to spend the rest of my life with him   there is no better feeling in this world.\n'
p1407
asa(dp1408
g2
(dp1409
S'Hair And Makeup'
p1410
S'Heidi Vince Hair'
p1411
sS'Photography'
p1412
S'CJK Visuals'
p1413
sS'Hotel'
p1414
S'Bibury Court Hotel'
p1415
sS'Car Rental'
p1416
S'Morris Minor Weddings'
p1417
sS'Food And Drink'
p1418
S'Bibury Court Hotel'
p1419
sS'Planner + Stylist'
p1420
S'Planned For Perfection'
p1421
sS'Floral Design'
p1422
S'Lily Fee Floral Designs'
p1423
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/11/10/young-love-cotswolds-inspiration-shoot/'
p1424
sg20
(dp1425
g22
(lp1426
S'elegant'
p1427
asg25
(lp1428
S'summer'
p1429
asg28
(lp1430
S'khaki'
p1431
aS'light-blue'
p1432
aS'light-yellow'
p1433
asg33
(lp1434
S'hotel'
p1435
assg36
(lp1436
S'Last week we feasted our eyes on this insanely pretty shoot full of English charm from Planned For Perfection and CJK Visuals. We basically fell in love with all the gorgeous, and we couldn t wait to share this darling sister shoot inspired by a beautiful, youthful love, drenched in innocence and adorable moments. I mean, what s more romantic than a quaint picnic in the English countryside?! See it all here.'
p1437
aS'From CJK Visuals I met up with Jane during my second backpacking trip around Europe. I was beyond excited when she said she would work with me on an English-themed wedding styled shoot. Little did I know, she had planned a mini  young-love  picnic styled shoot as well!'
p1438
aS'The models, Molly and Ed, the daughter of the planner and son of the florist- had only met each other once or twice- and you would ve thought they were each other s first love! They were so adorable with each other and I had so much fun having them awkwardly hold each other s hands for the first time. I don t know about you, but I think these two should probably go on a real date after this shoot!'
p1439
aS'Jane put together an adorable English picnic  first date  shoot located on the grounds of the Bibury Court Hotel. Finger sandwiches, picnic basket, cupcakes, and Harry Potter- I can t think of a better outdoor date in the Cotswolds!\n'
p1440
asa(dp1441
g2
(dp1442
S'Wedding Cake'
p1443
S'Shella Wedding Cakes'
p1444
sS'Floral Designer'
p1445
S"L'Art Qui Pousse"
p1446
sS"Groom's Attire & Shoes"
p1447
S'Faubourg Saint Sulpice'
p1448
sS'Makeup Artist'
p1449
S'Blandine Fabre'
p1450
sS'Models'
p1451
S'In s LACORNE-PIQUET & Jeoffrey KREBS Via Enjoy Models'
p1452
sS'Photography'
p1453
S'Greg Finck'
p1454
sS'Cinematography'
p1455
S'Mg-image'
p1456
sS"Bride's Shoes"
p1457
S'Muse Aix-en-Provence'
p1458
sS'Bridal Gown "Genevieve"'
p1459
S'Claire Pettibone '
p1460
sS'Caterer'
p1461
S'Fr d ric Bernard Traiteur'
p1462
sS'Stationery'
p1463
S'Julie Song Ink'
p1464
sS'Wedding Planner & Designer'
p1465
S'La Fabrique   R ves '
p1466
sS'Hair Artist'
p1467
S'Sylvie Pastore Transhair'
p1468
sS'Bastide'
p1469
S'Bastide De Marie'
p1470
sS'UK Shop Providing Gown'
p1471
S'Black Burn Bridal'
p1472
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/11/07/provencal-bohemian-garden-wedding-inspiration/'
p1473
sg20
(dp1474
g22
(lp1475
S'bohemian'
p1476
asg25
(lp1477
S'summer'
p1478
asg28
(lp1479
S'blush'
p1480
aS'gray'
p1481
aS'hot-pink'
p1482
aS'peach'
p1483
asg33
(lp1484
S'hotel'
p1485
assg36
(lp1486
S'Fair warning, you might have to pick your jaw up off the floor after perusing this gallery from Greg Finck and La Fabrique   R ves. I sure did. And then I stuck around for a while to soak it all in  the breathtaking Provence landscape, the florals tucked in every corner, Julie Song Ink s whimsical lettering. It s all tucked into this gallery that we can t get enough of.'
p1487
aS'From La Fabrique   R ves From the height of a rocky spur overlooking the scrublands and vineyards of the Luberon, the citadel and chateau of M nerbes keep watch over their treasure. Celebrated as one of the most beautiful villages of the Luberon, it has stone ramparts, frontons marked with dates and vaulted cellars that you enter like Ali Baba caves  The little paved streets lead the way to the rich historic heritage of the town, taking you to the doors of old residences and the 17th century bell tower rising over the square. This genuine place full of character has triumphantly stood the test of time and preserved the authentic Provencal spirit.'
p1488
aS'Countless artists have responded to the call of this generous territory, fired by an inspiration renewed by so much beauty and unspoiled countryside. Nicolas de Sta l and Picasso both owned houses at M nerbes. They were joined by a large number of creative figures, with musicians, actors and writers all finding a haven in one of the beautiful farms scattered around the village.'
p1489
aS'It wasn t difficult for us to choose M nerbes as home for our workshop.'
p1490
aS'Between Gordes and M nerbes, there is an elegant 18th century residence: a typical country farm restored with respect for the pure tradition of the Provencal  mas . Nestling among 23 hectares of vines, La Bastide de Marie shines out with a splendour rooted in authenticity. A driveway bordered by cyprus trees, century-old olive trees and enchantingly scented lavender bushes leads up to the house. Naturally we chose La Bastide de Marie and its emblematic surroundings where everything seems to whisper that here as our muse for our workshop.'
p1491
aS'Lying in M nerbes, La Bastide de Marie provides a setting ideal for the perfect life under an Epicurean sun  Indeed it is surroundings of exceptional beauty; in the very heart of vineyards in an intimate atmosphere of peaceful quiet and sensuous ease.'
p1492
aS'The entire design was directly inspired by the elegance of the Bastide de Marie and its surrounding area.'
p1493
aS'To highlight the delicate juxtaposition of natural beauty and the true artisan talent reflected in architecture and art, we chose a palate of light & strong flowery pink, yellow cream and a touch of green to express a Bohemian Spirit & a Spring touch.'
p1494
aS'Our beautiful model In s wore an exquisite gown from Claire Pettibone named after Florentine, which were perfectly paired with the delicate wreath of flowers by l Art qui Pousse. The incredible calligraphy stationary done by Julie Song Ink with natural pink & green watercolor painted on a very pretty paper gave this atmosphere its final touch.'
p1495
aS'We chose the terrace in front of the vineyards as the backdrop for our dinner table with an antique wooden table turned into a bohemian spirit adorned with flowers and candlelight. We decorated the Wedding Cake with a crown of flowers.'
p1496
aS'Very special thanks and acknowledgment go to Gabriel Menassier from mg-image for his incredible video, and to Greg Finck Photography for his remarkable talent capturing moments.\n'
p1497
asa(dp1498
g2
(dp1499
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/11/07/ireland-inspiration-shoot-at-slieve-gullion/'
p1500
sg20
(dp1501
g22
(lp1502
S'rustic'
p1503
asg25
(lp1504
S'spring'
p1505
asg28
(lp1506
S'gray'
p1507
aS'purple'
p1508
asg33
(lp1509
S'outdoor'
p1510
assg36
(lp1511
S'My hubby and I just returned from a ridiculously amazing trip to Ireland, and the entire time we were there my head was lost in a day dream of Emerald Isle prettiness. So when I saw this stunning shoot dreamt up by Alise Taggart  and captured by Christian Oth Studio my heart leapt out of my chest, because this is just what I was dreaming of the entire time we were there.'
p1512
aS'We drew inspiration from the untamed landscape and nature s elements, the movement in the beautiful gowns, the flowing of the veils and silk stationery suite, unstructured, lush floral design with textured elements of linen and stone throughout.\n'
p1513
aS'Photography: Christian Oth Studio | Floral Design: The Informal Florist | Wedding Dress: Mark Ingram Bridal Atelier | Stationery: Signora E Mare | Hair Stylist: Kathy McLean | Creative Direction, Styling & Production: Alise Taggart | Linen Dress And Fabrics: Knock Knock Linen | Make Up Artist: Jennifer Ireland | Model: Joanne Northey | Model : Rachel Morrow  | Model : Amber Duffy | Venue: Slieve Gullion'
p1514
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p1515
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p1516
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p1517
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p1518
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p1519
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p1520
aS'A ...'
p1521
aS'When ...'
p1522
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p1523
asa(dp1524
g2
(dp1525
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/new-zealand-weddings/2014/11/06/touching-wedding-video-from-queenstown-new-zealand/'
p1526
sg20
(dp1527
g22
(lp1528
S'whimsical'
p1529
asg25
(lp1530
S'summer'
p1531
asg28
(lp1532
S'purple'
p1533
aS'red'
p1534
asg33
(lp1535
S'winery'
p1536
assg36
(lp1537
S'This video just made my day. All my worries disappeared, thanks to this love story. Sunshine Wedding Films took an already beautiful wedding and turned it into a piece of art, capturing the emotional words of one eloquent groom and some of the prettiest sights I ever did see. So forget your troubles and fall in love with love over this clip, and full gallery by Larsson Photography, below.'
p1538
aS'From Sunshine Wedding Films  This particular film is our all-time favourite. It s a short trailer for a local NZ couple who travelled to the resort town of Queenstown for a very intimate wedding of just 23 guests. Casey is originally from China, George from Chile, they met at university in Christchurch and their family came from all over the globe to be here.'
p1539
aS'We made this film to be deliberately about Casey and George and the intimacy shared between them on their wedding day   it s possibly the most romantic one we ve done. The film is interspersed with parts of a beautiful poem read by George to his wife and shows off multiple, stunning locations   a small private lake, an old woolshed, a mountain-top shoot on the Southern Alps and an underground winery barrel-room. We also included a little bit of stop-motion and time lapses to add to the whimsy of the film.'
p1540
aS'They had their ceremony on a small jetty by a lake at Bendemeer, which is an exclusive development on the outskirts of Queenstown and their reception at an old woolshed at Peregrine Winery. With amazing heartfelt styling from Queenstown planner Laura from Mint Events, the woolshed was transformed into a magical and whimsical space with a butterfly theme which echoed details on Casey s dress and jewellery. (She wore two dresses from well-known NZ designer Louise Anderson Bridal on the day   a white lace wedding dress followed by a gorgeous red one for the reception) There was incredible attention to detail in every aspect of this wedding from the cake and cake pops right through to the notepaper on the wishing trees. Amazing photos were captured by Fredrik Larsson of Larsson Photography   a gentleman to work with.'
p1541
aS'We LOVE this film as Casey particularly has a serenity which is transfixing on screen. She and George were amazing to work with and trusted us to do whatever we asked of them. Every time in front of a camera they seemed to forget we were there and we were able to capture moments of two people who simply adore each other. Pretty much why we make wedding films.\n'
p1542
aS'Photography: Larsson Photography | Cinematography: Sunshine Wedding Films | Event Planning: Mint Events | Floral Design: The Flower Room | Wedding Dress: Louise Anderson Bridal Design | Cake: Cherry Blossom Cakes | Ceremony Location: Bendemeer | Reception Venue: Peregrine Winery | Hair Stylist: Absolutely Fabulous Hair | Band: LA Social Club | Fairy Lights: Wanaka Marquee And Party Hire | Helicopters: Over The Top | Transport: Classic Car Journeys'
p1543
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p1544
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p1545
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p1546
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p1547
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p1548
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p1549
aS'A ...'
p1550
aS'When ...'
p1551
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p1552
asa(dp1553
g2
(dp1554
S'Wedding Dress'
p1555
S'Wedding Days Of Cheltenham'
p1556
sS'Menswear'
p1557
S'Groomswear'
p1558
sS'Dress Designer'
p1559
S'Charlotte Balbier'
p1560
sS'Hair And Makeup'
p1561
S'Heidi Vince Hair'
p1562
sS'Photography'
p1563
S'CJK Visuals'
p1564
sS'Hotel'
p1565
S'Bibury Court Hotel'
p1566
sS'Wedding Car'
p1567
S'Morris Minor Weddings'
p1568
sS'Stationery'
p1569
S'Lucy Ledger'
p1570
sS'Planner + Stylist'
p1571
S'Planned For Perfection'
p1572
sS'Floral Design + Prop Styling'
p1573
S'Lilyfee Floral Designs'
p1574
sS'Cake'
p1575
S'Curtis And Co Cakes'
p1576
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/11/06/quintessential-english-garden-wedding-inspiration/'
p1577
sg20
(dp1578
g22
(lp1579
S'elegance'
p1580
asg25
(lp1581
S'summer'
p1582
asg28
(lp1583
S'blush'
p1584
aS'gray'
p1585
aS'lavender'
p1586
aS'peach'
p1587
asg33
(lp1588
S'hotel'
p1589
assg36
(lp1590
S'If you dream of quaint English charm and dapper details for your Big Day, I highly recommend you spend some QT in this enchanting gallery from CJK Visuals. Planned For Perfection filled it with the prettiest of pastels in the form of bow-tied linens, perfectly plated roses and floral crowns from Lilyfee Floral Designs and garden-gorgeous stationery from Lucy Ledger. It s seamless and well, captivating beyond words. See it all here!'
p1591
aS'From CJK Visuals After my first backpacking trip around Europe, I immediately fell in love and needed to get back. I ve wanted to shoot international weddings since I first started doing photography, so that first trip over inspired me to reach out and make it happen. I started to email different planners about meeting up in April, when I stumbled upon Jane Riddell of Planned for Perfection based out of the Cotswolds in England. She was immediately excited and up to work on an amazing English-wedding styled shoot with me on my next trip over in August.'
p1592
aS'When she asked what sort of shoot I was interested in doing, I said anything ENGLISH! It s so different and very specific- nothing like I m used to shooting over on the East Coast in the states. Jane was 100% up for it and she really put together something special.'
p1593
aS'Fast forward a few months of emails back and forth, discussing minor details- and I am in England prepping for my first international styled shoot! I arrived after a flight, train, and taxi ride to the incredible Bibury Court Hotel, and my jaw was on the ground. I can t begin to explain how perfectly English this venue is- it looks like a movie set! Jane and her team put together one of the most incredibly beautiful shoots I ve ever seen. The florals, dresses, and real-life couples that modeled for us couldn t have been more perfect. I am so looking forward to getting back over there and working with this amazing team of vendors again!\n'
p1594
asa(dp1595
g2
(dp1596
S'Videographer'
p1597
S'Voila Cinematic'
p1598
sS'DJ'
p1599
S'Atlantis Entertainment - Kirk'
p1600
sS'Linens'
p1601
S'Over The Top Linens'
p1602
sS'D cor, Tent, Rentals & Lighting'
p1603
S'Wildflowers Bahamas'
p1604
sS'Wedding Planner'
p1605
S'Tracie Domino Events'
p1606
sS'Hair'
p1607
S'The Weech Design Group'
p1608
sS'Transportation'
p1609
S'Bahamas Experience Tours'
p1610
sS'Invitations & Stationery'
p1611
S"Pauline's Paperie"
p1612
sS'Reception Venue'
p1613
S'One And Only Ocean Club'
p1614
sS'Photography'
p1615
S'Sam Hurd Photography'
p1616
sS'Makeup'
p1617
S'Cedric Jolivet'
p1618
sS'Ceremony Venue'
p1619
S'One And Only Ocean Club'
p1620
sS"Grooms' Cufflinks"
p1621
S'Vintage Fenwick And Sailors'
p1622
sS'Ceremony Music'
p1623
S"Strings'n Tings"
p1624
sS'Wedding Gown'
p1625
S'Oscar De La Renta'
p1626
sS"Groom's Attire"
p1627
S'Brooks Brothers'
p1628
sS"Bridesmaids' Dresses"
p1629
S'Teri Jon By Rickie Freeman'
p1630
sS"Bride & Groom's Shoes"
p1631
S'Christian Louboutin'
p1632
sS"Groom's Tie"
p1633
S'Brioni'
p1634
sS'Floral Importing'
p1635
S'Grymes Cannon Designs'
p1636
sS'Catering & Cake'
p1637
S'One And Only Ocean Club'
p1638
sS'Officiant'
p1639
S'Island Preacha Weddings - Matthew Sweeting'
p1640
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/11/06/elegant-bahamas-wedding/'
p1641
sg20
(dp1642
g22
(lp1643
S'elegance'
p1644
asg25
(lp1645
S'summer'
p1646
asg28
(lp1647
S'light-blue'
p1648
aS'purple'
p1649
aS'silver-2'
p1650
asg33
(lp1651
S'beach-club'
p1652
assg36
(lp1653
S'When you grow up visiting a destination as gorgeous as the One & Only Ocean Club in the Bahamas, it s sort of a no brainer to gather up your nearest and dearest and head down there to say your I do s. That s exactly what this beautiful Bride and her Groom did. Tracie Domino Events made sure the day went off without a hitch and the result is tropical goodness galore. Beyond the island style details, calypso and love fill the air in this gallery from Sam Hurd and the film from Voila Cinematic.'
p1654
aS'From the beautiful Bride John and I grew up eight miles down the road from each other. We went through nearly three decades of missed connections and visiting the same local haunts throughout our neighboring New Jersey towns. When we met   it was swiftly clear to us both that we soon asked   where have you been all my life? Fate finally brought us together in late summer of 2011 in our current hometown   New York City. I wore a white dress that evening and as soon as I walked through the door of that crowded Manhattan restaurant, Johnny said he knew instantly that I d wear white again   as his bride.'
p1655
aS'Now we are inseparable in so many ways   perhaps to make up for lost time! We live together, work together, commute together and have a French bulldog, Gemma, together. As we are true partners in love and life, I wholeheartedly shared with John the paradise I ve been visiting with my family for over 20 years.'
p1656
aS'The One&Only Ocean Club will always hold a special part of my heart   I grew up visiting  The Lady  in the Augustinian Cloisters, always dreaming that perhaps someday she d witness my vows and look after the little girl that came to Paradise Island every so often to  say hello .'
p1657
aS'My wish came to life on June 28th 2014 with the help and love of so many and I am eternally thankful for everyone who traveled to the Caribbean to support the beginning of our new life together.'
p1658
aS'We arrived in the Bahamas on the Wednesday prior and were fully drawn into the whirlwind of emotions and excitement for the experience a year in the making. Colored only by the hues of a legendary sunset, our celebrations began with an all white-attired and decorated welcome-party on the Beach Deck. A calypso band brought in the local flavor as our guests unwound to island time underneath luminous paper lanterns.'
p1659
aS'After a wonderful night surrounded by our nearest and dearest   we knew the best was yet to come.'
p1660
aS'Our ethereal wedding evening unfolded like I had imagined   a  Midsummer s Night Dream  basked in the warm glow of periwinkle votive and floating candles, crystal chandeliers and the Bahamian breeze. Mercury glass and towering centerpieces overflowed with ivory garden roses and lush hydrangeas in vibrant shades of purple. Our menus, table and place cards adorned with a beautifully flourished font and a customized seahorse motif, carried throughout the wedding weekend. Tracie Domino, Grymes Cannon and team entirely captured the romantic elegance we discussed to perfectly compliment the magic and our sentimental love of the Ocean Club.'
p1661
aS'Later in the night as John and I sat together, relishing in our joy and gratitude   whilst our family and friends danced under the influence of happiness (and Bahama Mamas!)   we looked up the illuminated tiers of the Versailles Gardens to the Cloisters from our seats   where  The Lady  glowed, watching over our most perfect memory.\n'
p1662
asa(dp1663
g2
(dp1664
S'Videography'
p1665
S'Elena Foresto'
p1666
sS'Photography'
p1667
S'Stefano Santucci'
p1668
sS'Catering'
p1669
S'Salza'
p1670
sS'Groom Shoes'
p1671
S"Church's"
p1672
sS'Groom Suit'
p1673
S'Sartoria Partenopea'
p1674
sS'Music'
p1675
S'Alma Project'
p1676
sS'Make Up'
p1677
S'Giulia Cresci'
p1678
sS'Church'
p1679
S'Chiesa Dei Santi Michele Arcangelo E Lorenzo'
p1680
sS'Wedding Gown'
p1681
S'Celestina Agostino'
p1682
sS'Floral Design'
p1683
S'La Rosa Canina'
p1684
sS'Styling And Invitations'
p1685
S'Nuovaedart'
p1686
sS'Bride Shoes'
p1687
S'N.21'
p1688
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/11/05/elegant-villa-wedding-in-tuscany/'
p1689
sg20
(dp1690
g22
(lp1691
S'elegant'
p1692
asg25
(lp1693
S'summer'
p1694
asg28
(lp1695
S'blush'
p1696
aS'lavender'
p1697
aS'light-pink'
p1698
aS'taupe'
p1699
asg33
(lp1700
S'church'
p1701
aS'villa'
p1702
assg36
(lp1703
S'After falling in love with these Italian nuptials, it s now my belief that every celebration should have a Vespa involved. This Bride s wedding at her parent s villa is what dreams are made of, from the romantic florals to the Tuscan hills, all captured by Stefano Santucci. It may just be a normal workday for all of us, so let s skip out on the hump day blues and spend the day in Italy right here.'
p1704
aS'From The Bride  Hi, this is Benedetta and Marco s wedding, a beautiful, poetic and elegant wedding in Montevettolini, a small town in Tuscany near Montecatini Terme, Pistoia. Benedetta choose their parents Villa as the location for the full wedding day, except for the ceremony. All was inside their Villa, the dancing and celebrations. All the floral design and catering was chosen to match this amazing location with beautiful installations and music.'
p1705
aS'The couple was so emotional, and the families so nice and kind with everyone. It was just a magical night and ended with fireworks and gorgeous house music near the swimming pool where people decided to have a dip!\n'
p1706
asa(dp1707
g2
(dp1708
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/dominican-republic-weddings/2014/11/05/tropical-destination-wedding-at-dreams-la-romana/'
p1709
sg20
(dp1710
g22
(lp1711
S'destination'
p1712
asg25
(lp1713
S'summer'
p1714
asg28
(lp1715
S'orange'
p1716
aS'peach'
p1717
aS'turquoise'
p1718
asg33
(lp1719
S'beach-resort'
p1720
assg36
(lp1721
S'Through my eyes, destination weddings are a treasured vacation wrapped inside a memorable celebration. So, it s no surprise that this stunning nuptial perfectly planned by Dreams La Romana and captured by Asia Pimentel Photography is pure paradise. Escape the ordinary and hop on over to the gallery for more.'
p1722
aS'From the Bride  Brett and I would have never considered a destination wedding if my sister hadn t suggested it while we were looking for wedding venues locally. The idea of getting to spend a vacation with family and friends instead of just a few hours one night just made sense to us. We also were busy finishing graduate school, so going to a resort that took care of most of the details was appealing to us as well. One of the first sites she sent was Dreams La Romana, and after looking, at many more resorts we decided it was the best choice. We looked at as many pictures and reviews as we could find since we didn t have a chance to go to the resort before our wedding.  We wanted to make sure we picked a location that would be beautiful for our wedding as well as an enjoyable vacation for our friends and family.'
p1723
aS'Planning the wedding mainly over email was stressful at times, but it did make it much easier that the resort truly does take care of everything. After exchanging many emails with our wedding planner at Dreams, we finally got to meet her when we got to the resort, and all of the stress faded away. She took care of every detail we wanted and even a few surprises.'
p1724
aS'Our wedding day was pretty much stress free from the start! My day began on the beach with family and friends followed by some time in the pool overlooking the beach. I was confident our wedding planner, Jenny, had every detail taken care of, so I was able to relax.'
p1725
aS'Our photographers, Asia and Nikolay, arrived for us to begin getting ready, and we were immediately happy they would be the ones capturing our big day. They were with us throughout our wedding day and captured so many beautiful moments. They captured little details for us to look back at forever. For example, they took pictures of Brett s shoes. Brett had wanted these shoes (Cole Haan Nike Air Wingtips) for our wedding for years before we were even engaged. By the time we were engaged, they no longer sold them! Luckily, my dad searched far and wide for them on the internet and eventually found a pair that I gave to Brett to wear for our wedding.  They also captured one of my favorite moments, the walk up the aisle after getting married when our family and friends threw flower petals. This was one of the surprises our wedding planner prepared, and it was perfect.  Now we get to relive those moments looking at our pictures.  I cannot say enough about how happy we are with all of the photographs.  Our photographers are truly talented.'
p1726
aS'We enjoyed every aspect of our wedding from the ceremony through the dancing. Not only was the Dreams wedding planner great, the waiters and DJ were great as well. The service and food were wonderful! In the end, we were so happy with our decision to do a destination wedding.'
p1727
aS'Photography: Asia Pimentel Photography | Venue: Dreams La Romana'
p1728
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p1729
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p1730
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p1731
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p1732
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p1733
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p1734
aS'A ...'
p1735
aS'When ...'
p1736
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p1737
asa(dp1738
g2
(dp1739
S'Photography'
p1740
S'Brooke Merrill Photography '
p1741
sS'Cinematography'
p1742
S'Toxi Pen'
p1743
sS'Wedding Venue'
p1744
S'The Surin Phuket'
p1745
sS'Light & Sound'
p1746
S'Final Cut AV '
p1747
sS'Ring'
p1748
S'Harry Winston'
p1749
sS'Wedding Planner'
p1750
S'The Wedding Bliss By Nanya'
p1751
sS'Floral Design'
p1752
S'I Am Flower Phuket'
p1753
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/11/05/destination-beach-wedding-in-thailand/'
p1754
sg20
(dp1755
g22
(lp1756
S'elegant'
p1757
asg25
(lp1758
S'fall'
p1759
asg28
(lp1760
S'coral'
p1761
aS'mint-2'
p1762
asg33
(lp1763
S'resort'
p1764
assg36
(lp1765
S'Beyond a simply beautiful destination wedding, this Phuket soiree is so much more. The stunning Bride in Inbal Dror with her mint and coral  maids, the newlywed kiss framed by lush florals, and well, Johnny Depp was there! The baby elephant named Johnny Depp, that is. It s a Thailand fete planned by The Wedding Bliss By Nanya that ll have you smiling at every turn. Head to the full gallery from Brooke Merrill Photography for more!'
p1766
aS'From The Wedding Bliss By Nanya Kelly was living in New York when she got a last minute invite to join her coworker Kolby and his girlfriend Michelle for a weekend in Palm Springs. The Coachella Music festival was in town and they had an extra ticket with her name on it. Being a huge music fan, Coachella gave Kelly the perfect reasons for an impromptu weekend getaway.'
p1767
aS'The hotel in the desert left something to be desired but it did have a pool and in-between concerts was packed full with fellow festival attendees. It was here that Kelly s friend Kolby met Randy, and the two quickly bonded over everything especially their shared love for LCD Soundsystem, Kelly s favorite band. Kolby invited his new friend to meet back up with them later that evening to watch a show.'
p1768
aS'Kelly remembers how excited Kolby was to tell her about an awesome guy he had met that he wanted to introduce her to, named Randy. Reluctantly Kelly agreed but ended up having the best time. At the end of the weekend they exchanged numbers and from that point on they were inseparable.'
p1769
aS'They continued to see each other after their weekend at Coachella ended, each making cross-country flights from Los Angeles to New York. Their long distance romance lasted for more than a year when Kelly decided to take a position in Los Angeles to be closer to Randy.'
p1770
aS'It wasn t long after Kelly arrived, that Randy started ring shopping, and his first stop was Harry Winston where he chose a gorgeous, cushion cut diamond engagement ring. Planning the proposal turned out to be a little trickier. Randy decided he wanted to propose during the Coachella Music festival at the tiny hotel where they first met. Kelly was in the room rushing to get ready when Randy came in. He wanted her to sit down so he could talk with her, but she was already running late and started getting annoyed that he wasn t ready himself.'
p1771
aS'She was about to get up so she could continue getting ready when he dropped to his knee and proposed. She had no idea. Through tears of happiness Kelly managed to give Randy an answer Yes.'
p1772
aS'Randy and Kelly decided on a destination wedding but didn t know where they wanted it to be. Randy s roommate Dan suggested they look into Phuket. He had just returned from a trip there and had fallen in love with the gorgeous white sand beaches, amazing food, and friendly locals. After researching Phuket on the Internet, Randy and Kelly decided it would be perfect.'
p1773
aS'Kelly knew she needed help coordinating the wedding from afar and contacted Nanya Tanthapaiboon, a luxury wedding planner of The Wedding Bliss. Nanya and her team made sure every detail was perfect, overseeing everything from the welcome dinner to the private cruise the couple planned as a surprise for their guests the day after the wedding.'
p1774
aS'Randy and Kelly wanted their wedding to be an experience for their guests, as well as reflect their love of music and beach life. They chose The Surin Phuket for their ceremony and reception location because they fell in love with the gorgeous beaches, private villas, and breathtaking views.'
p1775
aS'After making the 22-hour flight from Los Angeles to Phuket guests were greeted with a welcome dinner followed by a late night dance party. Kelly and Randy love to dance and incorporated music and or dancing into every part of their amazing wedding.'
p1776
aS'On the day of the wedding, Nanya and her team set to work laying out the ceremony location. I Am Flower of Phuket did an amazing job creating the wedding arch by filling it with orchids, coral-color roses, and other vibrant tropical. Even the chairs were decorated with the most amazing tropical garlands that hung along the backside.'
p1777
aS'Once guests arrived they were greeted with a glass of champagne and as they took their seats. Local musician Moody Paul performed an outstanding acoustic reggae session.'
p1778
aS'As the ceremony began, Randy just beamed as Kelly and her dad made their way to the sand. Kelly looked absolutely stunning in her fitted Inbal Dror wedding dress and veil and danced all the way down the aisle as Moody played a cover of Jason Mraz s song  I m Yours .'
p1779
aS'Since Kolby was the one who first introduced Kelly and Randy back in Palm Springs they thought it was only fitting that he be the one to marry them. Instead of traditional vows the couple selected their favorite lyrics from songs and recited them to each other.'
p1780
aS'When Kelly and Randy were finally pronounced husband and wife they walked down the aisle and found a surprise waiting for them. A baby elephant named Johnny Depp was there to bring luck and good fortune to the newlywed couple and their guests.'
p1781
aS'Even though it had been raining on and off for the entire day the rain let up just in time for the ceremony but began again shortly after. The best part of the wedding was when the bride and groom made their grand entrance. They headed to the dance floor and their friends and family gathered around them. The rain began to come down again while they danced to their favorite song,  Dance yourself clean,  by LCD Sound System. No one cared. They turned the music up and had a dance party in the rain. It was awesome.'
p1782
aS'Later in the evening guests headed back to the beach for a private firework show, and when it was time to turn the music off Kelly and Randy handed out wireless headphones for a silent disco after party. It was amazing.\n'
p1783
asa(dp1784
g2
(dp1785
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/11/03/intimate-elopement-in-paris/'
p1786
sg20
(dp1787
g22
(lp1788
S'elopement'
p1789
asg25
(lp1790
S'summer'
p1791
asg28
(lp1792
S'black'
p1793
asg33
(lp1794
S'chapel-2'
p1795
assg36
(lp1796
S'In my humble opinion, it doesn t get any more romantic than being in France with the one you love. Crossing the globe from Perth to Paris, this couple chose the City of Lights as their destination  I do . Beautifully planned by DREAMS IN PARIS they were wed in an intimate ceremony, and Le Secret D Audrey was there to capture every lovestruck moment. Take a look at the gorgeous gallery right here. '
p1797
aS'From Le Secret D Audrey  As a photographer in Paris, I know how couples flying to Paris to get married are looking for romance. And it is exactly what I love about Paris. As a local I am always happy to stroll through the city with the newlyweds for couples photos in some of the most amazing locations Paris has to offer. When I discovered Cherie was a talented stylist in Australia, I knew her intimate elopement in Paris would be stunning. It didn t hurt she married an handsome man like Rhett. Looking at them being emotional while exchanging vows reminded me how privileged I was as a wedding photographer to witness such milestone moments in life.'
p1798
aS'From the beautiful Bride  Rhett proposed to me very intimately at the Viceroy Bali in Ubud.\n He asked me to marry him over a romantic dinner in the privacy of our beautiful villa. It was a dream setting under the stars overlooking the Valley of the Kings. Our ceremony was at Chapelle Expiatoire which is located in the 8th arrondissement of Paris. The Chapel was dedicated to King Louis XVI and his wife, Queen Marie Antoinette. Our reception dinner was at Le Cinq, Four Seasons Hotel George V Paris. Rhett and I both share the same love for Paris. The history and the beauty of the city, so when we decided we wanted to elope (just the two of us) we knew it had to be Paris. We found Chapelle Expiatoire through a blog which also led us to our amazing photographer   Audrey from Le Secret d Audrey. We didn t really think too much of the date but we knew we wanted the season to be right which is why we chose later in June as the start of June can still be cold and rainy in Paris. A mid week wedding is less crowded and the Chapel can be booked for private weddings. We wanted the wedding to be elegant, simple and timeless. For our music we had a harp in the Chapel played by Caroline Lieby. We decided to elope because we really wanted the day to be about just the two of us with no distractions, as much as we love our family and friends we really wanted this moment for us, intimate and romantic, something between only Rhett and I. I had organized a gown a year prior to getting married but unfortunately the designer did not produce the garment that was promised. So 4 weeks out till my wedding day I was without a dress and having a little melt down! A colleague of mine had worn a Karen Willis Holmes dress for her wedding and oddly enough she also had a very similar story to mine. She had told me how wonderful Karen Willis Holmes had been to her when she went through the same drama. I immediately went online and after looking on the Karen Willis Holmes website I instantly fell in love with the ready to wear collection and in particular the Anya gown. By luck they had it in stock, unfortunately it wasn t my size but after a few alterations it fitted like it was made for me! I can honestly say this was the dress I was meant to be married in and the service that I received by Prea and Karen was outstanding. I found it extremely hard to find shoes that were comfortable and simple as I didn t want any jewels that could get caught on the inside of the dress while I was walking and I also needed them to be comfortable for Paris. I found my shoes through Windsor Smith, nothing fancy but this did not matter too much to me. I wore a veil which I purchased online through Karen Willis Holmes and my earrings were chosen by my husband and purchased from Swarovski in Paris.'
p1799
aS'From DREAMS IN PARIS  Cherie & Rhett fell in love in Australia, in Perth, the city where they work and where they live together. When they decided to get married, they chose Paris, the city of love, as their wedding destination. They wanted an intimate elopement, something very special, a magical place to celebrate their love for each other and they wanted their elopement wedding in Paris to be remembered forever. Cherie got in touch with me last summer. Enough time to prepare this very important day the way she always imagined. A very elegant, simple, but sophisticated French-touch wedding, with a dreamy romantic atmosphere. And finally on her wedding day, everything was perfect: the sun, her amazing dress, the beautiful peonies in her hand, the white 1951 Bentley, her favorite song played on a harp, the light chapel  and of course Rhett next to her. Cherie and Rhett spent plenty of time in Paris by capturing the romantic flair of the French city, walked into its avenues and boulevards, discovered its historical monuments, making sightseeing and talking about their chance to have found each other   before leaving for their next adventures, starting with their honeymoon they currently spend in the South of France.\n'
p1800
aS"Photography: Le Secret D'Audrey | Event Planning: DREAMS IN PARIS | Gown: Karen Willis Holmes | Ceremony Venue: Chapelle Expiatoire | Hair And Makeup: James Harold | Officiant: Christian | Ceremony : Chapelle Expiatoire | Film Lab: Carmencita | Manicure: Pierre Arnaud | Music: Caroline Lieby | Shoes : Windsor Smith | Stylist: Cherie Tara | Tux Groom: Parker & Co - Armani Collezioni Suit"
p1801
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p1802
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p1803
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p1804
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p1805
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p1806
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p1807
aS'A ...'
p1808
aS'When ...'
p1809
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p1810
asa(dp1811
g2
(dp1812
S'Grooms Tuxedo'
p1813
S'Ralph Lauren From Selfridges, London'
p1814
sS'Bridal Dress'
p1815
S'Pronovias'
p1816
sS'Photography'
p1817
S'Anna Roussos Photography'
p1818
sS'Photography - Assistance'
p1819
S'Xavier Roussos'
p1820
sS"Flowergirl's  Fower Crown"
p1821
S'Ioanna Vamvakari Decoration'
p1822
sS'Flowergirl Dress'
p1823
S'Debenhams'
p1824
sS'Decorations And Event Planning'
p1825
S'Ioanna Vamvakari'
p1826
sS'Bridal Shoes'
p1827
S'Jimmy Choo'
p1828
sS'Grooms Shoes'
p1829
S'Russell & Bromley'
p1830
sS'Father Of The Bride & Groomsman Suits'
p1831
S'Austin Reed '
p1832
sS'Wedding Venue'
p1833
S'Kinsterna Hotel & Spa'
p1834
sS'Bridesmaid Dresses'
p1835
S'Boudi, New Bond Street London'
p1836
sS'Pageboys Outfit'
p1837
S'La Coqueta Kids'
p1838
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/10/30/organic-elegance-in-greece-at-kinsterna-hotel-spa/'
p1839
sg20
(dp1840
g22
(lp1841
S'elegant'
p1842
asg25
(lp1843
S'summer'
p1844
asg28
(lp1845
S'cream'
p1846
aS'gold'
p1847
aS'lavender'
p1848
asg33
(lp1849
S'church'
p1850
aS'hotel'
p1851
assg36
(lp1852
S'Organic elegance is my new favorite wedding style. And it might help a wee bit when said style drenches a soiree set in beautiful Greece. A locale where olive trees and ancient stone architecture dance together in the sunlight, and a Bride in Pronovias lace fits right in. Anna Roussos joined in on all the fun of this fabulous celebration and we ve got the gallery to prove it. The lovely is just a click away, my dears.'
p1853
aS'From the beautiful Bride Andrew and I met walking along the street in 2010 Great Marlborough Street, London to be precise. Little did I know then that this random but very interesting man would be the man of my dreams and more importantly the man I would eventually marry and so our nicknames were set, street boy and street girl!'
p1854
aS'Roll forward 3 years and I found a stunning hotel on Mr and Mrs Smith, hinting, as you do, that I wanted VERY much to go there! So on Sep 2013 we jetted off to what can only be described as a secret gem in the middle of no-where namely the Kinsterna Hotel & Spa, Monemvasia Greece.'
p1855
aS'Unbeknownst to me, Andrew had snuck an engagement ring in his suitcase and it was here on Sep 4th 2013 that he proposed to me in the most incredible romantic setting. The proposal was truly memorable; the most stunning array of candles and white roses I have ever seen in my life. After this, Monemvasia became our  special  place and what an enchanting place it is. We decided that it would be incredible to bring our friends and family to this secret find, so there and then we set the wedding date at Kinsterna Hotel, 6 July 2014 4 years to the date after we met.'
p1856
aS'I thought planning a wedding in Greece from London would be difficult but I was pleasantly surprised. I did not want a wedding planner, my controlling nature meant I wanted to do it all myself, I was also on a strict budget that we didn t necessarily stick to! We always thought planning a wedding abroad would be the cheapest option but it s safe to say we could have planned one for half the price back in England, it s the costs you don t see, like accommodation costs for your suppliers and  800 on legal papers so that is definitely worth thinking about when planning your budget. I was adamant that I did not want a  packaged  overseas wedding. I had a vision of exactly the wedding that I wanted to create and slowly worked with my wedding decorator, Ioanna (a local event stylist) to make sure I had a classic white affair. I fell in love with Anna Roussos, our wedding photographer as soon as I saw her work whilst searching on the internet. I instantly knew she was the one. She captures weddings in the most stunning way, almost fashion like. Anna was with us for two days, working on 3 shoots, the pool party, pre wedding dinner at Chrisovoulo Restaurant and of course the wedding!'
p1857
aS'So far so good no language difficulties at all and everyone spoke to me in English. I was panicking a little about hair and makeup, I wanted something stylish and beautiful, yet a little edgy to somehow show my own personality. It took 5 months of searching and the two stylists that I found were amazing. As we did not have time to go back to Greece before the wedding, my hair and makeup trial were done the night before scary!! Katerina and Voula pulled it off and I was ecstatic with the look they had created.'
p1858
aS'Everything ran smoothly and we now had 60 guests flying out for 5 days of fun. We flew a London club DJ out as we wanted to create an Ibiza style rave around the pool for the party, we also booked sax and bongo players from Athens who I found on facebook. My wow moment was when I walked in to the church. I had my perfect wedding in mind and as soon as I walked in I was overwhelmed. The church and flowers looked breathtaking. I wanted to stop time and just soak it all in. Ioanna had created my absolute dream wedding, a picture of white white carpet, white flowers, white candles everything pure white, like I had envisaged!! The service was in Greek in a picturesque church, as my husband is half Greek and Greek Orthodox this was a nice touch for his Greek family and something different for our English guests.'
p1859
aS'We then went back to the hotel for canap s and personalized cocktails, created when Andrew had proposed, these  his and hers cocktails  went down a treat. The dinner was divine, the chef produced a local fresh organic menu, and as my husband is a real foodie this was one of the most important parts of the day. Then came the party, yes guests jumped in to the pool and yes we danced until 6.30am with the pictures to prove it! We wish we could do it all over again. We loved every single minute of it. It was the best day of our lives so far and we feel truly blessed to have such a precious memory.\n'
p1860
asa(dp1861
g2
(dp1862
S'Wedding Cake'
p1863
S'Dreamworld Cakes'
p1864
sS"Bridesmaids Bathrobe's"
p1865
S"Victoria's Secret"
p1866
sS'J&R Lights'
p1867
S'Coco Luminaire'
p1868
sS'His & Hers Signs'
p1869
S'BHLDN'
p1870
sS'Bridal Gown'
p1871
S'Jenny Yoo (from La Jeune Mariee, Columbus)'
p1872
sS'Favours - Traditional British Candy In Kraft Bags'
p1873
S'Etsy'
p1874
sS'Stationery'
p1875
S'Emma Gay Of Yellow Door Creative'
p1876
sS'Table Decor - Sourced By Florist'
p1877
S'BHLDN'
p1878
sS'Reception Venue'
p1879
S'Middleton Lodge'
p1880
sS'Photography'
p1881
S'M And J Photography'
p1882
sS'Catering'
p1883
S'Middleton Lodge'
p1884
sS'Flower Girl Banner'
p1885
S'BHLDN'
p1886
sS'Gifts To Bridal Party - Bracelets'
p1887
S'BHLDN'
p1888
sS'Flower Girl Outfit'
p1889
S'Autograph By M&S'
p1890
sS"Bridesmaid's Totebags"
p1891
S'Not On The High Street'
p1892
sS'Belt, Hair Piece & Veil'
p1893
S'Sara Gabriel'
p1894
sS"Groom's Suit"
p1895
S'Bonobos'
p1896
sS'Shoes'
p1897
S'Saint Lauren'
p1898
sS'Bridesmaids Dresses'
p1899
S'Joanna August'
p1900
sS'Hair'
p1901
S'Claire At Contemporary Yarm'
p1902
sS'Mr & Mrs Cutlery'
p1903
S'BHLDN'
p1904
sS'Florist'
p1905
S'Sandra Rose'
p1906
sS'Cuff Links'
p1907
S'Tiffany & Co.'
p1908
sS'Guest Book'
p1909
S'Oh No Rachio'
p1910
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/10/30/charming-english-countryside-wedding-in-yorkshire/'
p1911
sg20
(dp1912
g22
(lp1913
S'elegant'
p1914
asg25
(lp1915
S'summer'
p1916
asg28
(lp1917
S'blush'
p1918
aS'gold'
p1919
aS'light-blue'
p1920
aS'light-pink'
p1921
asg33
(lp1922
S'lodge'
p1923
assg36
(lp1924
S'Since becoming a devoted Downton Abbey fan, English countryside weddings captivate me more than ever. It s something about the pomp and circumstance, not to mention the timeless charm, and this summertime affair is no exception. Sandra Rose styled the florals, M And J Photography snapped the photos, and the results? Well, let s just say it d give Lady Mary Crawley s wedding a run for its money.'
p1925
aS'From The Bride When Ross and I first got engaged, the big question was  Where was the wedding going to be?  With us living in the US, but being from two different countries it was anyone s guess where we would get married. I am originally from the northeast of England and moved over to the US over 5 years ago and Ross is Ohio born and bred, so it made picking the perfect location for our wedding a little tricky.'
p1926
aS'Without any intention yet to marry in the UK, we stumbled upon Middleton Lodge online before we had really even thought about wedding planning. We were blown away by the images of the venue and thought the place looked amazing. After a quick phone call to my parents back home, they were on their way to check it out. We knew Middleton Lodge was the perfect place to say our  I do s  so we made the decision to book the venue without even seeing it for ourselves. It was a decision we do not regret. The venue itself is breathtaking, with its quintessential British charm that has been meticulously maintained by its owners and staff. It is beautiful!'
p1927
aS'From the start, planning the wedding was easy. From finding my dress here in Ohio, to picking out the flowers and giant illuminated letters to all the other little details. We had a clear vision that we wanted the wedding to feel laid back yet elegant and romantic. It is crazy to think that we did it all from the other side of the world but walking into the marquee for our reception and seeing all the little details come together to create a beautiful setting for our big day was amazing. I wish I could have paused that moment.'
p1928
aS'The day was fabulous. The great British weather held out and we had glorious sunshine all day, our guests from the US loved experiencing some real English countryside (and other parts of Europe for those who decided to make the most of their trip and turn it into a vacation). We heard nothing but great things from all of our guests, everyone had so much fun and everything was just perfect and created such a memorable day for everyone   but especially us.'
p1929
aS'Middleton Lodge was the ideal setting to be married in grand style but with an intimate atmosphere.'
p1930
asa(dp1931
g2
(dp1932
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/30/contemporary-maui-wedding-at-sugar-beach-events/'
p1933
sg20
(dp1934
g22
(lp1935
S'elegance'
p1936
asg25
(lp1937
S'summer'
p1938
asg28
(lp1939
S'gray'
p1940
aS'purple'
p1941
asg33
(lp1942
S'ballroom'
p1943
aS'outdoor'
p1944
assg36
(lp1945
S'It s always a good day on SMP, but when one of our Little Black Bookers says I do, it s time to break out the bubbly. And trust me when I say there is a lot to toast to when it comes to the stunning Maui wedding of Lee of Sugar Beach Events. The contemporary styling, the gorgeous florals from Maui Floral, the picture perfect images from Anna Kim Photography - we ll cheers all day to this gorgeous gallery. And you can see why here.'
p1946
aS'Carl and Lee met while in the marching band at the University of South Carolina. This tall, beautiful, bold member of the color guard caught the drummer s eye performing during a Gamecock football game and they had a date in fall of 1989. It took them twenty-three years to have their second date, joining each other from halfway around the world.'
p1947
aS'Lee was living in Maui, and reconnected with Carl on Facebook. Both going through separations, their friendship was rekindled through email and texting that later turned romantic. In May 2012, the pair decided to meet for a three-day weekend in Chicago and explore the rekindling of their connection. The sparks flew, and three months later Carl moved to Maui to be with Lee. A little over a year later, the couple got engaged Christmas Eve of 2013.'
p1948
aS'Lee had been living on Maui since 2005. She moved to Maui to join her biological father, Don Nelson, who had visions of building a grand wedding venue on the coast of this gorgeous Pacific Island. Lee, a chef and restaurant management consultant prior to moving to Maui, dreamed of having a catering company.'
p1949
aS'The story gets even a little more sweet. Don Nelson is a famous basketball player and coach, a celebrated five-time national championship player and the most winning coach in NBA history. Lee, who was adopted at birth, was contacted by her biological mother at the age of 28. A friendship developed, and Lee was informed that she was conceived during a brief relationship, and that her father was unaware of her existence. You can imagine Don s surprise when thirty years later, he received a letter in the mail from his daughter. Don and his daughter united in 1997, and it was easy to see the father-daughter team had much more than genes in common.'
p1950
aS'What they manifested together was something completely unique to Maui; offering all services to a bride-in-planning at a unique location that is on one of the most beautiful long stretches of sandy beach on the island. Lee s reconnection and the planning of her dream wedding with Carl was just kismet to the story.'
p1951
aS' What I love about weddings is that you spend an amazing evening with the love of your life, surrounded by the love of family and friends. I wanted an intimate wedding that reflected our unique personalities, with something new and remarkable at every turn. I have a flair for drama, and wanted to keep elements hidden from our guests. My day truly was the day of my dreams and it was perfect for us. '
p1952
aS'Lee and Carl s is a story of love and acceptance, and the beauty that comes from the unknown: family to family, friends, bride to groom, and everything in between. We are all on the same team in the game of love.'
p1953
aS' I always think of an event or wedding celebration as a beautiful journey we invite guests to take with us from the minute they arrive until the last dance of the night. That concept became almost literal when I began to imagine how to include everything Lee loved in this perfectly decadent Mediterranean themed love fest for Lee & Carl.  Sugar Beach Event Planner Yvette Crosby'
p1954
aS'Lee wore a one-shoulder style gown in soft chiffon. The bride had wanted something different; classic, yet modern, comfortable and able to flow in the Maui breeze. She chose a short, fun reception dress to accompany the dance celebration, something that would complement the disco ball chandelier and highlight her long legs and heels. The glass beads on the reception dress caught the lights and were a crazy, sparkly dance party dream.'
p1955
aS'All in all, the wedding was an eclectic mix of design elements, style, and color, married together in a fun, playful, casually elegant, and intimate setting. It began at the entry with ribbons of purple, teal, and lime green streaming in the wind and giant LOVE letters proclaiming the theme of the day. The couple had taken a trip to Europe the year before, and loved Italy. Lee envisioned a courtyard in an Italian square, which started a vision of the Old World mixed with the contemporary. For cocktails and dinner, it was the Old World feel, with dining al fresco with a canopy of twinkling lights under the starry tropical night sky. Dancing was modern and contemporary, like a club on the French Riviera. Zebra print candle shades were the bride s favorite!'
p1956
aS'Lee emerged for her walk down the aisle like a Greek goddess stepping from a cloud of soft sheer white drapes billowing in the wind. The dramatic and romantic beginning was accented by Lee s walk down the aisle on the arms of both her fathers. She approached her Adonis groom standing in front of a modern arch draped asymmetrically to echo the lines of her gown. Simple wooden benches matched the arch and provided guest seating. Carl s father, a Baptist minister, married the couple, adding a touching and personal element to the ceremony. As Lee and Carl sealed their vows with a kiss and turned to greet their guests, a flurry of purple ribbons filled the air and repeated the ribbon celebration from the venue entrance.'
p1957
aS'On the menu was a Tuscan feast with a sophisticated focaccia bread bar, taking place under the stars reflecting the bride s love of Italian cuisine, cooking, and countryside. Cocktails were served oceanside in an Italian Riviera setting that then led guests into an outdoor dining pavilion. Starting with passed appetizers, guests were then encouraged to enjoy the anti-pasta and bread cart. Highlighting the product of The Olive Crush out of San Francisco, flavorful olive oils and balsamic vinegars were available for guests to create their own special flavors and dip to their heart s content.'
p1958
aS'Before dinner, a canoe coming from the sea at sunset surprised guests, delivering Kimokea for a special surprise blessing for the couple. Kimokea and a few attendants were barefoot and dressed in kihei (traditional Hawaiian attire of brightly colored fabric). Walking onshore and into the center of the dining area, he delivered the bride and groom a traditional Hawaiian marriage blessing through an ancient chant.'
p1959
aS'A plated salad was served, and then an action station and buffet of Italian specialties offered guests a sampling of favorites, like chicken piccata, eggplant Parmesan, steamed mussels and clams, and Kobe meatballs. The chefs created personal pasta dishes for each guest, offering pesto, alfredo, and marinara sauces to go over a choice of pastas and vegetables. The cake was a seven layer chocolate cake with lilikoi cream filling.'
p1960
aS'The draping kept the amazing lounge setup from view until after dinner when the doors opened and the band welcomed guests. The sheer drapes billowed out to welcome attendees into a Monte Carlo disco setting replete with a huge custom made disco ball chandelier, zebra candle lamps on cocktail club tables, and elegant lounge settings. A checkerboard dance floor invited everyone onto center stage, to groove to a seven piece live band. A fabulously sophisticated photo booth with a custom backdrop gave guests the chance to capture the moment in between visits to the gourmet coffee and dessert bar.'
p1961
aS'The bride had stumbled across a cake design on Pinterest that caught her eye, a bold and statement-making piece of confection art. She reached out to the designer, Cecile, who happened to be retired and living in Kauai. It was a proprietary technique that Cecile had worked on for thirty years to reach perfection. The construction of the cake was very unique in that there were smaller tiers under larger tiers, which gave a lot of dimension and depth. Lee s pastry chef, Natalie, worked with Cecile for months to recreate the cake, testing layers and sending emails back and forth in critique. A collar for the top tier and a few decorative chocolate  buttons  complemented green and purple lines on the chocolate fondant, and this chocolate cake with a lilikoi filling was a hit!\n'
p1962
aS'Photography: Anna Kim Photography | Videography: Ohana Films | Flowers: Maui Floral | Ceremony Venue: Sugar Beach Events | Reception Venue: Sugar Beach Events | Hair: Dan Sanchez Salon | Band: Shea Derrick And Full Flavor  | Cello: Sue Nuckols | Decor: Winters Events | Decor: Rio Events | Decor: Hawaiian Rents | Decor: Maui Tunes | Decor: Opihi Love | Decor: Pacific Island Rentals | Engagement Shots: Chris J. Evans Photography | Harp: Kristine Snyder | Makeup: Dacia Waller | Photo Booth: Bamboo Shootz | Public Relations: Grace Delivers Communications | Violin: Michele Ancheta'
p1963
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p1964
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p1965
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p1966
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p1967
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p1968
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p1969
aS'A ...'
p1970
aS'When ...'
p1971
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p1972
asa(dp1973
g2
(dp1974
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/29/romantic-italian-wedding-inspiration/'
p1975
sg20
(dp1976
g22
(lp1977
S'rustic'
p1978
asg25
(lp1979
S'summer'
p1980
asg28
(lp1981
S'brown'
p1982
aS'cream'
p1983
aS'green'
p1984
asg33
(lp1985
S'castle'
p1986
assg36
(lp1987
S'There s just something about Italy that makes me weak in the knees. From its  coastal cliffs to its  colorfully faded architecture, it s easy to see why Castello Brown Portofino was the perfect place for Rebecca Arthurs to capture the stylings of  Princess Wedding, those stunning florals by  Il Profumo Dei Fiori, and a perfect cake by Nana & Nana. Take a dip in the entire gallery here.'
p1988
aS'From Rebecca Arthurs Our inspiration for this shoot was born with the location: Castello Brown (Castle Brown) has an incredible panoramic view of Portofino, a Ligurian village in the north east of Italy, bordering with France, and near famous lands of Cinqueterre.'
p1989
aS'The colour palette we used in the shoot are the typical colours of this mediterranean region: With its impressive mountains and lovely rolling hills, colored by the green Mediterranean turf and overlooking the Ligurian Sea. We were inspired to use these soft green, white, cream, & natural browns.'
p1990
aS'The table was set with the rich Mediterranean culinary traditions (wine, green olives, pecorino cheese, fruit, oil) near rustic inspired stationary.'
p1991
aS'We loved to contrast the natural and Mediterranean outdoor mood with elegant props and dress at this stunning castle.\n'
p1992
aS'Photography: Rebecca Arthurs | Videographer: Pazart | Wedding Cake: Nana & Nana | Hair & Makeup: Stella - Organic Brides | Art Direction And Graphics: Cristiano Guerra - Princess Wedding | Event Design And Planning: Sara Pozzoni - Princess Wedding | Floral: Il Profumo Dei Fiori | Location: Castello Brown Portofino'
p1993
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p1994
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p1995
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p1996
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p1997
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p1998
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p1999
aS'A ...'
p2000
aS'When ...'
p2001
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p2002
asa(dp2003
g2
(dp2004
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/28/boho-chic-netherlands-wedding-at-het-reirinck/'
p2005
sg20
(dp2006
g22
(lp2007
S'rustic'
p2008
asg25
(lp2009
S'summer'
p2010
asg28
(lp2011
S'blush'
p2012
aS'khaki'
p2013
asg33
(lp2014
S'barn'
p2015
assg36
(lp2016
S'A true labor of love, this heartfelt and detail-filled Netherlands wedding beautifully captured by Youri Claessens plays out like a dream. The Bride and Groom made sure every single touch was both meaningful and styled to perfection, leaving us with a gallery that is simply overflowing with lovely. See even more here.'
p2017
aS'From The Bride From the moment that we started planning our wedding, which was about 8 months before the big day, we knew that we wanted the day to feel as a big garden party, celebrating our love for each other with all our friends and family. Our wedding day was on July 23th, which was exactly 7 years after we first met each other and fell in love while on holiday in France. We planned a summer wedding hoping that the weather would be warm and sunny, and we got lucky because it was a beautiful summer day. We really wanted to get married outside, in nature, because we both are outdoorsy people and enjoy the beauty of what nature has to offer. We wanted the wedding to portray us as individuals and as a couple. Therefore we choose the theme bohemian/vintage adding a lot of small details referring to this; a globe, suitcases, field flowers, dream catchers, feathers, Persian carpets and wooden tables.'
p2018
aS'The styling of the day was a very important element to the both of us, but we had to be crafty ourselves because we had a small budget. Therefore all garlands, dream catchers, decorated jars, bottles, bouquets, etc. were made by Jeroen and me. The inspiration we got from different wedding blogs and Pinterest. We had so much fun creating all these decorations. We also hunted a lot of second hand shops and markets to find some beautiful old decorations like candlesticks, cookie jars, vases and a lots of other things. These elements made the preparations rather stressful but it also meant that we were really involved in every part of the wedding, making the setting a reflection of who we are.'
p2019
aS'Having a smaller budget made planning the wedding a little bit more difficult sometimes but it also made inspired us to be creative and think of some very nice ideas. One of them was to ask all of our guests to make and bring a bite to eat. Some were asked to bring a main dish, others to make a dessert. We really liked this idea because we felt that it made all of the guests more involved in the wedding, but also because a very formal dinner just did not suit us at all. It turned out even better than we hoped! There were tables full of beautiful and delicious food, it really looked amazing! It was great to see that everyone put so much effort into making us a wonderful dinner.'
p2020
aS'There was only one thing that did not really stayed true to the budget, the dress. Being a girl that has dreamed about her wedding (and thus my wedding dress) since I was three years old, finding the perfect dress was very important to me. I had looked all across the internet and in some bridal shops, but because I wanted the dress to fit into the bohemian theme, I just could not find a dress that I loved and fitted into our budget. Then I read online that the best bridal shop in Holland had a sample sale and I thought to myself, I have to go. Hoping that between all these wonderful dresses I could find the perfect one and actually be able to afford it. Well, when I walked in the cheapest dress was already above budget, but I thought to myself, I m here now, let s try on some dresses. After trying on four that I thought I would like (but didn t) I tried one that I thought was beautiful, but not really me. As the consultant put the dress on me I already saw it in her face, and when I saw myself in the mirror I fell in love. This was the dress! But, it was way too expensive (more than twice my budget). Long story short, I was able to buy the dress due to a very wonderfully timed modeling job that I booked. Thank god, because once you fall in love with a wedding dress, you just have to buy it. Luckily, my fianc es suit was very well within the budget and he looked stunning in it. But then again, I think he looks good in everything.'
p2021
aS'Now some more details on the big day! We went to the location a day before with a few of our closest friends, and started with putting everything in its place, and decorating the location. We than had pizza and beers outside on the terrace, but not for long because a lot of things still needed to be done. After dinner the man went on with hanging all the lights outside and the girls started making the bouquets and flower arrangements. I was so nervous to make my own bouquet but it turned out exactly the way I wanted. It also was such a good feeling to be surrounded by all these wonderful people, seeing them put so much effort into our day. It really made us feel so special and loved.'
p2022
aS'We went to bed around midnight, but my fianc e and I could not sleep at all because some stuff needed to be done in the morning and we felt a little nervous about that. Therefore we both only got an hour of sleep but we felt so excited to start the day that we got up at 6 and started decorating again. In the end, not everything went perfect but at 10 o clock I really had to let it go because my hairdresser came to do my hair. I then put everything out of my head and enjoyed some quality time with my bridesmaids while getting ready. A lot sooner than expected the first guest started dropping in just as I put on my dress. It was about then that I started feeling very nervous, but than my dad came to see me and standing there waiting while holding his arm, really calmed me down.'
p2023
aS'Walking down the aisle towards my husband to be, hanging on closely to my father s arm was such a special moment. The ceremony went by so quick but was absolutely wonderful. We both had written a letter that we read. It was about why we wanted to marry each other and what made the other person so special. Standing there, in the sunlight, surrounded by friends and family while looking into my husband s eyes, really was magical.'
p2024
aS'After we walked down the aisle together through a rain of confetti straight towards the lemonade stand and the cake which was an amazing naked cake with edible flowers (carrot lemon flavored), the reception began. The rest of the day went by in a blur, talking to our wonderful friends and family, enjoying all the food that our guest made, dining at large wooden tables under high oak trees that were decorated with lights and garlands, listening to the wonderful speeches and getting tears in our eyes from laughter because of the funny acts our families did. It was perfect! The last hours of the evening were enjoyed by bonfires, roasting marshmallows, enjoying a water pipe while others felt more like showing some dance moves and were dancing the night away. It was even more perfect than we imagined it. Not because everything that we planned went or looked as we imagined it (because it didn t), but because the entire feeling of the day was so warm and intimate. When we looked around we only saw happy people, enjoying the food, the weather, the surroundings and the conversations they were having. It really was one of the most wonderful magical days of our lives!'
p2025
aS'For me (youri claessens) as a photographer, I loved this wedding.\n'
p2026
aS"Photography: Youri Claessens | Videographer: I Am Yours Now | Flowers: Handmade By Bride And Bridesmaids | Wedding Dress: Jenny Packham | Cake: Homemade | Bride's Shoes: Sandals From ZARA | Rings: Etsy | Bridesmaids' Dresses: ZARA & VERO MODA | Make-up: Danielle Trilsbeek | Groom's Attire: H&M | Bridsmaids Hair: Eug ne Romein | Decorations: Handmade By Bride And Groom | Flowercrowns: Indian Cress | Hair Of The Bride: Bert De Zeeuw | Vintage Decoration: Happy Vintage Rental | Wedding Venue: Het Reirinck"
p2027
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p2028
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p2029
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p2030
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p2031
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p2032
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p2033
aS'A ...'
p2034
aS'When ...'
p2035
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p2036
asa(dp2037
g2
(dp2038
S'Private House'
p2039
S'The Parsonage'
p2040
sS'Vintage Furniture'
p2041
S'Poppy Trading Company'
p2042
sS'Entertainment'
p2043
S'The Hipcats'
p2044
sS'Hair & Make Up'
p2045
S'SGRVintage'
p2046
sS'Photography'
p2047
S'Hannah Millard'
p2048
sS'Feather Chair Backs'
p2049
S'Things By Laura'
p2050
sS'Macarons'
p2051
S'Anges De Sucre'
p2052
sS'Floral Design'
p2053
S'Rose Hamson'
p2054
sS'Linen'
p2055
S'Table To Dine For'
p2056
sS'Cutlery, Crockery & Glassware'
p2057
S'Helene Millot'
p2058
sS'Event Design'
p2059
S'Jessie Thomson'
p2060
sS'Caterer'
p2061
S'Berry Blue'
p2062
sS'Marquee/Tent'
p2063
S'Artisan Marquees'
p2064
sS'Event Planning'
p2065
S'Jessie Thomson'
p2066
sS'Typewriter'
p2067
S'Penny Lane Vintage'
p2068
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/10/28/intimate-dinner-party-wedding-infused-with-vintage-glam-details/'
p2069
sg20
(dp2070
g22
(lp2071
S'vintage'
p2072
asg25
(lp2073
S'summer'
p2074
asg28
(lp2075
S'blue'
p2076
aS'blush'
p2077
aS'gold'
p2078
asg33
(lp2079
S'garden-venue'
p2080
assg36
(lp2081
S'Intimate weddings have my heart. Intimate weddings dripping in gold and vintage glam? Well, that s next level. Designed by Jessie Thomson with florals from Rose Hamson, these images from Hannah Millard are pure SMP gold. And the fact that this couple looks like they just stepped off the runway and their son rivals the cuteness of Prince George? Well, that s all bonus.'
p2082
aS'I helped this beautiful bride with partial planning; creating her a bespoke wedding design scheme and recommending fabulous suppliers, taking over wedding management in the final weeks and styling & co-ordinating everything on the day itself.'
p2083
aS'With under 30 guests the day felt so special and intimate, and dancing the night away to vintage jazz and candle light was the perfect end to a romantic sunny day.'
p2084
aS'They have the sweetest love story, and the cutest little boy  Albie  who stole the show before bedtime!\n'
p2085
asa(dp2086
g2
(dp2087
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/27/colorful-tropical-destination-wedding-in-canggu-bali-at-chalina-estate/'
p2088
sg20
(dp2089
g22
(lp2090
S'vintage-chic'
p2091
asg25
(lp2092
S'summer'
p2093
asg28
(lp2094
S'khaki'
p2095
aS'pink'
p2096
asg33
(lp2097
S'estate'
p2098
assg36
(lp2099
S'This gorgeous new Mr. and Mrs. set out to plan a wedding their guests would never forget, and I think it s safe to say that mission was accomplished. With the help of Cher Ange, they whipped up a happy and colorful Bali destination wedding that defines unforgettable. Veli Photography was behind the lens to make sure not a moment was missed, and you can see it all right here.'
p2100
aS'We embarked on our mission to throw a party that no one would soon forget. Gerard & I have always loved entertaining, so this would be our pi ce de r sistance, the icing on the cake, as it were. We organised events at our favourite places, including a little fiesta at our favourite Mexican restaurant the night before the wedding. This gave our guests the opportunity to get to know each other & really set the tone for the whole event. We wanted this intimate group of people, who would share in our day, to leave Bali having made new friends and many fond memories.'
p2101
aS'I found Pinterest to be a great source of inspiration and after much research, we knew exactly how we wanted our day to unfold. Hints of shabby vintage chic with splashes of colour that came so naturally on this tropical island. This was, after all, a celebration, and we wanted the energy from such a joyous occasion to infuse the entire event. It was going to be a personal affair, reflecting our personalities and quirks.'
p2102
aS'It wasn t long before I realised that planning a destination wedding was not going to be an easy undertaking. I, like many brides before me, was fuelled by the fervent need to plan, to book, to make our vision a reality. After a few false starts and frustrating emails back and forth with various resorts, a friend recommended a wedding planner she had heard of, Karen, from Cher Ange Wedding & Events. I was delighted with what I saw on her website; amazing locations, stunning backdrops and mouth-watering food. I contacted her immediately and the rest, as they say, is history. Karen introduced us to the cr me de la cr me of wedding vendors in Bali. For us, the holy trinity of food, photography and music would be the key to a successful day.'
p2103
aS'The ceremony and reception were both held at Chalina Estate, a fully staffed private villa in Canggu which we called home in the days leading up to the wedding. Slightly secluded & nestled between the beach and rice paddies, it was the perfect backdrop for our day. As guests entered the property, they were transported to our very own private sanctuary. We were able to incorporate Balinese touches into the day; gamelan players & Balinese dancers welcomed our guests as they arrived. Showers threatened the day, but a local rain stopper made sure that we weren t drenched as we said our vows. The staff wore traditional Balinese outfits.'
p2104
aS'Whilst we knew the reception was going to be when everyone would kick up their heels and get a little bit crazy, we wanted our ceremony to be something special, shared with our closest of family and friends. For this reason, we chose to have an  unplugged  ceremony, so that our guests could share in the intimacy of the moment with us. There would be no photos, videos or social media posts of the ceremony; that was left to the professionals. The flowers for the ceremony consisted of lightly coloured imported & local roses, hydrangea, coral ginger & cockscomb. Together with the decorations, they were subtle, understated & elegant. Once the  official  business was concluded, the tone of the day took a festive & upbeat turn, with cocktails and canap s preparing the guests for what was to come.'
p2105
aS'Vibrant flowers, fairy lights and colourful lanterns set the mood for the reception. There was no mistaking that it was going to be a fun night in this tropical wonderland. We hired a photo booth for evening, complete with props, which was a massive hit with the guests. DJ Jono, an Aussie based in Bali, spun tunes for all ages. Kiddies and grandparents alike were cutting loose on the dance floor. This, to us, is a sign of a successful party.'
p2106
aS'Being self-proclaimed foodies, Gerard & I knew that the food we served our guests had to be special. Enter M&M Innovative Concepts. From the delectable canap s served between the ceremony and reception, to the 3 course feast which included entrees of lobster & roast duck, main courses of barramundi (an Australian freshwater fish) and lamb and a dessert buffet to cater to every possible taste, every dish served by M&M was perfectly crafted and garnered compliments from everybody seated at our communal table. Cocktails flowed freely all night, and to make sure that we didn t leave anyone feeling too giddy, we served late night snacks of chorizo hot dogs.'
p2107
aS'Gerard, a photography buff himself, scoured the internet to find a photographer who would meet our lofty expectations. After toying with the idea of flying an Aussie photographer over for the day, we decided that a locally based photographer, who knew the lay of the land, would be a better option. It didn t take long to find Veli Photography, who caught our eye with his creatively composed shots that took advantage of the beautiful colours found everywhere in Bali. Together with our videographers, Balimetro, our entourage of paparazzi made sure that every moment was captured for posterity.'
p2108
aS'My dress was a beautiful off-the-rack dress by Perth designer Aurelio Costarella. I found it on my first dress shopping excursion and fell in love with it immediately. The bridesmaids  dresses were custom made, as were the suits for the groomsmen. I found exquisite flower girls  dresses online from a department store in the UK. With Karen taking care of the planning in Bali, I was able to embark on many little DIY projects, which included all the wedding stationery and a  happily ever after  sign which greeted the guests as they entered. These personal touches were present throughout the day, bonbonnieres filled with sweet treats that hark back to our childhood indulgences and programs that doubled as fans to provide relief from Bali s notorious humidity.'
p2109
aS'Our guests were treated to a night of fun, love and decadence, and in return, we got to share our big day with the people who mean the most to us. Our wedding day was everything we dreamt of and more. I know that the fond memories we now share will bring a smile to our faces for many years to come.\n'
p2110
aS"Photography: Veli Photography | Videography: Balimetro Wedding Cinematography | Event Planning: Cher Ange | Floral Design: Bloomz Fine Flowers | Wedding Dress: Aurelio Costarella | Cake: Ixora | Bride's Shoes: Nina | Jewelry: Fletcher & Grace | Catering: M&M Innovative Concepts | Groom's Shoes: G-Star | Celebrant: Bali Wedding Celebrant | Bow Ties: Gentleman & Scholar | Ceremony & Reception Venue: Chalina Estate | Flowergirl Dresses: BHS | Photobooth: Bali Snapz Photobooth | Sound & Lighting: Vision 1 | Veil: Gilded Shadows"
p2111
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p2112
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p2113
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p2114
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p2115
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p2116
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p2117
aS'A ...'
p2118
aS'When ...'
p2119
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p2120
asa(dp2121
g2
(dp2122
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/24/tuscan-wedding-inspiration-at-coselli-collection/'
p2123
sg20
(dp2124
g22
(lp2125
S'elegant'
p2126
asg25
(lp2127
S'summer'
p2128
asg28
(lp2129
S'gray'
p2130
aS'pink'
p2131
asg33
(lp2132
S'villa'
p2133
assg36
(lp2134
S'Inspiration from one of the most romantic places on the planet? We ll definitely take it. Mostly when that Tuscan pretty comes from talented folks like Cindy Salgado Wedding Design & Events with florals from Dario Benvenuti & Viviana Mioranza and the gorgeous Coselli Collection sets the scene. That s when magic happens. Each and every image snapped up by Adrian Wood is the definition of dreamy, and you can soak up every magical moment here.'
p2135
aS'I have been doing weddings in Italy since 2009, and I only work with foreign couples that are in love with Tuscany and want to tie the knot here. Couples always ask me how they can incorporate the Italian style into their wedding and mix it in with their own cultures. With that in mind, I d always wanted to create something that shows the colours, tastes, and glamour of a wedding in a  pure Italian style ; so when I met the amazing Adrian Wood, we didn t think twice about planning a photo shooting in Tuscany.'
p2136
aS'Italy is all about breathtaking landscapes, romance, art, food, fashion, and of course, great wine, so I needed to make sure to incorporate all of these elements into the shoot.'
p2137
aS'Adrian is one of the photographers whom I admire the most. He truly has a gift, and I just can t get enough of his photos. He came all the way from Greece, together with Yiannis Sotiropoulos and Nikos Dimou. They are extremely talented, professional, and super fun to work with.'
p2138
aS'The perfect setting for the shoot had to be the Coselli Collection, a marvellous villa in Lucca that not only offers a heavenly backdrop for a wedding but also only offers first-class services.'
p2139
aS'Dario Benvenuti, one of the most creative and talented floral designers in Europe, together with his lovely wife, Viviana Mioranza, created the stunning tables and did an amazing interpretation of the Italy of old traditions, combined with a touch of luxury and romance. Their attention to details was impressive, and honestly, everything they touched they transformed into a piece of art. They actually went to the antique market to find original, antique garden objects to display on the table.'
p2140
aS'These results wouldn t have been possible without the beautiful flowers of Gori Fiori, who is one of the most important flower providers in Italy and has a great and beautiful variety of flowers. The thing that I personally love about Gori Fiori is that, no matter where you are, they are able to deliver the best flowers all over Italy.'
p2141
aS'To complete the magical touches of the table, Delizia Ricevimenti provided us with the table setup and the food . And, oh my God, their food is incredibly yummy and a delight for the eyes.'
p2142
aS'Italy is so beautiful and fashionable, and the way to communicate this was by involving the best and most renowned designers in Italy. The designer Alessandra Rinaudo provided the stunning wedding dress, and her exquisite gown fit perfectly with the opulence of Villa Coselli. I was so honoured to involve Carlo Pignatelli, a very prestigious celebrity gown designer in Italy and worldwide. He provided the super elegant groom s gown.'
p2143
aS'Silvia Gerzelli did the makeup and hairstyle of our lovely model, Carolina Rosini.'
p2144
aS'Elena Pagliai from La Luna121 created the charming little favours.'
p2145
aS'So, here you go. This is our interpretation of an Italian style wedding. Hope you enjoy our  Italian job  as much as we did.\n'
p2146
aS"Photography: Adrian Wood Photography | Videographer: I Like To Movie It | Wedding Planner: Cindy Salgado Wedding Design & Events | Invitations: Il Papiro Firenze | Catering: Delizia Ricevimenti | Favors: La Luna 121 | Groom's Attire: Carlo Pignatelli | Backstage Photographer: Yiannis Sotiropoulos Photography | Bridal Couture: Alessandra Rinaudo | Flower Designers: Dario Benvenuti & Viviana Mioranza | Flower's Provider: Gori Fiori | Make-up Artist & Hairstylist: Silvia Gerzeli | Model: Fabiano Vitucci | Model: Carolina Rosini | Wedding Venue: Coselli Collection"
p2147
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p2148
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p2149
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p2150
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p2151
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p2152
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p2153
aS'A ...'
p2154
aS'When ...'
p2155
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p2156
asa(dp2157
g2
(dp2158
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/23/glam-destination-hawaii-wedding-at-andaz-maui-at-wailea/'
p2159
sg20
(dp2160
g22
(lp2161
S'bohemian'
p2162
asg25
(lp2163
S'summer'
p2164
asg28
(lp2165
S'blush'
p2166
aS'gold'
p2167
aS'gray'
p2168
asg33
(lp2169
S'hotel'
p2170
assg36
(lp2171
S'Destination weddings in Hawaii are always gorgeous. It is Hawaii after all. But this beauty designed by Opihi Love is next level pretty. With the perfect amount of coastal glam sprinkled with glitter, this gorgeous gallery from Tamiz Photography has SMP written ALL over it. See why here.'
p2172
aS'When planning a destination wedding there is so much to do from afar, making all the little details that much more important and this is where your team of vendors become so vital. I couldn t have picked a better team of people to be apart of our magical day. My coordinator helped bring my dream wedding to reality, along with the best acoustic guitarist Maui has seen, to the raddest DJ out there and to top it all off, our dream photographers captured the best moments of our lives. It all came together perfectly. From DIY gold glitter starfish, to handwritten Kate Spade place cards, to the gold margarita salt, there wasn t a place you looked without a little twinkle of shimmer. My Katie May backless dream wedding gown helped inspire my collection of  Gastby  bridesmaid dresses. Having seven different dresses created the most beautiful combination, highlighting the blush and nude color pallet. The chandeliers and flowers were the jewels of the night and it completed the romantic boho chic look I wanted to create. When remembering our wedding I hope our guests remember it as a night, that was as good as gold.\n'
p2173
aS"Photography: Tamiz Photography | Videography: Sunlit Films | Wedding Gown: Katie May | Stationery: Grizz Shop | Bridesmaid Shoes: Steve Madden | Shoes: Sergio Rossi | Calligraphy: Jo's Custom Chalkboards | DJ: Clarity Entertainment Maui | Groom's Shoes: Prada | Groom's Suit: Hugo Boss | Bridesmaid Gown: Adrianna Papell | Bridesmaid Gown: Vera Wang | Bridesmaid Gown: Rebecca Taylor | Bridesmaid Gown: BCBG Max Azria | Cake Topper: Better Off Wed | Day Of Coordination : Natalie Ryness At Andaz Maui At Wailea | Design, Florals, Photo Booth & Boutique Rentals: Opihi Love | Envelopes: Paper Accents By Laura (Etsy) | Flatware & Glassware: Set  | Garter: Be Chic Accessories | Gold Salt & Sugar: Dell Cove Spice Company | Makeup And Hair: Ry-n Shimabuku Makeup Artist  | Music: David Wolf | Officient: Minister Alapaki Terry | Place Cards: Kate Spade | Traditional Rentals: Island Rents | Veil: Nordstrom | Wedding Venue: Andaz Maui At Wailea"
p2174
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p2175
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p2176
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p2177
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p2178
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p2179
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p2180
aS'A ...'
p2181
aS'When ...'
p2182
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p2183
asa(dp2184
g2
(dp2185
S"Groom's Suit"
p2186
S'J. Lindberg  '
p2187
sS'DJ'
p2188
S'Romain Bailly '
p2189
sS'Save The Dates/Stationery/Invitation'
p2190
S"Mr. Boddington's Studio "
p2191
sS'Photography'
p2192
S'Pedro Bellido'
p2193
sS'Indian Wedding Dress'
p2194
S'Sabyasachi '
p2195
sS'White Wedding Dress '
p2196
S'Delphine Manivet '
p2197
sS'Table Stationery'
p2198
S'Caprichia Weddings & Occasions'
p2199
sS'Wedding Planning, Styling, Venue & Local Vendors '
p2200
S'Caprichia Weddings & Occasions'
p2201
sS'Wedding Website And Customized Design'
p2202
S'Una Piranha '
p2203
sS'Videography'
p2204
S'Studio Krrusel'
p2205
sS"Bride's Shoes"
p2206
S'Alexander Wang '
p2207
sS'Wedding Bands, Hairpiece, Necklace'
p2208
S'Customized Pieces By Misa Jewelry'
p2209
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/10/23/colorful-multicultural-marbella-wedding/'
p2210
sg20
(dp2211
g22
(lp2212
S'elegance'
p2213
asg25
(lp2214
S'spring'
p2215
asg28
(lp2216
S'burgundy'
p2217
aS'orange'
p2218
aS'pink'
p2219
asg33
(lp2220
S'outdoor'
p2221
assg36
(lp2222
S'Not only is this gorgeous garden-style soiree in the Marbella countryside jam-packed full of intricate and charming details, thanks to Caprichia Weddings & Occasions, but it s the most beautiful blend of culture and family. From the first stunning image to the very last, Pedro Bellido is behind every powerful capture in this gallery.'
p2223
aS'From Caprichia Weddings & Occasions Shilpa & Eguiar are an amazing couple full of energy and a positive vibe. From the minute they contacted me, I just wanted to find a dream venue for them. I couldn t help falling in love with the idea of blending the Indian, Spanish and American cultures, and celebrating a traditional Indian ceremony within a garden party feel. Having achieved such a highlight in their lives is truly fulfilling.'
p2224
aS'From the beautiful Bride Eguiar and I both met in grad school at Georgetown University. We started off as good friends and over the course of a year started to develop less platonic feelings for one another. From the beginning of the relationship, I think both of us sensed that this was a relationship for the long haul. About two and a half years of dating, we both grabbed a drink after a friend s holiday party and started joking about what our wedding would look like. After a few drinks, we both looked at each other and couldn t find any reason to not make it happen right away.'
p2225
aS'Eguiar was born and raised in the Canary Islands of Spain, and my parents were Indian immigrants that came over to the US in their 20s. We wanted to honor both our Spanish and Indian heritages, recognizing that at times they can be diametrically in opposition of one another. Spain seemed like a perfect midpoint for my relatives in India and friends in the US, while making it easier for his friends and family to travel. We settled on Marbella, Spain for its proximity to the beach, mountains and the oft-visited sites of Sevilla, Granada and Morocco.'
p2226
aS'In true Indian style, the wedding was a five-day affair, starting off with a backyard party on that Wednesday and ending with a beachside brunch on Sunday. There was a sangeet and mehndi party, as well as flamenco and traditional Andalucian horse dancing. However, for the wedding, I wanted the actual ceremony and reception to feel like an intimate backyard party, which was definitely a challenge with 240 guests coming in from all over the world.'
p2227
aS'Lucia, our wedding planner, found us the most stunning venue I have ever seen in my life, which was cliffside off the mountains, overlooking the Mediterranean Sea, Gibraltar and the coast of Morocco. I was adamant that the Hindu ceremony, dinner and dancing all be outside. The landscape was too perfect to take second fiddle to formalities. We started off the groom s baraat (the Indian procession by horse) by the gate of the house to the mandap (the traditional Hindu altar for wedding ceremonies). After our ceremony, guests had cocktail hour overlooking the Costa del Sol and the valley near the pool of the house. Dinner and dancing took place on top of a grassed terrace that oversaw the residence and the distant twinkling lights coming from the coast of Africa.'
p2228
aS'We had long tables in front of the dancefloor that way people could mingle, get to know each other and feel like they were having dinner with old friends. You could hear Spanish, English and Hindi circulating among our guests. It was truly a multicultural gathering in every sense. Lucia perfectly captured the garden party feel that I was going for, by integrating local flowers on the table, customizing menus for each of the guests with their name, and hanging lanterns over the dancefloor.'
p2229
aS'There is so much emphasis on throwing a dream wedding, which is silly, but I m fairly certain that the wedding was as close to what I imagine heaven would be   family, friends, good food, great drinks, stunning location, and dancing until sunset.'
p2230
aS'I cannot tell you how much the wedding was a hit. I still get emails from Indians, Spaniards and our friends telling them that it was a once in a lifetime experience. People have said that sincerely it was one of the most beautiful, unique weddings and that all throughout Saturday folks would say things like  they have thought of everything; they have thought of all these details . All of these comments are due to you and your teams execution.'
p2231
aS'And there is much credit due to your patience and your imagination in blending the Indian elements so perfectly. The mandap and everything surrounding the ceremony was just ideal. I cannot say enough about the venue, too. People were OBSESSED with the view from the cocktail hour, making jokes like  could you see Africa when you got married?? . I can just tell you have such perfect instincts for memorable moments.'
p2232
aS'I am so grateful to have worked with you and I am just in awe of your great ethic, your amazing classiness, your response to everything. You created the highlight of not only mine and Eguiar s life but of our parents, too.\n'
p2233
asa(dp2234
g2
(dp2235
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/22/classic-elegant-slovakia-wedding-at-hotel-albrecht/'
p2236
sg20
(dp2237
g22
(lp2238
S'elegant'
p2239
asg25
(lp2240
S'fall'
p2241
asg28
(lp2242
S'blush'
p2243
aS'gold'
p2244
aS'orange'
p2245
asg33
(lp2246
S'church'
p2247
aS'hotel'
p2248
assg36
(lp2249
S'I spend my days poring through gorgeous images, but this collection from Peter & Veronika Photography honestly took my breath away. Beautifully classic with a timeless feel, they paint the picture of a wedding that was gorgeous in every sense of the word. So it s no surprise that this gallery is stunning from the first image to the last, and you can see what I mean right here.'
p2250
aS'From The Bride I met Sveto for the first time at University, he was a 2nd year studying in a different faculty. I wasn t initially interested in a relationship, but his persistence led firstly to friendship, which very soon became the true love we cherish today. We have now been a couple for 8 years, and just recently celebrated our 1st wedding anniversary.'
p2251
aS'We have been through many of life s milestones together; we graduated from university, found our first jobs, lived and worked abroad, and of course, moved into our first apartment together. We have traveled to many wonderful destinations, creating beautiful shared memories and experiences along the way.'
p2252
aS'Three years ago Sveto was offered a job in Prague and I think that this moment was what showed him that it was time to move forward with our relationship. Sveto is not a very romantic type of guy and I knew that if he proposed to me, it would not be in a public or crowded place or during a special occasion. I was really shocked when he asked me to marry him. It took me a while to realize not only what he was asking, but also the real meaning behind the words. I felt truly happy, touched and knew how much I meant to my future husband.'
p2253
aS'Despite the fact that we hadn t talked in detail about our wedding prior to the engagement, we quickly agreed on almost all the crucial details including the style, date (which was exactly a year and a day after he proposed), venue, and number of guests. He was mainly concerned about the budget. Looking back now, he does not regret that we slightly exceeded the initial amount, and by little I mean 30 %. I am sure that every bride who reads these words understands me fully.'
p2254
aS'I had my dream of what our wedding would be like before we got engaged, and I did not made any significant changes during the planning of it. I wanted something unique which I would plan myself, and for the wedding to be elegant and classy.We made the decision not to engage any consultants or planners. In all honesty, if I could go back and change something, it would be that. I spent many evenings, emails and energy on planning everything myself, but in the end all the effort was worth it. It was a timeless wedding which will be in the minds of our guests for a long time to come.'
p2255
aS'The trickiest thing to organize was the venue. We both like classy, boutique restaurants, but it took us some time to find what we wanted in Bratislava, Slovakia. There are many chateaux, locations with vast, beautiful gardens and rustic buildings, but none of the ones we visited made such an impression on us as Hotel Albrecht The moment we walked through the doors, we knew it was the one. We both went quiet, had smiles on our faces, then after a few moments just looked at each other knowing that our decision had been made.We were informed by the manager that one of the best Czech-Slovak cooks would be available for our date and he would be delighted to select the wedding menu with us. Our expectations were exceeded, we were so lucky. All decorations and flowers for the day were made by Moru ka design. Thanks to them I had the most beautiful bridal bouquet ever. It was a combination of pink and white Gypsophila (Baby s-Breath). They also used this extraordinary flower for the table centerpieces. Huge balls of Gypsophila were placed in high vases inside which were colorful fish. Candles and lanterns were everywhere. It really was like a scene from a fairy tale.'
p2256
aS'Our traditional ceremony took place in St. Martin s Cathedral, which is is the largest and finest, as well as one of the oldest churches, in Bratislava, Slovakia. We had a full house and despite the rain, people waited to congratulate the newly-weds. Standing in such a beautiful cathedral, walking to the altar on my father s arm and finally saying yes to the person I love most in the world, my husband was so touched and moved that both our voices were shaking during our vows. This moment was of course one of the most emotional either of us has ever experienced.'
p2257
aS'When my husband saw me walking down the aisle to him in the cathedral and caught sight of my wedding dress, he was blown away. After several weeks of preparation starting with drafting the dress on a sketchpad and numerous visits and fittings, I was truly honored by his reaction, and that of other guests as well.'
p2258
aS'I visited several bridal salons, but did not find the right dress for me. I wanted some element from each dress, but none of them were the whole package. After several brainstorming sessions with my closest girlfriends, I decided to go to a fashion designer. I chose Jana Pistejova, one of the most famous Slovakian designers. Her dresses emphasize femininity and beauty, but they are still sexy.She works beautifully with lace and I knew that a dress made by her would exactly capture me.'
p2259
aS'After midnight I decided to wear a second wedding dress. A dress that my mother wore almost 40 years before for her own wedding day. It was a very emotional moment for both of us. On my side were feelings of pride and honor to wear such a dress, and for my mother it was a strong emotive experience to see her daughter wearing her wedding dress.'
p2260
aS'You always need to keep in mind what things are important about your wedding for both of you and insist on them. These items made the wedding special and unique for us. Do not follow the crowd, instead look for something which describes and reflects you. Your wedding must have something from you, and it is more than likely that it will remain one of the most emotional experiences for the rest of your lives.\n'
p2261
aS"Photography: Peter & Veronika Photography | Event Design: Moruska Design | Floral Design: Moruska Design | Floral Design: Rhapis | Wedding Dress: Jana Pistejova | Cake: Torticky | Bride's shoes: Dolce and Gabbana | Bridesmaids' Dresses: Next | Hair: Patrik Susi Vesely | Groom's Attire: Lydia Eckhardt | Groom's shoes: Baldinini | Place for wedding portraits: Wiegerova vila | Sweets: Giraffe Bakery | Underwear: Agent provocateur | Venue: Hotel Albrecht | Wedding Music: Maria Kmetova"
p2262
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p2263
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p2264
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p2265
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p2266
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p2267
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p2268
aS'A ...'
p2269
aS'When ...'
p2270
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p2271
asa(dp2272
g2
(dp2273
S'Wedding Dress'
p2274
S'Alexander McQueen'
p2275
sS'Villa '
p2276
S'Vignamaggio '
p2277
sS'Hair And Make Up'
p2278
S'Lara Navarrini'
p2279
sS'Wedding Planner And Designer'
p2280
S'SposiamoVi'
p2281
sS'Photography'
p2282
S'Lisa Poggi Photography'
p2283
sS'Bridal Shoes'
p2284
S'Miu Miu'
p2285
sS'Cinematography '
p2286
S'Matteo Castelluccia Videomaker'
p2287
sS'Flowers'
p2288
S'La Rosa Canina'
p2289
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/10/22/fashionable-elopement-in-tuscany/'
p2290
sg20
(dp2291
g22
(lp2292
S'elegant'
p2293
asg25
(lp2294
S'summer'
p2295
asg28
(lp2296
S'blush'
p2297
aS'gray'
p2298
aS'peach'
p2299
asg33
(lp2300
S'villa'
p2301
assg36
(lp2302
S'If I had the chance to wedding plan all over again, this Italian elopement is exactly what I d do. Set in the most charming town hall, with their parents to bear witness, it s exactly what intimate, wildly romantic nuptials are all about. SposiamoVi planned every moment and Lisa Poggi and Matteo Castelluccia captured to perfection. More photos (and that high-low McQueen gown!) waiting here.'
p2303
aS'From The Bride I don t always go for the  bigger is better  theory. That s why, when Simon and I got engaged, we agreed to keep things intimate and romantic. What better way to honor that agreement than to escape to the Tuscan hills of Italy and elope! I did some online research and found SposiamoVi, premier Italian wedding planners, and got in touch with them straight away. They got back to me immediately, and we started planning '
p2304
aS'From SposiamoVi Hailing from Australia, Catherine and Simon wanted to plan their elopement during their trip to Italy in early September, 2013, with their parents as witnesses. A wildly romantic plan, and one that left us all starry-eyed. We got straight to work. Through Skype, email, and Pintrest we were able to share inspirational wedding photos and ideas with Catherine.'
p2305
aS'After a careful search we were able to secure the age-old town hall in Radda, Chianti and the beautiful fourteenth century Villa Vignamaggio. Radda is a medieval village that is set snugly into the Chianti hills and encircled by forests, olive groves, and vineyards.'
p2306
aS'Villa Vignamaggio is a venue that sits upon a hill top and overlooks the surrounding vineyards and wineries. SposiamoVi has a long standing relationship with the Villa, and it was the perfect location for the accommodations and reception of this quiet gathering.'
p2307
aS'At last, the wedding day had come! Catherine   assisted by her mother, hair and makeup artist, and her personal SposiamoVi wedding planner   could finally don her fabulous high-low Alexander McQueen gown and silver Miu Miu t-strap platform open toe sandals, complete with sparkling cut glass heels.'
p2308
aS'Simon looked very handsome in his stylish light blue suit and polka-dot bowtie. And, as he waited anxiously for his bride, her bouquet of fresh flowers and greenery from La Rosa Canina in hand, his mother attached his boutonniere to the lapel of his suit.'
p2309
aS'As soon as she was ready, Catherine met Simon, her parents and his parents in the Villa s elegant main reception room. After a few more pre-wedding photographs from renowned photographer Lisa Poggi and some additional video footage from respected wedding videographer Matteo Castelluccia, Simon s and Catheirne s parents got into a luxury taxi and made their way into Radda. Shortly thereafter, Catherine s father escorted the bride into a vintage Fiat convertible and drove them to the town hall.'
p2310
aS'Arriving at their destination, Catherine was met by curious and appreciative on-lookers. Simon went on into the town hall s loggia to meet up with his parents, while Catherine and her parents lingered just a bit before walking into the loggia to a waiting Simon. Their civil ceremony was peppered with much laughter and even a few tears. After they were pronounced  man and wife , Catherine and Simon s parents showered them with rose petals upon the town hall s ancient stone stairs. The six of them then strolled in the warm Tuscan sunshine to a nearby terrace for champagne and hors d oeuvres, sitting under a sun umbrella and overlooking the sparkling blue-green Mediterranean sea.'
p2311
aS'Back at Villa Vignamaggio, the SposiamoVi team was hard at work, transforming one of the Villa s wine cellar into a cozy, culinary haven. Making sure that the dining table was set for dinner with antique lace tablecloth, fine dinnerware, tall candelabra, fresh flowers from La Rosa Canina, and small candles scattered artfully about the table setting. Soft accent lighting from the venerable chandelier above the dining table completed the romantic, intimate ambience.'
p2312
aS'Before coming to dinner, the bride changed into yet another wonderful Alexander McQueen creation. This one playful with a plunging back, lace accents, and short organza ruffles. Catherine, Simon and their parents enjoyed a delicious Tuscan meal together; each course topped off with a different wine, selected from the Villa s own vineyard. After dinner the newlyweds cut their cake, and then enjoyed a private dance among the French oak wine casks in the Villa s aged wine cellar; the photographer and videographer capturing each move, each loving moment.'
p2313
aS'This was truly an experience that Catherine, Simon, and their parents will look back on for years to come with broad smiles on their faces. A fabulous location, an intimate setting, a charming couple, and loads of love!\n'
p2314
asa(dp2315
g2
(dp2316
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/21/rustic-elegance-wedding-inspiration-in-england-at-almonry-barn/'
p2317
sg20
(dp2318
g22
(lp2319
S'rustic-elegance'
p2320
asg25
(lp2321
S'summer'
p2322
asg28
(lp2323
S'pink'
p2324
aS'red'
p2325
asg33
(lp2326
S'barn'
p2327
assg36
(lp2328
S'If I could, I would crawl into these gorgeous images from Naomi Kenton and never leave. Because the styling and florals from Amber Persia are next level pretty. With the oldest barn in England setting the scene, this gallery is one you ll want to sit with awhile, and you can do so right here. '
p2329
aS'Almonry Barn is a Scheduled Ancient Monument (the same historical league as Stonehenge) and has been standing for over 800 years.'
p2330
aS'The barn is the oldest wedding barn in England!'
p2331
aS'It was once part of a beautiful abbey   the ruins of which stand opposite   and was used by the monks to give  alms  to passing pilgrims.'
p2332
aS'This inspiration shoot offers a relaxed elegance with subtle styling details tying the look together; beautiful hand written place cards, linen napkins, and engraved water glasses, all set against the backdrop of the ancient stone walls.'
p2333
aS'For the outside setting, the weather worn table and bench, raw linen table runner and Edwardian etched glasses and decanter give the table setting the perfect combination of relaxed style and understated glamour.'
p2334
aS'From our florist and stylist Amber Persia  I wanted the flowers to blend into the setting, so I went for meadow-like arrangements, which included ferns and wild flowers in gorgeous aged garden urns .'
p2335
aS'The drinks table continued the restrained palette of muted greens and whites with glasses of chilled sparkling water, topped with fresh lime and decorated with slices of cucumber.'
p2336
aS'Whilst inside the barn, wild strawberries found growing in the cutting garden were the inspiration to create a quintessentially English summer wedding.'
p2337
aS'The striking magenta dahlias contrast against wonderfully fragrant and truly beautiful roses in hues of pink and white. Sweet peas and fragrant herbs not only add to the garden feel but also bring further scent to the arrangements.'
p2338
aS'Summer fruit features prominently in the styling, from the wild strawberries in the urn planters and individual fruit on each guest s place setting, to the piles of fruit in hand-made wooden punnets.'
p2339
aS'This shoot was all about celebrating the natural beauty, serenity and pared-back luxury of this amazing historical setting for a wedding.'
p2340
aS'Our gorgeous model is Louise Wilson-Ward, who owns Almonry Barn. Louise is a bride-to-be herself   and can t wait to get married at home at the barn next year.'
p2341
aS'The two fabulous pooches are Louise s dogs, Woofy and Wally   because who doesn t love a cute doggy at a wedding!\n'
p2342
aS'Photography: Naomi Kenton | Wedding Dress: Laure De Sagazan (from The Mews Bridal Gowns Of Clifton Village) | Calligraphy : Lamplighter London | Florist & Styling: Amber Persia | Wedding Venue: Almonry Barn'
p2343
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p2344
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p2345
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p2346
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p2347
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p2348
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p2349
aS'A ...'
p2350
aS'When ...'
p2351
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p2352
asa(dp2353
g2
(dp2354
S'Wedding Dress'
p2355
S'Claire Pettibone'
p2356
sS'Venue'
p2357
S'Private Residence'
p2358
sS'Photography'
p2359
S'Wendy Laurel'
p2360
sS'Bracelet'
p2361
S'Anthropologie'
p2362
sS'Hair Piece'
p2363
S'Hushed Commotion'
p2364
sS'Invitation'
p2365
S'Miss B Calligraphy'
p2366
sS'Cake'
p2367
S'Maui Sweet Cakes'
p2368
sS'Wedding Planner'
p2369
S'Couture Events Maui'
p2370
sS'Veil'
p2371
S'Hushed Commotion'
p2372
sS'Floral Design'
p2373
S'Mandy Grace Design'
p2374
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/10/17/vibrant-hawaiian-plantation-wedding-inspiration/'
p2375
sg20
(dp2376
g22
(lp2377
S'bohemian'
p2378
asg25
(lp2379
S'summer'
p2380
asg28
(lp2381
S'blush'
p2382
aS'coral'
p2383
aS'yellow'
p2384
asg33
(lp2385
S'plantation'
p2386
assg36
(lp2387
S'We ve come to the end of another pretty week darlings. That s right, we re mere hours away from the Friday evening festivities. But before you go mixing that fancy little cocktail you re craving, might I suggest you get a little color happy with this beauty of a shoot from Wendy Laurel, inspired by Claire Pettibone s stunning fall collection. I m ready to take a bite out of those scrumptious florals from Mandy Grace Design myself. Get your Hawaiian vibe on in this brilliant gallery, and happy weekending!'
p2388
aS'From Wendy Laurel A white Hawaiian plantation home seemed the perfect backdrop for the two lovely Claire Pettibone gowns from her 2014 Fall collection. Inspired by a yellow plate we found, we put together the place setting using a weather piece of white wood for a charger, white plates with the pop of yellow and mismatched antique silver. White wood, pops of yellow and blue, a rustic but clean whitewashed look is a Hawaaiana look we love.\n'
p2389
asa(dp2390
g2
(dp2391
S'Makeup '
p2392
S'Jessica Waite Makeup Artistry'
p2393
sS'Calligraphy'
p2394
S'Miss B Calligraphy'
p2395
sS'DJ'
p2396
S'Ace Beats'
p2397
sS'Paper Suite & Brandig Design'
p2398
S'Alexis June Creative'
p2399
sS'Reception Venue'
p2400
S'Haiku Mill'
p2401
sS'Photography'
p2402
S'Anna Kim Photography'
p2403
sS'Catering'
p2404
S'Maui Executive Catering Company'
p2405
sS'Hair'
p2406
S'Jessica Waite Makeup Artistry'
p2407
sS'Bar Service'
p2408
S'Garnish Events'
p2409
sS'Videography '
p2410
S'Cine Maui Studio '
p2411
sS'Cake'
p2412
S'Ghiselani Designer Cakes'
p2413
sS'Rentals'
p2414
S'Island Rents'
p2415
sS'Ceremony Venue'
p2416
S'Haiku Mill'
p2417
sS'Floral Design'
p2418
S'Teresa Sena Designs'
p2419
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/10/17/magical-destination-wedding-at-haiku-mill/'
p2420
sg20
(dp2421
g22
(lp2422
S'elegance'
p2423
asg25
(lp2424
S'summer'
p2425
asg28
(lp2426
S'gold'
p2427
aS'gray'
p2428
aS'ivory'
p2429
asg33
(lp2430
S'mill'
p2431
assg36
(lp2432
S'A Maui destination wedding is like a romantic, sunny vacation wrapped inside a beautiful celebration. And that, my friends, is a thing of beauty. Of, course, Haiku Mill takes island romance to a whole new level of magic with chandeliers strung from palm trees and old stone walls covered in lush greenery made even more beautiful at the hands of Teresa Sena Designs and Anna Kim Photography. Click here for more!'
p2433
asa(dp2434
g2
(dp2435
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/17/elegant-beach-wedding-in-punta-mita-mexico/'
p2436
sg20
(dp2437
g22
(lp2438
S'destination'
p2439
asg25
(lp2440
S'winter'
p2441
asg28
(lp2442
S'green'
p2443
aS'purple'
p2444
asg33
(lp2445
S'beach'
p2446
assg36
(lp2447
S'Toes in the sand, gorgeous florals covering every nook and cranny, and chandeliers hanging from the trees. If that sounds like an absolute dream come true (and it totally does for me), then this wedding designed by Sea Of Dreams Weddings and captured by Joann Arruda is going to seriously make your day. It s image after image of pure pretty, and you can see it all here.'
p2448
aS'From the Bride Dave actually surprised me by popping the question on a freezing beach (I didn t want to get out of the car!) in Martha s Vineyard where we spend as much time as we can in our little home with our big dog.  Dave and I have been together for almost five years and as much as we both loved the Vineyard we both wanted 3 things, to get married on the beach, a small intimate wedding and a place to visit on our 5 year anniversary.  I 35 and Dave 45, have been to a lot of weddings and really wanted our wedding to be an experience shared and not rushed, a time where we remembered conversations, laugh s and experiences outside of just the ceremony and reception, therefore we choose a long weekend extravaganza, with the actual wedding on December 7th in Punta Mita Mexico.  It was a difficult decision, as we knew many friends and family would not be able to make the trip but we also knew that they loved and supported us from whatever vantage point they were on that day and for our life together.'
p2449
aS' I never grew up wanting a big fancy dress and a big fancy wedding.  I actually never fanaticized about my wedding at all.  So when I was faced with the absolute fact we would have to come up some ideas it was a bit daunting, all the wedding magazines and websites!  Finally  I came across a picture of a chandelier hanging from a tree and I fell in love.  I always wanted a big tree in my wedding since I had visited Jamaica s Montego Bay s Almond Tree beach bar back in college (with my BF/ now one and only bridesmaid) it always stuck with me, how cool a tree on the beach!  Dave loved the idea of The Tree of Life and I think this idea spoke to him also, which was great.  We didn t want a formal wedding, but elements of shabby chic mixed with a crazy idea (Chandeliers hanging from tree s) that just made it relaxed yet classy and comfortable (shoe s off everyone!)'
p2450
aS' When you have a destination wedding you figure out pretty quickly that you can t ship everything you want, and you can t have everything you want so the crazy theme before stated, was somehow translated to our BRILLIANT wedding planner Yazmin via Pinterest.  On our site visit she had the most amazing chandeliers, we showed her pictures of flowers we loved and we wanted to incorporate succulents for greenery into the mix. We like different sized, colored antique looking glass vases, the simplicity of small details we craved such as luggage tags as place settings, first dance to sparklers, floating sky lanterns as a tribute to the wonderful grandmothers we both had and just basically how we wanted our wedding to be memorable to everyone in a different way, something that touched them and they would keep with them.  Our color was different shades of purples, pinks and creams however we didn t really focus on that too much, ha Dave even forgot the Men s ties so luckily I had packed 4 of his purple ties and it all worked out just dandy.'
p2451
aS' We didn t taste the cake before or see the actual flowers, we didn t touch the linens or even give the DJ a real specified list of songs but somehow not one thing was done less than if I had done all of those things myself.  Now you might think, oh she s the kind of bride who would go along with anything and be happy, not so my friend, not so.  I can tell you that I sent thousands of emails, had spreadsheets that almost divorced me before I was married and had  a few  pages on pintrest so I was definitely into communicating what we wanted for our special day.'
p2452
aS' Oh and also, the days leading up to our wedding were magical spending time with family from Ireland and friends we hadn t seen in years!  My  Husbands  family had a bright and fun Mexican themed beach party for our welcome dinner the Friday night before for all our guest including a 12 piece Mariachi band that were out of this world and incredibly memorable.  We had a pool party on the Thursday afternoon to get the party started and show our appreciation for all of those who had traveled many many miles to be with us on our special day.\n Our wedding and days leading up to it was a perfect celebration of who we are separately and who we are together. I wouldn t change a thing (even the cigar roller who Dave snuck in the night before .sneaky cat.)\n'
p2453
aS"Photography: Joann Arruda Photography | DJ:  Edwin Uribe | Acoustic Musical Trio:  Trio Acapulco | Floral Design : Francisco Salazar  | Hair + Make-Up: Funky Diva Hair-Rebecca D'Este | Lights & Dance Floor : Curiel Productiones  | Mariachi: Real De America | Rehearsal Dinner: Four Seasons Punta De Mita | Wedding Ceremony + Reception: St Regis Punta Mita | Wedding Design + Planning: Sea Of Dreams Weddings"
p2454
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p2455
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p2456
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p2457
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p2458
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p2459
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p2460
aS'A ...'
p2461
aS'When ...'
p2462
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p2463
asa(dp2464
g2
(dp2465
S'Boat Cruise'
p2466
S'Canauxrama'
p2467
sS'Transportation'
p2468
S'Classic Rents'
p2469
sS"Groom's Attire"
p2470
S'Anthony Franco'
p2471
sS'Wedding Dress'
p2472
S'Pronovias'
p2473
sS'Shoes'
p2474
S'Jimmy Choo'
p2475
sS'Photography'
p2476
S'Ian Holmes'
p2477
sS'Invitations & Paper Goods'
p2478
S"Heather O'Brien"
p2479
sS'Makeup'
p2480
S'Sanni Sorma'
p2481
sS'Bus Rental'
p2482
S'France Tourisme'
p2483
sS'Hair '
p2484
S'Sonja Stein'
p2485
sS'Ceremony & Reception Venue'
p2486
S'Maison Des Polytechniciens'
p2487
sS'Ceremony Music'
p2488
S'Ivana Strings'
p2489
sS'Cake'
p2490
S'Dalloyau'
p2491
sS"Groom's Shoes"
p2492
S'Cole Haan'
p2493
sS'Wedding Planner'
p2494
S'Bride & Adair Currie'
p2495
sS'Floral Design'
p2496
S'Dairing Events - Adair Currie'
p2497
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/10/15/romantic-spring-destination-wedding-in-paris/'
p2498
sg20
(dp2499
g22
(lp2500
S'destination'
p2501
asg25
(lp2502
S'spring'
p2503
asg28
(lp2504
S'blush'
p2505
aS'gold'
p2506
aS'navy'
p2507
asg33
(lp2508
S'ballroom'
p2509
assg36
(lp2510
S'Escaping to Paris with the one you love? That s about as good as it gets. But do it with makeup guru Sanni Sorma and photo genius Ian Holmes by your side, and you ll get a destination  I do  with pin-worthy moments from start to finish. It s just the ticket to wrap up this Wedding Wednesday, and the pretty goes on in the gallery right here.'
p2511
aS'From The Bride  Nobody can deny that marrying your best friend is one of the most special moments in life but having the opportunity to marry him in Paris in undeniably the most romantic thing in this world. At least it was for me '
p2512
aS'Everyone asks, why Paris?'
p2513
aS'I should start by saying it was not a life long dream for me to wed in Paris. In fact, I had visited Paris as a teenager and wasn t a huge fan. But, when I met Tim (hubs), I learned very quickly that traveling to Paris was on his bucket list. So, I knew we would go there together at some point and was curious to revisit the City of Lights as an adult! The thought never crossed my mind that we would one day marry there.'
p2514
aS'We looked into venues all over California and nothing clicked. We were waiting for that place we would walk into and just  know , because everyone told us that would happen. After nearly a year of searching, I was beginning to feel like we were going to turn into that couple who was engaged for life. Then, one day while searching the Internet for new ideas, I came across a wedding photo of a couple in Paris and fell in love. At that point, I knew there were no other options. Voila, our search had ended.'
p2515
aS'Six short months later, we arrived in Paris with 48 of our closest family and friends. While we did hire a wedding planner, we did most of the work ourselves via the Internet & I have to say, I was pleasantly surprised at how well things turned out! Thank you Style Me Pretty for all your inspiring posts!!!'
p2516
aS'Our adventure began on Friday evening with a group picnic at Champs De Mars, where we enjoyed baguettes, cheese, fruit & wine. Then, we all hopped on a double decker bus for a private tour of the city. It was fantastic! Everyone sat up top and took in the scenery of Paris while catching up with old friends and making new ones. We had the bus drop us off at Hotel Balzac, where we continued the party over cocktails.'
p2517
aS'Saturday, we met our guests in the 12th Arrondissement where we set off on an evening cruise of the river Seine. We were blessed with great weather and a beautiful sunset. Truly, there is no better way to see the sights of Paris.'
p2518
aS'It seemed like Sunday arrived in a flash! Tim and I decided to do a first look so we would have more time to celebrate with our family and friends. We rented a classic Rolls Royce for the occasion and I quickly learned how hard it was to get in and out of a car in a wedding dress! We visited the Louvre and a couple other locations for photos before stopping at a caf  for a quick pre wedding cocktail.'
p2519
aS'From the moment we stepped into our venue, it was magical. I found Maison Des Polytechniciens online while searching for a reception location & was blown away by the intricate details of the interior. Tim and I also really wanted a small intimate wedding & we were lucky enough to get the entire venue to ourselves. Therefore, we decided to host both the ceremony and reception there.'
p2520
aS'Paris was everything we had dreamed of and more. What we loved most was that we were able to spend quality time with each and everyone one of our guests over the weekend. We got to enjoy watching my Mom experience her first trip to Europe, hear stories of friends reconnecting with their husbands over their travels, and got to witness the magic of Paris through my 8 year old cousin s eyes. And, just as we hoped, by the time we hit the reception, all 50 of us were family.'
p2521
aS'The night ended with us sneaking a quick trip to the Eiffel Tower for a photo, while our guests took a dance break from dinner. We came back, ate croquembouche, and then cabbed it to the nightclub Queen to dance because what else would you do in Paris?!\n'
p2522
asa(dp2523
g2
(dp2524
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/14/destination-wedding-in-tunisia/'
p2525
sg20
(dp2526
g22
(lp2527
S'destination'
p2528
asg25
(lp2529
S'spring'
p2530
asg28
(lp2531
S'lavender'
p2532
aS'light-pink'
p2533
asg33
(lp2534
S'villa'
p2535
assg36
(lp2536
S'Dear bride and groom, if you decide to renew your vows in a few years I hope you have room for a few more guests. I know a several SMP staffers that might start lobbying for an invite. We re smitten and there s no going back. Seriously, a bougainvillea drenched courtyard, a beyond perfect dress, a ridiculously gorgeous couple, and it s all captured beautifully by Emm & Clau!!?? Heaven. And it s all right here in the gallery.\n'
p2537
aS'Planning started 6 months before the wedding date, and only now do I truly understand why a wedding planner is the essential ingredient to a successful destination wedding. However I was lucky and blessed enough to have a secret wedding planner hidden in my husband combined with the most supportive family who were involved in putting together all the small details that made our wedding picture-perfect. Much of the decorative details were flown over from Dubai, America, Australia and London, including hand made table runners, the cake topper, personalized stamps, straws and our invitations. On the wedding day we were expecting approximately 80 guests. The visitors had started arriving in Tunisia a week before and some stayed on for at least a week after the wedding to make the most of everything the country had to offer. We ran around for the days beforehand catching up with the excited travelers and introducing each other to members of our extended families and intimate friends. '
p2538
aS'The wedding day: For me one of the most special parts, was seeing all the decorative details come together; I had spent years looking through and collecting wedding magazines, hours on pinterest and wedding blogs; and finally all of the time and effort put into every detail became more than worth it. Our wedding was a truly perfect and magical day; being surrounded by the family and friends we love the most was an overwhelming and beautiful experience that shall never be forgotten.\n'
p2539
aS"Photography: Emm&Clau | Floral Design: El Firma | Wedding Dress: Pronovias | Shoes: Alice And Olivia | Bracelet: Elie Saab | Bridesmaids' Dresses: Pronovias | Groom's Shoes: Paul Smith  | Earrings: Swaroski  | Hotel: Villa Didon In Carthage | Necklace : Elie Saab | Suit: Sacoor Brothers In Dubai | Tie: Pink | Wedding Venue: El Firma   La Soukra"
p2540
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p2541
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p2542
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p2543
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p2544
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p2545
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p2546
aS'A ...'
p2547
aS'When ...'
p2548
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p2549
asa(dp2550
g2
(dp2551
S'Wedding Dress'
p2552
S'Diane Lelys'
p2553
sS'Shoes'
p2554
S'Christian Louboutin'
p2555
sS'Food'
p2556
S'Marroux Traiteur'
p2557
sS'Photography'
p2558
S'Pretty Days - Thierry Joubert'
p2559
sS'Mas De La Rose'
p2560
S'Mas De La Rose'
p2561
sS'Video'
p2562
S'Weddream'
p2563
sS'Officiating Ceremony'
p2564
S'Rabbin Hall'
p2565
sS"Groom's Attire"
p2566
S'Profilo Italiano - Chez Beppe'
p2567
sS'Floral Design'
p2568
S'Fleuriste Bucolique - Marina'
p2569
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/10/13/organic-rustic-provence-wedding/'
p2570
sg20
(dp2571
g22
(lp2572
S'rustic'
p2573
asg25
(lp2574
S'summer'
p2575
asg28
(lp2576
S'blush'
p2577
aS'navy'
p2578
aS'peach'
p2579
asg33
(lp2580
S'hotel'
p2581
assg36
(lp2582
S'Where do I begin with this absolute slice of pretty. The graceful Provence countryside, the gorgeous organic details woven in, the bits of quirky fun that balance out the elegance in such a lovely way  it s captivating to say the least, and we have Pretty Days to thank for this entire gallery of goodness.'
p2583
aS'From Pretty Days   Thierry Joubert A sublime area at the gates of the Luberon, a lovely couple, a sunny day   This ceremony filled with emotion, Sarah s work for a year to set up this sublime decoration, the work of Francisco to restore this old car. Thank you to Sarah & Francisco for their smiles and kindness.\n'
p2584
asa(dp2585
g2
(dp2586
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/10/whimsical-maui-destination-wedding-at-merrimans/'
p2587
sg20
(dp2588
g22
(lp2589
S'elegant'
p2590
asg25
(lp2591
S'spring'
p2592
asg28
(lp2593
S'gray'
p2594
aS'mint-2'
p2595
aS'pink'
p2596
asg33
(lp2597
S'restaurant'
p2598
assg36
(lp2599
S'Every single detail of this stunning Maui wedding was curated with so much love by the Bride and her talented team of vendors it s impossible not to fall head over heels for this pretty little f te. From the sweet SJP shoes signed by Sarah Jessica Parker herself (amazing), to the gorgeous palette and whimsical touches   this gallery from the talented Jana Morgan is overflowing with gorgeous, and you can see it all here.'
p2600
aS'On our venue-scouting trip, we absolutely loved Merriman s Restaurant which is situated on the incredibly beautiful Kapalua Bay. Their food was to die for, so it was the best of both worlds- the perfect venue that also happened to be an amazing caterer (best Caesar salad, pork sliders, and filet mignon you ll ever have!). Once the venue was booked, all the other planning seemed to just fall into place.'
p2601
aS'I spent all the months leading up to the wedding browsing on Pinterest, searching Etsy for anything wedding-related, and checking Style Me Pretty and SMP Destination daily. My favorite SMP wedding was the color inspiration for our big day. Once I found Donna Morgan s  Spearmint  colored bridesmaid dresses, that guided a lot of the other choices. I found the perfect Sarah Jessica Parker shoes to wear that matched my bridesmaids  dresses, and I even had SJP herself sign them while she was in Seattle. I envisioned the beautiful blue-green color with different shades of pink peonies, garden roses, and cymbidium orchids. I wanted our wedding to be bright, fun, and whimsical and chose chevron details to go along with the bright color palette.'
p2602
aS'We also wanted a lot of personal touches to our wedding. We had custom welcome totes designed by an Etsy seller and filled them with Maui goodies to give our guests as they arrived on the island. I found the cutest cake toppers on Etsy and had one personalized for us- a nurse and a sheriff s deputy. I also found a bouquet charm on Etsy, the perfect way to incorporate my grandparents who had both passed away in the last year and a half. Our guestbook, also found on Etsy (big surprise, right?), gave a nod toward our home state as well as where our nuptials took place.'
p2603
aS'The day-of really did go by just as fast as everyone says it does. I was so glad we had planned a day-after Trash-The-Dress session with our photographer. That way we were able to relax a little about getting certain shots and just enjoy more time with family and friends during cocktail hour. Overall, our wedding week was a blur of happiness and turned out everything we ever wanted and more. And now we have the perfect excuse to always go back and visit Maui!\n'
p2604
aS"Photography: Jana Morgan Photography | Floral Design: Dellables | Wedding Dress: Blue By Enzoani | Cake: Maui Wedding Cakes | Bride's Shoes: Sarah Jessica Parker | Bridesmaids' Dresses: Donna Morgan | Hair & Makeup: Maui Makeup Artistry | Calligraphy: Miss B Calligraphy | Favors: Honolulu Cookie Company | Bouquet Charm: KCowie | Bride's Necklace: Vintage Mikimoto | Bride's Robe: Love Ophelia | Bridesmaid's Earrings: Kendra Scott | Bridesmaid's Robes: Plum Pretty Sugar | Cake Topper: Mudcards | Garters: Kenna's Klippies & Bows | Getting Ready Location: Honua Kai Resort & Spa | Groom & Groomsmen Attire: Macy's | Groomsmen Gifts: Bottle Breacher | Guestbook: Totally Salinda | Paper Products: Little Spark Creations | Shell Ring Holder: BHLDN | Trash-The-Dress Location: 505 Front Street | Wedding Dress Hanger: Get Hung Up | Wedding Venue: Merriman's | Welcome Totes: Sixpence Press"
p2605
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p2606
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p2607
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p2608
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p2609
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p2610
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p2611
aS'A ...'
p2612
aS'When ...'
p2613
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p2614
asa(dp2615
g2
(dp2616
S'Wedding Dress'
p2617
S'Reem Acra'
p2618
sS'Wedding Film'
p2619
S'Love Story'
p2620
sS'Food'
p2621
S'Roland Paix'
p2622
sS'Photography'
p2623
S'Nadia Meli'
p2624
sS'Venue'
p2625
S'Mas De Comptes'
p2626
sS'English Bus'
p2627
S'London Bus'
p2628
sS'DJ'
p2629
S'Benjamin Barlatier'
p2630
sS'Photobooth'
p2631
S'Mister Like That'
p2632
sS'Wedding Coordinator'
p2633
S'Flora Les Cocottes '
p2634
sS'Hair & MakeUp'
p2635
S'MLS'
p2636
sS'Flowers'
p2637
S'Aux Fleurs Du Theatre'
p2638
sS'Music During Cocktail Hour'
p2639
S'Orange Trio'
p2640
sS'Getting Ready Lace Robe'
p2641
S'Girl With A Serious Dream'
p2642
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/10/10/classic-summer-provence-wedding/'
p2643
sg20
(dp2644
g22
(lp2645
S'traditional-elegance'
p2646
asg25
(lp2647
S'summer'
p2648
asg28
(lp2649
S'light-blue'
p2650
aS'light-pink'
p2651
asg33
(lp2652
S'church'
p2653
aS'farm-3'
p2654
assg36
(lp2655
S'After our (virtual) travels to France yesterday with SMP Living, it feels fitting to follow up with a wedding set in that same glorious land. It s everything you d dream of in a Provence farm affair   charming, rustic, wildly romantic - and with Flora Les Cocottes coordinating the day, each moment went off without a hitch. Nadia Meli captured the gallery waiting for you here.'
p2656
aS'From Nadia Meli  This wedding was just a gorgeous blush summer wedding in the beautiful Provence! Florence & Anthony have planned the wedding for over a year and you could notice that every detail was just perfect! Also because of the help of amazing Flora from Les Cocottes who was the sweetest to work with!'
p2657
aS'The venue, an old French farm in the south of France (near Avignon), was breathtaking and charming and one of the most beautiful places I have ever seen. If you like rustic and organic, you will love this.'
p2658
aS'There were so many personalized items in the wedding like the  ring-pillow    they used an old watch from their granddad to carry the rings, because Flo s family used to be watchmakers! What a great idea! Also the bridesmaids skirts: something I had never seen before in a wedding: I loved that Flo and Anthony did, whatever they liked, not what you are  supposed  to do in a wedding!'
p2659
aS'The highlight of the day was the ceremony in this stunning antic church, all made of light sandstone, simple, no gold altar   just the most beautiful thing ever. It looked surreal in between those olive trees. Like a postcard. When I first got to the church I stopped breathing for a second, because the picture just didn t look real. But lucky me, it was! As a photographer, documenting this wedding was just pure pleasure. The fact that Florence and Anthony were sweet and caring just was the cherry on top.'
p2660
asa(dp2661
g2
(dp2662
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/09/paris-luxury-wedding-inspiration/'
p2663
sg20
(dp2664
g22
(lp2665
S'traditional-elegance'
p2666
asg25
(lp2667
S'spring'
p2668
asg28
(lp2669
S'gold'
p2670
aS'ivory'
p2671
aS'light-pink'
p2672
aS'pink'
p2673
asg33
(lp2674
S'ballroom'
p2675
assg36
(lp2676
S'My husband and I honeymooned in the City of Lights, and you know all that stuff they say about it being ridiculously romantic? Well, it s all pretty darn true. Lucky for us, the proof is at our fingertips with this Parisian inspiration shoot that ll leave you speechless. La Fabrique   R ves planned the luxurious details, Sandra Aberg snapped the gorgeous photos and Mg-image caught it all on film. More right here!'
p2677
aS'Paris being known as one of the most romantic places all over the world, hence every wedding and event we organize there is a delight.'
p2678
aS'This time was about creating an Inspirational shooting around the luxury given by the Shangri-La Hotel Paris, located at the heart of Paris with the legendary Jardin des Tuileries just around the corner.\n\nWith the great participation of two talented artists; mg-image and Sandra Aberg, we knew we were able to create an inspirational ambiance beyond expectations. '
p2679
aS'The Shangri-La Hotel Paris opened its doors to us, delivering an inspiring universe where we wanted to highlight the Parisian elegance and refinement with green accents, light pink flown by the authentic gold touch.\n\nWe ve had a great time planning everything and making this happen, not to mention the amazing vendors working with us, thinking of Samuel Rocher with his talented team and our beautiful models for couple.\n\nVery special thanks and acknowledgment go to Sandra Aberg for her remarkable talent capturing moments and to Gabriel Menassier from mg-image for his incredible video.\n'
p2680
aS"Photography: Sandra Aberg | Cinematography: Mg-image | Wedding Planner: La Fabrique   R ves | Wedding Gown: Jenny Packham | Stationery: A Creative Affair | Groom's Attire: Artling | Groom's Shoes: Faubourg Saint Sulpice | Bridal Boutique: Vintage Bride | Bride's Headpiece: Jannie Baltzer | Hair & Makeup Artist: Samuel Rocher | Hair & Makeup Artists: C sar Carvalho, Brenda And Ana s  | Hotel: Shangri-La Paris | Jewelery: Maison Chaumet | Model: Ludivine Grosjean"
p2681
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p2682
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p2683
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p2684
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p2685
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p2686
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p2687
aS'A ...'
p2688
aS'When ...'
p2689
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p2690
asa(dp2691
g2
(dp2692
S'Wedding Cake'
p2693
S'Sweet Things By Fi'
p2694
sS'Cheesecake Design And Cheesecake Table Decor'
p2695
S'Reviva Weddings'
p2696
sS'Wedding Rings'
p2697
S'Lujan Jewelry'
p2698
sS'Wedding Planning And Coordination'
p2699
S'Reviva Weddings'
p2700
sS'Photography'
p2701
S'Sandoval Studios Photography'
p2702
sS'Venue'
p2703
S'Villa'
p2704
sS'Belt Gown'
p2705
S'Carlee Sizemore'
p2706
sS'Flowers And Ceremony Decor'
p2707
S'Pedro Navarro'
p2708
sS'Creative Direction And Overall Styling'
p2709
S'Mar Sandoval From Romance Weddings'
p2710
sS'Groom Suite'
p2711
S'Hugo Boss'
p2712
sS'Chairs And Linen'
p2713
S'Pedro Navarro'
p2714
sS'Wedding Favors And Drink Stirres'
p2715
S'Mar Sandoval From Romance Weddings'
p2716
sS'Wedding Gown'
p2717
S'Chaviano Couture'
p2718
sS'Catering '
p2719
S'El Gastor'
p2720
sS'Candy Bar'
p2721
S'Dulce Serendipia'
p2722
sS'Stationery Design And Escort Cards'
p2723
S'Design House Of Moira'
p2724
sS'Bride Shoes'
p2725
S'Chinese Laundry'
p2726
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/10/07/glamorous-floral-wedding-in-marbella-spain/'
p2727
sg20
(dp2728
g22
(lp2729
S'elegant'
p2730
asg25
(lp2731
S'summer'
p2732
asg28
(lp2733
S'blush'
p2734
aS'gold'
p2735
aS'light-pink'
p2736
aS'peach'
p2737
asg33
(lp2738
S'villa'
p2739
assg36
(lp2740
S'You will for sure be dreaming of Spain once you scroll through these images by Sandoval Studios Photography. The flowers by Pedro Navarro are big and bountiful, the colors the softest shade of pastel and the overall design by Romance Weddings is glam to the orous. And then there s the dress   oh that gorgeous creation by Chaviano Couture. Have a look here for so much more.'
p2741
aS'From Sandoval Studios Photography  Luica and David were a delightful couple who wished to create their dream day here in Marbella combined with a touch of luxury and style. Working with this criteria we located a stunning luxury villa set in the hills behind Marbella, providing the perfect venue for their wedding day. As it was a smaller wedding party, the courtyard was the perfect setting for their dinner reception and the magical gazebo area already in the gardens was a beautiful location for the ceremony. Luica and David loved the different areas we could use for their wedding day and the property offered a lot of privacy so they could relax and enjoy their day with their close family and friends.'
p2742
aS'Florals were high on Luica s agenda and the talented Pedro Navarro and his team created stunning floral displays using Juliet roses, white peonies and ranunculus combined with lace draped over the main table and plenty of vintage styling from the chairs to the extra props drafted in for the day, the overall style was pure romance.'
p2743
aS'We loved the watercolour and calligraphy stationery created for the day by the Design House of Moira which matched the original invitations and each place setting had a beautiful menu and placecard which was pinned to a peach. I do love combining florals with fruits and this was done perfectly.'
p2744
aS'The candy bar created by Dulce Serendipia and our cheese table were styled with the same romantic theme and us girls even managed to sneak a bit of glitter in! Mar from Romance Weddings created some fabulous cocktail stirrers, paper flowers and vintage props, we always love her attention to details and styling, especially when it comes to taking the photographs. A girl after our own heart!'
p2745
aS'The gorgeous wedding cake, that I was banned from going near, was designed and created by Sweet Things By Fi, it looked stunning and had been designed to match Luica s dress, sadly I did not get to test it on this occasion!'
p2746
aS'Luica s dreamy dress was from Chaviano Couture, we swooned when we saw Luica appear from her dressing room and David looked equally handsome in his Hugo Boss suit.'
p2747
aS'A wonderful day was had by our charming couple along with their families and friends who partied well into the evening.\n'
p2748
asa(dp2749
g2
(dp2750
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/07/beachside-wedding-in-croatia/'
p2751
sg20
(dp2752
g22
(lp2753
S'elegant'
p2754
asg25
(lp2755
S'summer'
p2756
asg28
(lp2757
S'blush'
p2758
aS'silver-2'
p2759
asg33
(lp2760
S'church'
p2761
aS'restaurant'
p2762
assg36
(lp2763
S'In the most magical of settings, this couple chose to wed on the island of Vis in Croatia. The bride was beyond, wearing a killer pair of Badgley Mischka heels and gorgeous Jim Hjelm dress, and the rest   captured by Yann Audic   is pure destination wedding perfection. Pop over to the gallery for a look!'
p2764
aS'Lifestories Wedding is based in Paris and Sydney, is a australian-french photographic team and was able to travel to Croatia to picture this event.\n'
p2765
aS'Photography: Yann Audic | Wedding Gown: Jim Hjelm | Reception: Lola Konoba Vis Island, Croatia | Shoes: Badgley Mischka'
p2766
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p2767
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p2768
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p2769
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p2770
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p2771
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p2772
aS'A ...'
p2773
aS'When ...'
p2774
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p2775
asa(dp2776
g2
(dp2777
S'Wedding Dress'
p2778
S'Aidan Mattox'
p2779
sS'Estate'
p2780
S'Le Foulon'
p2781
sS'Photography - Assistance'
p2782
S'Xavier Roussos'
p2783
sS'Photography'
p2784
S'Anna Roussos Photography'
p2785
sS'Rings'
p2786
S'Custom Made By Jeff At Rice Village Diamonds'
p2787
sS'Invitations'
p2788
S' Wedding Paper Divas'
p2789
sS'Bridal Shoes'
p2790
S'Crown Vintage Claire Pump'
p2791
sS'Florist'
p2792
S'Charley Gynn From The London Flower House'
p2793
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/10/06/charming-south-of-france-wedding-at-le-foulon/'
p2794
sg20
(dp2795
g22
(lp2796
S'romantic'
p2797
asg25
(lp2798
S'summer'
p2799
asg28
(lp2800
S'light-pink'
p2801
aS'navy'
p2802
aS'pink'
p2803
asg33
(lp2804
S'bed-breakfast'
p2805
aS'villa'
p2806
assg36
(lp2807
S'Just after noon today, this stunning love sesh was forever added to our galleries and admittedly, I spent far too long drooling over all the pretty (including those stunning views of the French Riviera) from Anna Roussos. And now my dears, we have even more to love, because the wedding that follows? It s France-lovin  like you wouldn t believe. From the Bride s flowy Aidan Mattox dress to the coral charm peonies, see it all here.'
p2808
aS'From the beautiful Bride  Robin is from England, while I am a native Texan, thus making it difficult in the early days of planning to decide where to hold our wedding. Neither of us were attached to the idea of having it at home as we wanted our wedding to be more of a holiday with our closest friends and family. Obviously, ensuring beautiful scenery paired with great food and wine was a must. For my husband and I, France was really a no brainer! We are both big into food and wine (self proclaimed foodies), and France is one of the few places we ve visited that consistently delivers phenomenal food and gorgeous wines. Thanks to my brilliant mother in law, we found Le Foulon online. We booked our stay over a 4 day weekend, and it could not have been any more perfect. Not to mention the ample amount of honeymoon destinations within close range! Planning a wedding overseas was relatively stress free. The benefit of turning our wedding into a trip with loved ones was that we had their company to look forward to, along with gorgeous views! How could you go wrong with that? I didn t spend too much time worrying about how everything would come together. Nick & Mia at Le Foulon are lovely, and made the planning and execution process so simple. Also, having a wonderfully talented friend who is a florist is an advantage. She graciously handled all of the correspondence with the local french florist in the small village where we wed. Lastly, I was absolutely in love with the work of our photographer, Anna Roussos. I knew from swooning over her photos of previous weddings on her blog that she would capture the raw emotions of our special day, and having those memories to look back on is priceless.\n'
p2809
asa(dp2810
g2
(dp2811
S'Wedding Cake'
p2812
S'Alila'
p2813
sS'Bridesmaids  Dresses'
p2814
S'Priska Henata Couture'
p2815
sS'Groom Suit'
p2816
S'Wong Hang'
p2817
sS'Wedding Dress'
p2818
S'Fifi Firianty'
p2819
sS'Hampers'
p2820
S'Silverbox'
p2821
sS'Stationeries'
p2822
S'Cottonville '
p2823
sS'Reception Venue'
p2824
S'Alila Villas Uluwatu'
p2825
sS'Photography'
p2826
S'Angga Permana Photo'
p2827
sS'Ceremony Venue'
p2828
S'Alila Villas Uluwatu'
p2829
sS'Cinematic Videography'
p2830
S'Axioo'
p2831
sS'Wedding Decor'
p2832
S'Rose Barrel D cor'
p2833
sS'Wedding Shoes'
p2834
S'Venilla Suite'
p2835
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/10/06/classic-white-wedding-in-bali/'
p2836
sg20
(dp2837
g22
(lp2838
S'destination'
p2839
asg25
(lp2840
S'summer'
p2841
asg28
(lp2842
S'cream'
p2843
aS'green'
p2844
aS'ivory'
p2845
aS'white'
p2846
asg33
(lp2847
S'resort'
p2848
assg36
(lp2849
S'We usually don t think of classic details paired with destination weddings in Bali but, (and this is a big but) that pairing is crazy beautiful. Like drop all your plans thus far and go the destination route. Photographed by Angga Permana, this affair takes the natural beauty of Bali and throws in all white florals, the prettiest lace linens and al fresco dining under a tropical night sky. It s pure perfection.'
p2850
aS'From the Bride  Reminiscing the most beautiful day of my life,  I remember the corner. The corner of your colour, the corner of your smile. The street corners turning into corners of the corridor. Into the corners of the place where we hold hands. The corners of your mouth, of your eyes. The corners of words we spoke. The corner of your name. On the corner where we exchanged our vows for life. The corner where we kissed. I remember the corner. '
p2851
aS'It has always been personal right from the very beginning. Each and every little thing about this wedding is a reflection of us. We knew exactly what we wanted: a wedding stripped to its very core, the union of two souls and a celebration of love, no glitz and glam. Far from typical Indonesian weddings with thousands of guests and the fanfare; it was going to be an intimate affair with our closest friends and family, a personal sweet memory lasting for years to come..'
p2852
aS'The inspiration was simple: nature s beauty meets ethereal elegance. Simplistic, subtle, yet stylish. First things first: the wedding dress. Instead of world-class designer-labels, we opted for a piece by a talented local designer, for the sake of originality. The dress holds special significance since it is one of a kind, with a hand-painted design incorporated into the gown through laser cut. No other dress in the world could be the exact same.'
p2853
aS'Venue pick comes naturally: Secluded Uluwatu area of Bali was perfect fit, and Alila Villas Uluwatu, perched at the cliff of Indian Ocean instantly stole our hearts. We didn t even bother checking on other venues. For once, we ve decided we were going to have our wedding at the edge of the world. We were to fly the whole pack of family and friends to paradise island for a wedding getaway.'
p2854
aS'It was a remarkable journey: humbly starting with the vision and some scattered creative ideas, watching it take form and in the end, unfolding to a realization before our eyes. We couldn t have done it without the help of a solid teamwork from the vendors. On the day of our wedding, our d cor was a portrayal of subtle elegance and the pureness of white. Sunset Cabana was basking in golden sunshine, white floral arrangements and ornaments, embellishing the beauty of the wooden structure as it already was. The ceremony began just before sunset with white petals down the aisle, tingling crystals above our heads, and the perfect shade of blue as backdrop, that of the clear sky and the Indian Ocean. Nothing could be more perfect.'
p2855
aS'Next was alfresco dinner under the stars, serenaded with a selection of our favourite music. Our wedding reception was set on poolside terrace of the villa, overlooking the serene ocean. Wooden structures and withering frangipani tree blended beautifully with lushes of white floral, accented with chandeliers; creating a surreal image of our very own secret garden. The table setting was a romantic image of its own, white floral composition on Victorian vases, gold tinted crystals and glassy cutleries, soft lace table runner on rustic wooden tables, completed with lovely Tiffany chairs. Each set comes with a laser-cut box of macarons and a personalized thank you cards, showing our deepest gratitude towards the people that are dearest to our hearts. To top it all up, this splendid setting captured gorgeously by our favourite photographer!'
p2856
aS'Crazy after-party all the way through midnight make the night unforgettable. Everyone was down on their feet having a really good time. It was not only our night, but theirs too. It warmed our hearts to hear everybody s compliments of how amazing the day has been. A few months passed, I still remember vividly stills and episodes of the wedding; it will be our cherished memory for the rest of our lives.'
p2857
asa(dp2858
g2
(dp2859
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/06/magical-maui-wedding-at-honua-kai-lani/'
p2860
sg20
(dp2861
g22
(lp2862
S'rustic'
p2863
asg25
(lp2864
S'summer'
p2865
asg28
(lp2866
S'gray'
p2867
aS'pink'
p2868
asg33
(lp2869
S'estate'
p2870
assg36
(lp2871
S'Before we even get into just how magical this Maui wedding is, let me tell you a very important detail   it was planned in four months. Yes four. I can t even get over the fact that all the gorgeous planned to perfection by Kara Byrne below was done so in such a short time. Because these images from Kaua Wedding Photography? They are just as pretty as they get. From the florals by Dellables to the stunning Honua Kai Lani setting   this gallery is perfection. See it all here.'
p2872
aS'We knew that we wanted a ceremony outside, where our guests could enjoy the amazing Maui weather and scenery. We also knew that we wanted a relaxing setting for the event, where everyone could feel like they were on vacation. After some searching, we found Honua Kai Lani, the Sugarman Estate, a beautiful and secluded waterfront property in Makena.'
p2873
aS'When it came time to planning, we only had 4 months to pull everything together so we knew we wanted to work with a wedding planner. After one conversation with Kara Byrne we felt an instant connection and knew she would help us create the wedding day we wanted   one where we could relax, enjoy the island and focus on celebrating with each other and our loved ones. Looking back we can honestly say the entire day, from start to finish was all that we wanted and more.'
p2874
aS'Our vision for the wedding d cor was modern rustic so Kara worked with us to find the vendors that would help us create that look and feel. With strung lights, large wooden tables, Moroccan lanterns and flowers in mason jars, the already beautiful property was transformed into a romantic wedding and reception venue.'
p2875
aS'Being that we are both foodies who love artisan cocktails, we wanted to have local organic Hawaiian fare with a customized cocktail menu for our guests to enjoy, along with cupcakes instead of cake, for dessert. We were blown away as all aspects of it, the food, beverage and service was exceptional.'
p2876
aS'We also wanted to work with a wedding photographer who would be as relaxed and at ease as we wanted to be on our wedding day and we were thrilled to work with Kaua. Not only was he so fun and easy to work with, his photos were stunning and captured every moment of the day beautifully.'
p2877
aS'One of the many highlights of the day for us was a momma and baby humpback whale that put on a little show for our guests, just off the shore of the Sugarman Estate during the cocktail hour. It was a rare and beautiful site and a treat for our guests to see.'
p2878
aS'All and all, we felt like our wedding day exceeded our hopes and expectations and we are so grateful to everyone that played a role in making it so special and memorable.\n'
p2879
aS"Photography: Kaua Wedding Photography | Videography: DMI Video | Floral Design: Dellables | Wedding Gown: Nicole Miller | Cupcakes: Maui Wedding Cakes | Wedding Stationery: Sarah Bria - Friend Of Bride | Wedding Shoes: Jimmy Choo | Catering: Food For The Soul | DJ: Ace Beats | Groom's Attire: Hugo Boss | Officiant: Bride's Father | Bar Service: Garnish Events | Coordination And Event Design: Kara Byrne | Event Rentals: Island Rents | Hair & Make Up: Mira Carmen | Transportation: Akina Aloha | Vintage Decor: Opihi Love Boutique Rentals & Event Design | Wedding Venue: Honua Kai Lani"
p2880
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p2881
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p2882
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p2883
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p2884
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p2885
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p2886
aS'A ...'
p2887
aS'When ...'
p2888
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p2889
asa(dp2890
g2
(dp2891
S'Wedding Dress'
p2892
S'Pronovias Barcelona'
p2893
sS'Reception Venue'
p2894
S"Gannon's"
p2895
sS'Photography'
p2896
S'Wendy Laurel'
p2897
sS'Photography Assist'
p2898
S'Jeffrey Oltman'
p2899
sS'Cake'
p2900
S'Gannons'
p2901
sS'Wedding Planner'
p2902
S'Opihi Love Boutique Rentals & Event Design'
p2903
sS'Officiant'
p2904
S'Pia Aluli'
p2905
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/10/03/sunshine-soaked-maui-beach-wedding/'
p2906
sg20
(dp2907
g22
(lp2908
S'rustic-elegance'
p2909
asg25
(lp2910
S'summer'
p2911
asg28
(lp2912
S'gray'
p2913
aS'mint-2'
p2914
aS'pink'
p2915
asg33
(lp2916
S'restaurant'
p2917
assg36
(lp2918
S'My fianc  and I are planning a two part, island-hopping adventure for our honeymoon in Hawaii next summer, and Maui is on the list. Gorgeous, sunny, fabulous Maui. So it ll make complete sense to you when I say that I cannot pull myself away from this gallery from Wendy Laurel and Opihi Love Boutique Rentals & Event Design. Beyond the stunning destination, I have no doubt in my mind it has a little something to do with how talented the vendor team is. Happy Friday, Maui lovers!'
p2919
aS'From Wendy Laurel Lisa and Vikram chose Maui to be married. When Lisa was a very little girl, she told her parents that she was going to be married on Maui. Her family visited Maui every year. And lo and behold, she made her dreams come true. It was the sweetest moment at the reception, when Lisa s Dad told this story in his toast.'
p2920
aS'It was a gorgeous ceremony on a bright sunshiney summer day on a beach in Makena. After the gorgeous ceremony, the couple held a lovely reception at Gannons Wailea (right up the road) for their friends and family who made the trip.\n'
p2921
asa(dp2922
g2
(dp2923
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/03/dia-de-los-muertos-wedding-at-loreto-mexico/'
p2924
sg20
(dp2925
g22
(lp2926
S'destination'
p2927
aS'whimsical'
p2928
asg25
(lp2929
S'spring'
p2930
asg28
(lp2931
S'black'
p2932
aS'coral'
p2933
aS'turquoise'
p2934
asg33
(lp2935
S'beach'
p2936
aS'poolside'
p2937
assg36
(lp2938
S'Never in a million years would I have thought a wedding inspired by Dia de Los Muertos would be the wedding that tops all in my heart, but One Love Photography and this gorgeous couple just rocked my world. Set in Mexico, the wedding had the cool factor that comes naturally to few and is impossible to emulate, making it even more amazing in my book!'
p2939
aS'From the bride  I know it might sound cheesy, but we really wanted for our wedding to be a celebration of love. Not just our love for each other, but for all of our friends and family and an overall love for life. We wanted for everyone to relax and have a ridiculously good time in a beautiful location. We saw this as a once in a lifetime opportunity to have so many of the people we love most in this world in one place, we just wanted to enjoy that time together and be able to take it all in.'
p2940
aS'Andrew and I are makers, so we wanted to contribute in as many ways as possible to crafting the full experience and inviting our friends and family to take part, too. We made many of the decorations together, as well as the invitations  which was admittedly a big task. Andrew brewed beer to serve (that we drove down to Mexico with!) Our closest friends sang and played guitar in the ceremony, did my hair and makeup and even officiated. The treats were special, too my grandmother made Vinetarte, an Icelandic wedding cake that I grew up with, and our friend Pat made giant bowls of spiked punch (which took a whole team of our friends to squeeze limes for).'
p2941
aS'One of the toughest things for me was deciding how to incorporate something for my mom into the ceremony (she passed away a few years ago from cancer). I knew she wouldn t want anything to feel sad. We decided to make our ceremony programs as paper bags and my aunt and cousin spent a full day baking up my mom s chocolate chip cookie recipe so we could have one inside each bag.'
p2942
aS'We still can t believe how everything just fell into place. There were points when it felt crazy with how much we were doing, but it all turned out. We had such a good time. And then, of course, there was my grandmothers playing beer pong against each other. Never saw that one coming.\n'
p2943
aS"Photography: One Love Photo | Wedding Dress: Lazaro | Jewelry: BHLDN | Bridesmaids' Dresses: Ceremony By Joanna August And Love Lane | Groomsmen's Attire: J Crew  | Ceremony And Reception: Loreto Baja Golf & Resort Spa  | Florals: Loreto Bay Flowers & Gifts"
p2944
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p2945
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p2946
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p2947
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p2948
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p2949
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p2950
aS'A ...'
p2951
aS'When ...'
p2952
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p2953
asa(dp2954
g2
(dp2955
S'Reception Venue'
p2956
S'Gannons Wailea'
p2957
sS'Photography'
p2958
S'Wendy Laurel'
p2959
sS'Photography Assist'
p2960
S'Patrice Carlton'
p2961
sS'Wedding Dress '
p2962
S'Jcrew'
p2963
sS'Church'
p2964
S"Keawala'i Church"
p2965
sS'Cake'
p2966
S'Gannons'
p2967
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/10/03/tropical-destination-wedding-in-maui/'
p2968
sg20
(dp2969
g22
(lp2970
S'elegant'
p2971
asg25
(lp2972
S'summer'
p2973
asg28
(lp2974
S'khaki'
p2975
aS'pink'
p2976
asg33
(lp2977
S'church'
p2978
aS'restaurant'
p2979
assg36
(lp2980
S'Vacations in Maui = awesome. Wedding extravaganzas in Maui = what dreams are made of. And those dreams are a collaboration of bright, happy king protea bouquets mixed with the sweetest Hawaiian church we ever did see and loads of stunning imagery by Wendy Laurel. Click here for all the gorgeousness!'
p2981
aS'From Wendy Laurel Christian Kainoa is a Maui boy. He grew up on Maui. Part Hawaiian, he attended Kamehameha Schools before heading off to the mainland for college at Dartmouth. At college is where he met Anna Lynn, a real Southern belle from South Carolina. The two fell in love and as they say, the rest is history. For their wedding, they chose to return to Christian s roots and get married in the old Hawaiian church in Makena   Keawala i. Their ceremony was gorgeous and special because at the end, the bridesmaids and groomsmen (all 20) joined in for a sweet a capella song. It was amazing to hear their voices echoing in the church. After family photographs, the group headed to Gannons in Wailea for a pretty outdoor reception before the setting sun. Anna Lynn chose a Hawaiian flower   the protea- for the centerpiece of the bouquets.\n'
p2982
asa(dp2983
g2
(dp2984
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/02/diy-destination-wedding-in-antigua-guatemala-at-las-capuchinas-templo/'
p2985
sg20
(dp2986
g22
(lp2987
S'destination'
p2988
asg25
(lp2989
S'summer'
p2990
asg28
(lp2991
S'green'
p2992
aS'light-green'
p2993
aS'teal'
p2994
asg33
(lp2995
S'historic-building'
p2996
assg36
(lp2997
S'This wedding is pure magic. And I don t say that lightly. Intimate and elegant, the images from Julie Comfort paint the picture of a wedding that played out like a dream. With the romantic Las Capuchinas Templo setting the scene and one seriously gorgeous couple tying the knot, this gallery is a destination dream come true. See even more here.'
p2998
aS'When we were trying to decide where to get married, we pondered the simplicity of a small wedding in our home city, thought about cruises or all-inclusive type destination weddings, but nothing seemed to stick or excite us. It was not until Rishi simply suggested,  Why not Guatemala?  and that was it. We immediately jumped on the idea that night without even putting much thought into it (well, 5 minutes worth) we sent an email out to our closest friends and family that night which sealed the deal. Rishi s family lives in Trinidad and mine in Toronto both families don t travel often. It was important to us that we provide everyone with an  adventure  where friends and family would have time to grow true relationships and see a place they would not have otherwise.'
p2999
aS'I found the most gorgeous group of houses (6 in total which we called  Melrose  because they surrounded a pool just like the show) which we rented for a week to accommodate our guests and family. It was cost friendly, allowed everyone to be close, and provided the perfect  get to know you  atmosphere. Each room was stocked with a welcome bag filled with goodies and necessities like a hangover kit (with emergency meds, earplugs, and an eye mask), snacks, sweets, personalized lip balm, water and more.'
p3000
aS'The days before the wedding were filled with events for guests to choose to participate in (or not). We had a meet and greet day filled with a hop-on/hop-off tour of the city, followed by a night around the pool with catered traditional Guatemala food, music, and drinks. After the rehearsal dinner we had a salsa night out with salsa lessons, music, drinks and fun.\n The day of the wedding was just the icing on the cake to the whole week we got to enjoy with the closest people in our lives.'
p3001
aS'Our venues (being built over 300 years ago) matched our theme magical. We loved the simplicity of both venues. I would not have called myself crafty before the wedding, but I kicked up my inner craftiness and became a DIY guru. I made (and discovered I loved making) a ton of personlized paper products and decor and we brought literally suitcases full of DIY to add to the decor.'
p3002
aS'The ceremony was held at San Jose el Viejo; a smaller, more intimate ruin, followed by a cocktail hour with our signature  Flirtini  drink and apps. The sound of thunder and heavy rain added a warm feel to this already magical venue. As part of the ceremony, we held a  Sand and Soil  ceremony. Rishi used sand from Trinidad where he grew up and I used soil from the backyard of my childhood home in Toronto. We exchanged personalized vows and our wedding bands made from aircraft titanium (adding a special meaning because of our travels) and sealed the deal with a smooch.'
p3003
aS'Shuttles whisked guests off to the reception held in the temple of Las Capuchinas where we had a Cuban band, Ignacio (he s the grandson of one of the original members of the Buena Vista Social Club) playing for their entrance. By that point, everyone was relaxed, happy, ready to celebrate and enjoy a few drinks made by our flare bartenders. A delicious meal, followed by mini desserts, a candy station and s mores were there to satisfy everyone s sweet spot. The atmosphere was fun and full of joy and having guests come from all over (Canada, US, Trinidad, Guatemala, and as far as Scotland and Nigeria!) made for the best night and week of our lives.'
p3004
aS"Photography: Julie Comfort | Cinematography: Jonathan Yonkers | Videographer: Jonathan Yonkers | Wedding Cake: Cake Company | Ceremony Location: San Jose El Viejo | Reception Location: Las Capuchinas Templo | Engagement Ring: Tacori  | Wedding Bands: Jon Pollack | Catering: Camino Real Antigua | Accomodations: Philippa Myers | Antigua Accommodations : Philippa Myers | Birdcage Veil: Melinda Rose Designs | Birdie Logo/Wedding Stamp: Paper Sushi | Bride's Dress: Pronovias | Ceremony Programs: HandStampOlogy | Event Design/Floral: Mario Ayala-Escencia | Event Design/Florals: Mario Ayala | Father of the Bride gift-Personalized Handkerchief: Inspired Stitches | Favors/Paper Product/DIY Decor: Handstampology | Hair flower worn at reception: Rainwater Studios | Hair/Makeup : Melissa Wood"
p3005
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3006
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3007
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3008
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3009
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3010
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3011
aS'A ...'
p3012
aS'When ...'
p3013
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3014
asa(dp3015
g2
(dp3016
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/02/oceanfront-wedding-in-ilhabela-brazil/'
p3017
sg20
(dp3018
g22
(lp3019
S'casual'
p3020
aS'destination'
p3021
asg25
(lp3022
S'summer'
p3023
asg28
(lp3024
S'orange'
p3025
aS'pink'
p3026
aS'red'
p3027
aS'yellow'
p3028
asg33
(lp3029
S'beach'
p3030
assg36
(lp3031
S'Feeling a bit in a rut this Thursday?? Well, I m prescribing you a pop of color and this romantic waterfront wedding is just the medicine you need. Photographed by Flavia Valsani and planned by Small Weddings, it s a brightly and sunny outdoor celebration that will have you feeling better in no time  you can see the rest of this beautiful Brazilian wedding right here.'
p3032
aS'In January we decided to think about dates and I started looking for a wedding planner and venues near where my parents lived. I knew a wedding planner would be essential for us because we did not know how long I would stay in Brazil and be able to plan the wedding up close, I would need someone to represent us with vendors when I was not able to go to meetings.'
p3033
aS'The wedding planner was the first person we hired for the wedding and she was essential for everything to work. Around that same time we realized that we wanted to do the wedding somewhere that people would enjoy as a little vacation, so we picked an island Chris and I visited together called Ilhabela.'
p3034
aS'In Ilhabela I realized that it was important to consider the expertise of the people that worked in the wedding business in the area, because the island is small pretty much everyone has worked with each other. I put together an inspirational booklet for the wedding that showed the colors, decorations, flowers, bridal party attire and cakes I wanted and took it to every meeting with every vendor. That was vital to get a feeling of who would be suited for the wedding or not according to their reactions to it. I have to say go with your guts and the energy you get from people.'
p3035
aS'I couldn t be happier with my vendors, the food was great, pictures amazing, cake delicious, decoration out of this world, hair and make up artist great and the wedding planner made us all feel comfortable throughout the entire experience, she was on top of her game and treated everyone with respect. The day of the wedding was very emotional even though Chris and I had already eloped in the US in the presence of a few of his friends and family members. During our one-year engagement we lived ten months apart and the wedding in Brazil was the fulfillment of our relationship after such enduring times.\n'
p3036
aS"Photography: Flavia Valsani | Wedding Planner: Small Weddings  | Wedding Gown: Alvina Valenta | Bridesmaid's Dresses: Cavalera | Catering: Marakuthai | Cake And Sweets: Ana Luiza | Decoration: Isaias Ribeiro"
p3037
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3038
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3039
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3040
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3041
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3042
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3043
aS'A ...'
p3044
aS'When ...'
p3045
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3046
asa(dp3047
g2
(dp3048
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/10/01/fun-sayulita-mexico-wedding/'
p3049
sg20
(dp3050
g22
(lp3051
S'al-fresco'
p3052
aS'destination'
p3053
asg25
(lp3054
S'winter'
p3055
asg28
(lp3056
S'blue'
p3057
aS'turquoise'
p3058
asg33
(lp3059
S'beach'
p3060
assg36
(lp3061
S'The best part about a destination wedding? It s the very best vacation of your life and you get to share it with everyone you love. Sounds like the perfect recipe for a fun wedding, but fun might be the understatement of the century with this wedding from Kate Price Photography. I don t know about you, but I may or may not (okay, I m guilty) have started dancing in my seat as I made my way through this gallery!'
p3062
aS'From the Bride  Sayulita was on my husband and my radar from the second we got engaged. Both being born and raised in Seattle, and currently living in San Francisco, we loved the idea of our friends and family packing up to head somewhere sunny for a week of celebrating. Sayulita was our first vacation as a couple and a first vacation with both of our families, so it felt very natural to choose to get married there. Natural, ended up being an understatement. '
p3063
aS'From the second we arrived, we were blown away not only by our accommodations but how much our friends and family loved it. It was a non-stop party from the moment we arrived, to the day we hopped on the airplane home. The feeling of having everyone that s important to us in the same beautiful property, drinking tequila, watching fireworks, eating late night burritos, and participating in what was the most epic dance party of all time is indescribable. Of course, none (and I mean NONE) of it would be possible without Yazmin our planner, and Kate our photographer to capture each amazing moment. As the Instagram photos say .#vivalaslogan.\n'
p3064
aS"Photography: Kate Price Photography | Planner: Yazmin Gizeh | Flowers: Francisco Salazar | Catering: Don Pedro's Restaurant | Decor : Yazmin Gizeh | Furniture: Main Events | Lights: Curiel Producciones | Mariachi: Real De America"
p3065
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3066
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3067
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3068
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3069
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3070
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3071
aS'A ...'
p3072
aS'When ...'
p3073
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3074
asa(dp3075
g2
(dp3076
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/09/29/old-world-romance-at-costa-navarino-resort/'
p3077
sg20
(dp3078
g22
(lp3079
S'al-fresco'
p3080
aS'romantic'
p3081
asg25
(lp3082
sg28
(lp3083
S'gold'
p3084
aS'green'
p3085
aS'pink'
p3086
asg33
(lp3087
S'al-fresco'
p3088
aS'church'
p3089
assg36
(lp3090
S'This wedding should come with a warning label. The styling by White Ribbon Boutique Events Coordination is so gorgeous you might just have to put off that work project a bit longer, the setting is so breathtaking you might scrap your honeymoon plans and opt for a Mediterranean getaway, and it s all captured so beautifully by George Pahountis your fingers will get tired from all the pinning. At the very least we recommend you sit down while cruising through this romantic al fresco affair.'
p3091
aS'From White Ribbon Boutique  We started working with Abbey & Costas over a year before their wedding date and although we had never met them in person, we felt like we knew them for many years. They are one of the loveliest couples we have ever had the pleasure of working with and who shared a great vision for their wedding. The groom s parents were born in a small Messinian village in the South Peloponnese, Greece and they selected Costa Navarino resort, in Messinia to hold their wedding as, due to its location, it represented part of the Groom s family origins.'
p3092
aS'Many of their close friends and family travelled form very far away to celebrate the couple s journey. The wedding ceremony was held at a chapel in the Groom s hometown while the reception and pre-wedding festivities were held at a beautiful balcony of the resort overlooking the blue sea and green golf courses.'
p3093
aS'Our inspiration for the d cor was based on the natural ambience of the Messinian region and we decided to use a mix of green foliage, blush and pink flowers and season fruits. Neutral colored linens and vintage accessories complemented the d cor by creating a simple and sophisticated look, which blended in perfectly with the surroundings.'
p3094
aS'Guests experienced some unforgettable moments that day, with the emotional first dance of the couple, the heartfelt speeches of the couple s older siblings and the night long dancing of guests.\n'
p3095
aS"Photography: George Pahountis | Event Planning: White Ribbon Boutique Events Coordination | Floral Design: White Ribbon Boutique Events Coordination | Wedding Dress: Casablanca | Reception Venue: Costa Navarino | Bridesmaids' Dresses: Dessy | Groom's Attire: Men's Wearhouse | Groomsmen's Attire: Men's Wearhouse"
p3096
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3097
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3098
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3099
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3100
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3101
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3102
aS'A ...'
p3103
aS'When ...'
p3104
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3105
asa(dp3106
g2
(dp3107
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/09/29/feminine-floral-filled-garden-wedding-inspiration/'
p3108
sg20
(dp3109
g22
(lp3110
S'elegant'
p3111
asg25
(lp3112
S'summer'
p3113
asg28
(lp3114
S'blush'
p3115
aS'orange'
p3116
aS'yellow'
p3117
asg33
(lp3118
S'garden'
p3119
assg36
(lp3120
S'Ladies and gents, if you don t know Amy of Bo Boutique already, you ll be thanking your lucky stars you landed on this post. Because she has talent like I ve never seen. She not only whipped up the gorgeous blooms below, but she is also responsible for that gorgeous gown gracing our screens. Amazing, right? Well, thanks to Taylor Barnes Photography s stunning images, we can get lost in all the lovely right here. '
p3121
aS'The gown is made up of layers of tulle in blush pink, white, ivory, cappucino, and grey, layered over blush satin and ivory lace, all of which were tirelessly hand sewn by Amy. The result was a beautiful couture style gown, rich in delicate hues and texture. We thought this shoot would inspire brides to be extravagant with their wedding details making them big, blousey and beautiful!'
p3122
aS'We went with a romantic and indulgent love affair theme, choosing to set the shoot in the stunning gardens of Hampsted Heath  with a soft pale and in-depth colour palette which allows the pops of floral colour to shine.'
p3123
aS'Our gorgeous real life couple were the idyllic fit, with Charlotte s wild blonde locks and Justin s handsome rugged looks, they made for the picture-perfect characters for our love story!'
p3124
aS'I photographed the entire shoot on film to capture the intricate and delicate colour palette, and enhance the romanticism of the shoot and the whimsical location.'
p3125
aS'We really hope you looking through our much loved shoot!\n'
p3126
aS"Photography: Taylor Barnes Photography | Floral Design: Bo Boutique | Wedding Dress: Bo Boutique | Cake: Let It Be Cake | Cake: Andi Freeman Cakes | Groom's Attire: Tommy Hilfiger  | Bridal Accessories : Stephanie Allin | Gardens: Hampsted Heath | Stylist: Bo Boutique"
p3127
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3128
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3129
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3130
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3131
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3132
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3133
aS'A ...'
p3134
aS'When ...'
p3135
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3136
asa(dp3137
g2
(dp3138
S'Dress'
p3139
S'Donna Morgan'
p3140
sS'Photography'
p3141
S'Ifloyd Photography'
p3142
sS'Dinnerware/pillow Seating'
p3143
S'Pier One'
p3144
sS'Mens Attire'
p3145
S'Banana Republic'
p3146
sS"He's My Pineapple, She's My Pineapple"
p3147
S'Maggie Allen Calligraphy'
p3148
sS'Menu And Welcome Paperie'
p3149
S'Alea Moore'
p3150
sS'Calligraphy'
p3151
S'Maggie Allen Calligraphy'
p3152
sS'Beach'
p3153
S'Kualoa, HI'
p3154
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/09/26/destination-vow-renewal-on-the-shores-of-hawaii/'
p3155
sg20
(dp3156
g22
(lp3157
S'destination'
p3158
asg25
(lp3159
S'fall'
p3160
asg28
(lp3161
S'green'
p3162
aS'pink'
p3163
aS'turquoise'
p3164
asg33
(lp3165
S'beach'
p3166
assg36
(lp3167
S'A 10 year celebration of love, marriage and 4 beautiful babies is such a good reason to pack up and head to Hawaii. This couple, who started their relationship on the pretty beaches of Hawaii returned for a vow renewal that could double for a wildly gorgeous vacation. It s a two-for-one captured by Ifloyd Photography. From pineapple signage by Maggie Allen Calligraphy to pretty beach dining and a stunning ocean view, there s so much more in the gallery to pore through. '
p3168
aS'From the beautiful Mrs  Celebrating 10 years is a pretty special feat for any couple. Keeping the romance and adventure in every marriage is important to keeping a lasting one. For the both of us, living in Hawaii years ago was definitely an amazing start to our lives together. But, when we planned our wedding 10 years ago, we had decided to keep it close to home and brought hawaii to all of our family and friends, but promising each other we would make it back. Ten years later, after living in 5 different cities, the births of our four sweet daughters, starting careers, just life, and saving tons of pennies, we returned to hawaii and in front of the ocean, the Hawaiian mountains, and a few friends, we renewed the vows we shared ten years ago.'
p3169
aS' We had so much fun planning this! We chose Kualoa because it is a beautiful secluded part of this hawaiian island. Most visitors get to oahu and get stuck in honolulu, which is so fun and busy and a full on amazing city. But, the other side of the island is where you get a true taste of hawaiian life and culture. We were so thankful to our three sweet friends who made the trek across the country to join us, and loved getting to share with them our favorite place on earth.'
p3170
aS'A friend and talented calligrapher made for us custom designed welcome letters, place cards, and menus. Custom  He s my pineapple and She s my pineapple  cards for our freshly picked from dole plantation pineapples and a pineapple for each of our guests. Decorated our table with driftwood, freshly picked flowers, and tableware.'
p3171
aS' We had a piece made that included the words to our favorite song (Jason Mraz, I won t give up) that we felt spoke to our marriage. A conk shell with written calligraphy. Alea created the watercolor pineapple headers, because really who doest just love a pineapple. Flowers came from the island, and alea watched a few DIY s to make her bouquet and floral crown.'
p3172
aS' Going to Hawaii was certainly a trip of a lifetime, and with helicopter tours, sailing with the dolphins off the coast of the napali, jumping off cliffs, eating spam and eggs, paddle boarding with sea turtles, it made celebrating ten years epic. The best part was telling each other how much we loved waking up to each other these last 3,650 mornings. That even in knowing the different seasons a marriage can take you, that we are in this forever and we commit to making sure love wins!\n'
p3173
asa(dp3174
g2
(dp3175
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/09/26/art-deco-uk-wedding-at-burgh-island-hotel/'
p3176
sg20
(dp3177
g22
(lp3178
S'elegant'
p3179
asg25
(lp3180
S'spring'
p3181
asg28
(lp3182
S'green'
p3183
aS'silver-2'
p3184
asg33
(lp3185
S'hotel'
p3186
assg36
(lp3187
S'I don t even have words for this wedding. It s just too darn amazing. Honestly, I can t seem to pull myself away from all of M&J Photography stunning images, and really, can you blame me? They paint the prettiest picture of a seriously stylish art deco-inspired day, and you can see every jaw-droppingly gorgeous image here. '
p3188
aS'An intimate ceremony in the captains room was followed by Champagne afternoon tea with scones, cream and jam and of course wedding cake. Then the evening celebrations began with delicious cocktails in the bar followed by dinner and live jazz in the hotel dining room.'
p3189
aS'Additional Credits'
p3190
aS'- The veil was made by the bride s mother\n   Hayley s turquoise bracelet was borrowed from her mother and originally belonged to her grandmother, so out served as the something borrowed, the something old and the something blue.\n'
p3191
aS"Photography: M&J Photography | Florist: Hannah Burnett | Wedding Dress: Isabele Marant | Bride's Shoes: Rachel Simpson | Engagement Ring: Lucy Campbell - Bond Street | Groom's Shoes: Marks And Spencer | Bride's Wedding Ring: Goldsmiths | Earrings: Swarovski | Evening Dress: Paula @ Verytreschic | Groom's Wedding Band: Earnest Jones | Hotel: Burgh Island Hotel | Tuxedo's: Moss Bros "
p3192
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3193
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3194
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3195
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3196
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3197
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3198
aS'A ...'
p3199
aS'When ...'
p3200
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3201
asa(dp3202
g2
(dp3203
S'Evening Dress'
p3204
S'Femmes Fatales By Ella Tatarinova'
p3205
sS'Videographer'
p3206
S'Allora Visuals'
p3207
sS"Groom's Attire"
p3208
S'Tom Ford'
p3209
sS'Wedding Dress'
p3210
S'Monique Lhuillier'
p3211
sS'Catering'
p3212
S'Potel & Chabot'
p3213
sS'Stationary Suite'
p3214
S' Louise Richardson'
p3215
sS'Bridal Preperations'
p3216
S'Grand Hotel St Jean Cap Ferrat'
p3217
sS'Reception Venue'
p3218
S'Villa Ephrussi De Rothschild'
p3219
sS'Photography'
p3220
S'Polly Alexandre Photography'
p3221
sS'Ceremony Venue'
p3222
S'Villa Ephrussi De Rothschild'
p3223
sS'Hair'
p3224
S'Fabrice At The Grand Hotel St Jean Cap Ferrat'
p3225
sS'Cake'
p3226
S'Potel & Chabot'
p3227
sS'Florist'
p3228
S'Roni Fleurs'
p3229
sS'Wedding Story'
p3230
S'The Wedding Reporter'
p3231
sS'Wedding Planner'
p3232
S'Lavender And Rose Weddings'
p3233
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/09/25/pink-peonies-in-the-south-of-france/'
p3234
sg20
(dp3235
g22
(lp3236
S'elegance'
p3237
asg25
(lp3238
S'summer'
p3239
asg28
(lp3240
S'blush'
p3241
aS'ivory'
p3242
aS'light-pink'
p3243
aS'pink'
p3244
asg33
(lp3245
S'villa'
p3246
assg36
(lp3247
S'Loads of peonies in the South of France is a dream scenario no matter how you spin it. It easily lends itself to a wildly beautiful affair ripe with black-tie attire, a blanket of lush florals by Roni Fleurs and effortless chic details crafted by Lavender And Rose Weddings. It s also the kind of day that has left SMP green with wedding envy and you can see even more captured by Polly Alexandre Photography right here.'
p3248
asa(dp3249
g2
(dp3250
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/09/25/beachside-wedding-in-cabo-san-lucas/'
p3251
sg20
(dp3252
g22
(lp3253
S'destination'
p3254
asg25
(lp3255
S'summer'
p3256
asg28
(lp3257
S'fuchsia'
p3258
asg33
(lp3259
S'beach-resort'
p3260
assg36
(lp3261
S'A last minute change in plans to exchange vows in Cabo as opposed to a country club back home proved to be the BEST decision ever. Spending 5 days beachside at Sunset Da Mona Lisa with their loved ones in tow, this couple had the wedding of their wildest dreams. Crafted by Florenta Flower Design and captured by Amanda Lloyd, you can catch all the details of their romantic getaway in the gallery here.'
p3262
aS'From the Bride  When we were first planning our wedding, we were planning for a beautiful country club that overlooked the Seattle skyline. We had sat down with the venue, had everything planned, contracts drawn and then a few days later, out of the blue, I asked my husband,  What do you think of Cabo? Let s get married there!  Few weeks later after research, we decided on Cabo, told our families and started planning. We figured that with the amount of money that would be spent on a local wedding, we might as well spend it on a once in a lifetime trip with our family and closest friends. '
p3263
aS'Due to the beautiful setting of Sunset da Mona Lisa, we kept the ceremony decor very simple with just rose petals scattered along the aisle as well as a memorial vase and sign at the guest book table. The reception decor was more than I d ever envisioned. I d spent countless hours looking on various online sites and pieced together elements I liked about so many different set ups. I also ordered many things from Etsy and handmade many other things. Some of the most sentimental details were: My younger sister was my Maid of Honor and she made our cake toppers, my hair piece and sewed the blue heart onto my dress. I also had a locket tied to my bouquet of my late Grandfather who had passed 3 years earlier. The ring tied as well was the ring that my Dad first gave my Mom when they got married 33 years ago which had been a silver ring that my Dad spray painted gold at the time because they couldn t afford a gold band. Lastly, I wore on my right hand a peridot ring that was my great-grandparents. My great grandfather gave it to my great grandmother when they were dating 60 years ago and my Mom passed it down to me on my wedding day.'
p3264
aS'There were several moments of the day that stand out the most. After being widowed 7 years prior, remarrying was a big leap into a new start at life. When we were planning our wedding, we were having a hard time deciding who we could have perform the ceremony. We asked one of my best friends, a fellow military widow and founder of a non-profit for military widows, to get ordained and marry us. Having someone that has been apart of my life for 6 years and then apart of my  new  life from the beginning marry us, was the most amazing feeling! I had 3 of my fellow military widows there with us to celebrate, who have been my closest friends through the past near decade.'
p3265
aS'Another moment was right before my dad walked me down the aisle. We were standing there all alone, he looked at me and said,  You ready for this?  with a big smile. Gave me a huge hug and we walked down the aisle for him to  give me away . Another was during the reception, when both my older two children gave toasts to us. My 12 year old son, who was the co-Best Man, had fought me for months that he couldn t speak at the dinner because he was too shy. He had worked with my younger brother that day to come up with a few jokes to say and it meant so much that he did that for us. My 10 year old daughter spoke very sweet words and made nearly everyone in attendance tear up.'
p3266
aS'Out of all the amazing memories we have now, I think one that stands out on a daily basis was our choice in photographers. Being a wedding photographer myself, my husband knew that photography was one of the most important details about the whole wedding. Having an amazing photographer capture our special day exactly like it was and also being privileged to call her one of my best friends, it doesn t get better than that.'
p3267
aS'When looking back on everything, we truly had the most amazing wedding that we could ve ever had and we wouldn t change anything at all. When you think about it, how many people can say that they spent 5 days in a tropical location with their closest friends and family?\n'
p3268
aS"Photography: Amanda Lloyd Photography | Floral Design: Florenta Flower Design (florentaflowerdesign.com) | Wedding Dress: Alfred Angelo | Bakery: Pastry Chef, Sunset Da Mona Lisa | Bride's Shoes: Steven Madden | Bridesmaid's Shoes: Steven Madden | Bridesmaid's Dresses: Camille Ravie | Bridesmaids' Dresses: Camille Ravie | Catering: Sunset Da Mona Lisa | Hair And Makeup: Neysa Berman Of Blanc Salon | Entertainment: Mariachi Cabo-Trio | Groom's Shoes: Vans | Officiant: Taryn Davis | Cabo Resort: Sunset Da Mona Lisa | Decor: Florenta Flower Design (florentaflowerdesign.com) | Groomsmen Attire: JF Farrer | Party Favors: Pickle Dog Designs | Resort: Sunset Da Mona Lisa | Transportation: Three Palms"
p3269
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3270
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3271
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3272
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3273
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3274
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3275
aS'A ...'
p3276
aS'When ...'
p3277
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3278
asa(dp3279
g2
(dp3280
S'Photography'
p3281
S'Stepan Vrzala'
p3282
sS"Bridesmaids' Dresses"
p3283
S'JCrew'
p3284
sS'Wedding Planning And Design'
p3285
S'White Agency'
p3286
sS"Brides' Dress"
p3287
S'Custom Made By Stefania Orlando Haute Couture'
p3288
sS'Wedding Cake And Sweetbar'
p3289
S'Punkrock Cakes'
p3290
sS"Bride's Headpiece "
p3291
S'Erica Elizabeth Design'
p3292
sS'Floral Design'
p3293
S'Inspirito'
p3294
sS'Ceremony And Cocktail Hour Band'
p3295
S'Lo Dost'
p3296
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/little-black-book-blog/2014/09/23/czech-republic-bohemian-barn-wedding/'
p3297
sg20
(dp3298
g22
(lp3299
S'elegance'
p3300
asg25
(lp3301
S'summer'
p3302
asg28
(lp3303
S'blush'
p3304
aS'gray'
p3305
asg33
(lp3306
S'barn'
p3307
assg36
(lp3308
S'Not only do I want to pin this entire gallery from Stepan Vrzala, but it s one of those weddings you just know was fabulous to attend. From being greeted with homemade lemonade to witnessing the stunning sunlit ceremony to the beautiful candlelit barn reception, every moment of this boho soiree was planned to perfection by the team at The White Agency. And they nailed it. See more right here.'
p3309
aS'From The White Agency Martina & Chris s wedding was every wedding planner s dream come true. It was a perfect cocktail of Italian passion, Canadian humor and the best of Czech. Martina & Chris are from Canada, with roots in Italy and the Czech Republic. Nearly 90 weddings guests flew in for their June wedding from around the world.'
p3310
aS'Since Martina & Chris have both strong connections with the Czech Republic, having their wedding here was a natural choice. They knew they wanted a luxury barn wedding not far from Prague and The Stork s nest farm we recommended met all their requirements. Personally, we love this venue so much, that we secretly want to move there. As the farm s logo says, it truly is  A place with a special spirit .'
p3311
aS'The theme of the wedding was a Country chic elegance and colours were white, pale pink, peachy and  eucalyptus  green shades with golden and silver accessories. There was lot of wood, beautiful lace, vintage frames, succulents and a gorgeous lighting. Both natural (just look at the photos) and artificial. Vintage glowing chandelier floating above the sweethearts dinner was such a perfect touch.'
p3312
aS'A special spirit was with us since the early morning when Martina started her wedding day with a bit yoga by the lake. Watching Martina from the distance calmly breathing and performing the most incredible yoga poses (Martina is a yoga teacher) it felt like the buzz of the wedding preparations has stopped for a minute.'
p3313
aS'It was a hot summer day and the guests were refreshed by home made lemonades before the ceremony. Everyone walking together to the ceremony spot with the groom holding his parents hands leading the procession was one of our favorite moments of the day.'
p3314
aS'The ceremony spot underneath a tree was magical. Martina, looking oh-so-pretty in her boho wedding dress and flowy hairstyle walked down to a Rolling Stones song  She s a rainbow  sang by a live band. Well, there is another moment of the day that will stick with us for a while.'
p3315
aS'Martina & Chris are not only a stunning couple but they obviously know how to throw a party. One of the best wedding idea ever is to start off the wedding reception with dancing. Why to wait till the end of the meal! The dance with all the guests (A little party never killed nobody) kicked the party off in a style. Despite the reception tables in the barn looked amazing decorated with eucalyptus wreaths and mix of flowers with peonies being the dominant flower, the newlyweds did not want for their guests to be sitting for too long.'
p3316
aS'We loved everything about this truly boho wedding. The dances, the little favours for the guests (personalized home made local honey and strong Czech liqueur Slivovice), guests having so much fun taking pictures in a photo booth, the cake (oh my, the cake!). the amazing sun-set light. The Johnny Cash song the band played during the ceremony. The Groomsmen matching socks. Cute home-made mascarpone jars for the sweetbar. The fact that this amazing group of people met during several pre-wedding events to enjoy more time together- one of them taking place in a Prague vineyard. Most of all we loved that the Bride and Groom looked really really happy on their wedding day.\n'
p3317
asa(dp3318
g2
(dp3319
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/09/23/intimate-and-romantic-montenegro-wedding/'
p3320
sg20
(dp3321
g22
(lp3322
S'destination'
p3323
aS'romantic'
p3324
asg25
(lp3325
S'fall'
p3326
asg28
(lp3327
S'light-pink'
p3328
aS'pink'
p3329
asg33
(lp3330
S'outdoor'
p3331
aS'restaurant'
p3332
assg36
(lp3333
S'When this is your engagement session, your wedding is obviously going to be the stuff dreams are made of. The beautiful Montenegrin light made a second appearance for this lucky couple, this time smiling all over their dreamy wedding day. Dreamy might just be an understatement, if these stunning images from Sonya Khegay have anything to say about the matter. (They do!)'
p3334
aS'Photography: Sonya Khegay | Wedding Dress: Allure Bridals | Ceremony Venue: Stari Mlini'
p3335
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3336
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3337
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3338
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3339
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3340
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3341
aS'A ...'
p3342
aS'When ...'
p3343
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3344
asa(dp3345
g2
(dp3346
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/09/22/rustic-chic-south-african-warehouse-wedding-at-blue-bird-garage/'
p3347
sg20
(dp3348
g22
(lp3349
S'rustic'
p3350
asg25
(lp3351
S'fall'
p3352
asg28
(lp3353
S'khaki'
p3354
aS'navy'
p3355
aS'pink'
p3356
asg33
(lp3357
S'warehouse'
p3358
assg36
(lp3359
S'Illumniate Photography described this wedding as a  big feast of Pinteresting loveliness , and I do believe they hit the nail on the head with that description. Because I could (and probably will) pin every single image sitting in this gorgeous gallery. It s sweet rustic touches mixed with a fabulous urban setting, and the result is pure perfection. See it all here.'
p3360
aS'Keziah and Craig chose to mix it up a bit by having their ceremony in the evening. They had a special  first look  in the forest with some close friends and family before the ceremony, and this was followed by some bridal party and couple pictures around the forest. It was so nice to know that there weren t any guests waiting for us, meaning we could take our time.'
p3361
aS'The ceremony and Reception were both held at the Blue bird garage   a warehouse-like spot where a popular market takes place on Friday evenings which they converted into a perfect wedding venue!'
p3362
aS'Candles were lit and lights were strung and a most beautiful, spirit-filled atmosphere was in the room. What really stood out for me at the reception was the love that Craig and Kez have for their family and friends and people in general. What a beautiful thing.\n'
p3363
aS'Photography: Illuminate Photography | Wedding Gown: Sharon McLean | Cake: Gimmene | Catering: Basics Catering | Make Up: Jill Sangerhaus | Hair: Fringe | Candlestick Hire: Function Hire 4 U | Flowers And Wreaths: The Rose Caf  | Sationary: Marieke Goncalves | Wedding Venue: Blue Bird Garage'
p3364
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3365
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3366
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3367
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3368
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3369
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3370
aS'A ...'
p3371
aS'When ...'
p3372
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3373
asa(dp3374
g2
(dp3375
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/09/19/st-martin-destination-wedding-film/'
p3376
sg20
(dp3377
g22
(lp3378
S'destination'
p3379
asg25
(lp3380
S'summer'
p3381
asg28
(lp3382
S'gray'
p3383
aS'red'
p3384
asg33
(lp3385
S'beach'
p3386
assg36
(lp3387
S'I still dream about the time my family vacationed on the little island of St. Martin. It s nothing short of paradise and an absolutely magical spot to hold a wedding. Case in point? This simple yet completely stunning  I do  right on the crystal clear waters. Our friends at Hoo Films captured the beauty (tough job, right?!) and all that s left is to get cozy and watch for yourself.'
p3388
aS'Photography: StudiOsnap Photography | Cinematography: Hoo Films | Wedding Gown: Demetrios | Shoes: David Tutera | Hair And Make Up: Michele Bell | Coordination: Lucie Davis | Sear Sucker Suit: JoS. A. Bank | Wedding Venue: Dreams Beach Bar'
p3389
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3390
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3391
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3392
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3393
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3394
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3395
aS'A ...'
p3396
aS'When ...'
p3397
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3398
asa(dp3399
g2
(dp3400
S'Candlesticks'
p3401
S'Classic Crockery'
p3402
sS'Jewellery'
p3403
S'Cornelia Webb'
p3404
sS'Feather Head Band '
p3405
S'Curious Fair'
p3406
sS'Photography'
p3407
S'Ann Kathrin Koch'
p3408
sS'Makeup'
p3409
S'Julie Diplacito'
p3410
sS'Large Feather And Bejewelled Head Piece '
p3411
S'Vagabond Couture'
p3412
sS'Hair'
p3413
S'Anne Marie McElroy'
p3414
sS'Cake '
p3415
S'Big Bear Bakery'
p3416
sS'Concept, Styling And Production '
p3417
S'Knot & Pop'
p3418
sS'Stationery'
p3419
S'Lamplighter London'
p3420
sS'Plates'
p3421
S'Love It Want It Buy It'
p3422
sS'Model'
p3423
S'Elaine Fisher At Colours Agency'
p3424
sS'Glassware And Cutlery'
p3425
S'Helene Millot'
p3426
sS'Flowers '
p3427
S'Pyrus'
p3428
sS'Dresses'
p3429
S'Susie Stone'
p3430
sS'Mansion House And Gardens'
p3431
S'Ardkinglas House'
p3432
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/09/19/scottish-manor-bridal-inspiration/'
p3433
sg20
(dp3434
g22
(lp3435
S'romantic'
p3436
asg25
(lp3437
S'summer'
p3438
asg28
(lp3439
S'burgundy'
p3440
aS'lavender'
p3441
aS'pink'
p3442
aS'purple'
p3443
asg33
(lp3444
S'mansion'
p3445
assg36
(lp3446
S'Set amongst the rugged scenery of Scotland is an inspiration shoot that ll leave you speechless. It s romance in the purest form, and with Knot & Pop behind every styling detail, it sort of comes as no surprise. From the linen stationery by Lamplighter London to the rich florals from Pyrus, the gallery from Ann Kathrin Koch is one delicious image after another.'
p3447
aS'Mixing purple tones with hints of green and a shot of rich red across florals, the palette speaks of a hunter s haven and sets the scene for an atmospheric wedding. Pheasant feathers and ornamental birds feature as decorative touches, with the stationery by Lamplighter London also including touches of bird and feather motifs. Upon tabletops, a hand-died calligraphy table runner has  Love  by Scottish poet Edwin Morgan inscribed, with stunning florals by Scotland s finest florists, Pyrus Flowers, placed in copper vases, and a sense of feasting with fruits laid out for guests to graze upon. Beautiful hand-made plates by Love It Want It Buy It, mix with crockery from Helene Millot, with antique silver cutlery holding place names, written on red robin leaves.'
p3448
aS'Red robin leaves are layered to also form the table plan, reminiscent of bird feathers, and adding natural texture to the details. Further tactile flourishes appear across fabric flag table numbers, fabric menus and statement hand-crafted shields, in a collaboration between Knot & Pop and Lamplighter London. To move from day to evening, two incredible wedding dresses from UK designer Susie Stone team perfectly, with their dresses always speaking of individuality and absolute luxury. The Grace gown with its intricate rose detailing and ivory palette, contrasts beautifully with the evening allure of the 1920s inspired gown and all it s embellished glory. Elaborate feather head-pieces by Vagabond Couture and Curious Fair, with jewellery by Maria Nilsdotter and Cornelia Webb add the statement finishing touches, giving an other-worldly feel to bridal style.'
p3449
aS'From Ann Kathrin Koch Being a wedding photographer is the best job I can imagine. Every week I work with people who are experiencing the happiest day of their life with their very closest friends and family.'
p3450
aS'I prefer working in a documentary style and shoot on film at every wedding for a few reasons, none of them nostalgic. I love that I am connected to my subject with no distraction like a screen on the back of my camera. I even love that shooting film is difficult. It slows me down and I can really concentrate on exposing the exact moment that matters. Mostly though, I just love the way it looks   incredibly flattering yet vibrant and full of life. Shooting film let s me create images I love.'
p3451
aS'Scotland has always fascinated me. With an extraordinary beautiful but rugged landscape and known for endless rain and cold winds it s not a conventionally pretty place. Yet everywhere you turn it seems as if things are just a little bit more special. The wind is a little stronger, the water a little more cold and the trees and mountains just a bit higher. If you are looking to be enchanted, this is the place to go. Combining the roughness of Scotland with delicate beauty creates just that   a little bit of magic.'
p3452
asa(dp3453
g2
(dp3454
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/09/18/personality-filled-diy-wedding-in-galicia-spain/'
p3455
sg20
(dp3456
g22
(lp3457
S'rustic'
p3458
asg25
(lp3459
S'summer'
p3460
asg28
(lp3461
S'navy'
p3462
aS'red'
p3463
asg33
(lp3464
S'ranch'
p3465
assg36
(lp3466
S'At its very core, this wedding captured by Jimena Roquero is gorgeous. The florals, the setting, the couple   it s honestly breathtaking from start to finish. But beyond all that, you seem to get to know the couple with each stunning image. With it s somewhat boho, somewhat vintage, somewhat classic feel, this couple packed their personality into every heartfelt detail, and you can fall in love with all of it here.'
p3467
aS'Since one year earlier, Mar collected all kind of jars and bottles, which she painted and turned into the stunning table decoration she displayed at her wedding. And she created a different design for every single number of the table settings! They are both graphic designers and have a great artistic sense, and they used it to create and design everything involved, from the invitations, tote bags as favor gifts, to all the stationary, etc  Mar even designed her own dress which was executed later by the designer Sole Alonso. Mar know she would like to wear a simple dress with an original touch, so she wore some traditional knickers underneath!'
p3468
aS'Mar always dreamed of getting married in a ranch, but when she fell in love with Maurix, a boy from the Spanish region of Galicia, she decided she would change the ranch for a  Pazo  (the traditional Galician house ). However, since they are both big fans of the American culture, they rented an old Cadillac to drive them to the reception to surprise all their guests. Mar also had another surprise for Maurix: she brought to the wedding one of Maurix s favorite bands to play a little live show during the cocktail hour. Of course, Maurix was in tears when he saw that!\n'
p3469
aS"Photography: Jimena Roquero | Invitations: Paper Riot | Reception Venue: Pazo De Santa Cruz | Catering: Pepe Solla | Grooms Attire: Silbon | Bride's Gown: Sole Alonso | Cufflinks: Bandages Love Blood | Live Band: Templeton | Music: Coconut Producciones | Photobooth: 123 Patata | Wedding Design: Paper Riot"
p3470
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3471
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3472
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3473
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3474
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3475
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3476
aS'A ...'
p3477
aS'When ...'
p3478
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3479
asa(dp3480
g2
(dp3481
S'Website'
p3482
S'Nicole Heininger'
p3483
sS'Videography'
p3484
S'Love & You Video'
p3485
sS'Wedding Dress'
p3486
S'Enzoani'
p3487
sS'Catering'
p3488
S'Maui Executive Catering Company'
p3489
sS'Makeup'
p3490
S'Jessica Waite Makeup Artistry'
p3491
sS'Reception Venue'
p3492
S'Haiku Mill'
p3493
sS'Photography'
p3494
S'Bryce Covey Photography'
p3495
sS'Grooms Attire'
p3496
S'Ralph Lauren Black Label'
p3497
sS'Invitations'
p3498
S'Nicole Heininger'
p3499
sS'Bar Service'
p3500
S'Bars Are Us'
p3501
sS"Bride's Shoes"
p3502
S'Giorgio Armani'
p3503
sS'Design'
p3504
S'Nicole Heininger'
p3505
sS"Bride's Clutch"
p3506
S'Whiting & Davis'
p3507
sS"Bride's Earrings"
p3508
S'Ben-Amun'
p3509
sS'Transportation'
p3510
S'Poly Ad'
p3511
sS'Hotel'
p3512
S'Grand Wailea Resort'
p3513
sS'Rentals'
p3514
S'Island Rents'
p3515
sS'Bridesmaids Dresses'
p3516
S'Adrianna Papell'
p3517
sS'Wedding Venue'
p3518
S'Haiku Mill'
p3519
sS'Floral Design'
p3520
S'Bella Bloom Floral Boutique'
p3521
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/09/18/destination-glam-haiku-mill-wedding-by-bryce-covey-photography/'
p3522
sg20
(dp3523
g22
(lp3524
S'destination'
p3525
asg25
(lp3526
S'fall'
p3527
asg28
(lp3528
S'gold'
p3529
aS'gray'
p3530
aS'taupe'
p3531
asg33
(lp3532
S'garden'
p3533
assg36
(lp3534
S'There s no denying this Haiku Mill wedding is something special. And while it s got the kind of glamorous styling to make any wedding lover s jaw drop, it also has a story that speaks to a family s love and strength admits loss. Read on for the bride s beautiful words, and don t miss the stunning film by Love & You Video, along with the complete gallery from Bryce Covey Photography.'
p3535
aS'From The Bride  Taylor and I met when we were young kids growing up in a small town of Washington. We were high school sweethearts who separated soon after leaving home for college and remained strangers for years thereafter. It wasn t until a chance encounter that we reentered one another s lives and embarked on the incredible journey of becoming husband and wife thirteen years later!'
p3536
aS'A few months prior to our engagement my father tragically passed away. Our wedding was scheduled on the one year anniversary of his passing and we wanted the week to be as much a celebration, as a symbolic rising from the brokenness we experienced just one year prior. We live thousands of miles away from most of our family and friends and desired a destination wedding which afforded our guests a vacation and us an extended period of time to celebrate with the people we love most. Taylor s grandfather lives in Hawaii and we both spent a considerable amount of time vacationing there through the years. Selecting Maui was an easy decision.'
p3537
aS'We wanted the event to embody family, friendship and connectedness, culminating in a grand celebration. The week of our wedding would be spent with guests at a beautiful resort, but we wanted our wedding day to be something truly magical. With a background in interior design and architecture, and a deep passion for historic structures, it has been my dream to be married inside a ruin. The moment we stepped onto the Haiku Mill grounds I knew our search was over. It is one of the most special places I have ever experienced. The structure is overgrown with foliage and the owner has seamlessly integrated ancient artifacts she sourced in Europe throughout the grounds. Stepping inside the ruin brought me to tears and our decision was made.We would rent large tour buses and shuttle our guests from a beachside resort into the Maui countryside for our fairytale wedding.'
p3538
aS'The theme of our wedding was Hawaiian Versailles Garden Party, which was heavily influenced by the nature of our space and the bounty of parisian artifacts sprinkled throughout. We wanted sophisticated elegance with a casual attitude. Guests were encouraged to wear neutral attire and the wedding party followed suite. The groom wore a grey suit with tie and the groomsmen, bridesmen (I had two) and ushers all wore variations of a grey suit ensemble with white collar shirts and rolled sleeves. The bridesmaids wore full length nude sequin gowns, which had an incredible vintage deco feel. I chose to wear a form fitting lace mermaid dress and a long cathedral veil.'
p3539
aS'As the owner of an interior design firm, 30 Collins, I took great pleasure in bringing our vision to life. I designed and handcrafted every detail of our day down to the website, invitation suite, maps, programs and cards to inform guests of our special day. I used a handwritten cursive script for all text on heavy white watercolor paper and drew a whimsical map to include in the package. The collateral was a wonderful window into what guests could expect for our big day.'
p3540
aS'Although our wedding was not held on the beach, the ocean has significant meaning to Taylor and myself. Just prior to the ceremony we made the short drive to a remote outcropping and spent our last few moments together alone with the ocean before becoming husband and wife. Our photographer, Bryce Covey and Videographer, Love & You Video, followed us down to capture the very intimate moment. The experience and resulting photos still take my breathe away.'
p3541
aS'Our wedding day was one of the most magical of my life and an experience I will forever cherish. Taylor and I were incredibly blessed to be surrounded by so many family and friends who traveled so far in support of our love and celebration of the next chapter in our lives together. Of the innumerable magical moments which occurred that day, one of the most memorable was in the form of a giant rainbow which greeted us upon being pronounced husband and wife. I knew it was a special gift from my father to signal his joyful blessing and it will remain one of the most treasured memories of that once in a lifetime day.'
p3542
aS'From Love & You Video We feel so lucky to have filmed Nicole & Taylor s wedding. They chose to have a destination wedding in Maui, at Haiku Mill, one of the most unique and sought-after wedding venues in Hawaii. Once a real Sugar mill, now breathtakingly beautiful event venue. It s like stepping back in the time and getting surrounded by elegance and beauty.'
p3543
aS'Video was very important to the couple, specially since brides grandmother was not able to be a part of their special day, we felt a big responsibility to capture every important moment as perfectly as their wedding was so the grandmother can feel like she was a part of it too.'
p3544
aS'Everyone can see how good looking the couple are, supermodel gorgeous! Not only that, just watch the video to see how strong the love is between them and how happy they are to be marrying each other.\n'
p3545
asa(dp3546
g2
(dp3547
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/09/17/romantic-provence-inspiration-shoot/'
p3548
sg20
(dp3549
g22
(lp3550
S'elegance'
p3551
asg25
(lp3552
S'summer'
p3553
asg28
(lp3554
S'gray'
p3555
aS'pink'
p3556
asg33
(lp3557
S'park'
p3558
assg36
(lp3559
S'My hubby and I have a long list of places we want to travel to, and Provence has always been close to the tippy top. Well, after devouring this ridiculously perfect shoot from Studio A+Q, Provence is officially moving to the number one spot. It s a shoot overflowing with the prettiness of Provence and inspiration that will make your head spin - and you can get lost in all the lovely here. '
p3560
aS'They will whisper je t aime mon ch ri as they sit gazing out over the sun-drenched landscape that has inspired painters and pioneers for, not years  but centuries. They will relish the sweet, honey-like smell of surrounding almond flowers, as its cradles them into a state of pure bliss. They will sip a divine glass of ros  chilled to perfection and made with the grapes of the vines that are just a few steps away. They will stop their clocks and drift into timelessness, that place where the soul must go to restore itself.'
p3561
aS'Provence is a haven of natural beauty, and lavender and olive trees are not its only asset. The almond trees of Provence are among the first to blossom in March, and their beautiful delicate white flowers blossom for a period of two to three weeks, just before the cherry trees begin to showcase their soft pink flowers.'
p3562
aS'Kelina & Romain fell in love all over again on this dreamy afternoon among the almond blossoms of Provence. A group of immensely talented local vendors came together to imagine how this day would look, and with the help of almond producer Monsieur Jaubert ( Jo-bear ) and L Occitane, what was at first simply an incredibly beautiful vision of love and romance in Provence, turned into reality.\n'
p3563
aS"Photography: Studio A+Q | Floral Design: Atelier De Vik | Wedding Dress: Aurelia Hoang | Stationery: Cr me De Papier | Cart And Table/chairs: Options | Coordination, Design, Styling: Un Grand OUI | Floating Choux: Monsieur Chou | Guest Favors/ Organizational Support: L'Occitane | Hair & Make-up: Emilie Green | Jewelry/Headpieces: Paulette   Bicyclette | Macarons: Les Macarons De Caroline | Venue: Provence"
p3564
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3565
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3566
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3567
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3568
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3569
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3570
aS'A ...'
p3571
aS'When ...'
p3572
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3573
asa(dp3574
g2
(dp3575
S'Event Planner'
p3576
S'Asmara Weddings And Events'
p3577
sS"Bridesmaids' Shoes"
p3578
S'Nine West'
p3579
sS"Groom's Suit"
p3580
S'Tom Ford'
p3581
sS'Photography'
p3582
S'Thomas Stewart'
p3583
sS'Rings'
p3584
S'Equinox Jewelers; Portland, OR'
p3585
sS'Hair Stylist'
p3586
S'Yuni At La Fausta Salon'
p3587
sS'Ceremony And Reception Venue'
p3588
S'Amanusa Resort'
p3589
sS'Band'
p3590
S'Martini Club Sydney'
p3591
sS"Bride's Shoes"
p3592
S'Vince Camuto'
p3593
sS'Earrings'
p3594
S'Nadri Jewelry'
p3595
sS'Cake'
p3596
S'BuzzBakeHouse'
p3597
sS"Groom's Shoes"
p3598
S'Saint Laurent'
p3599
sS"Bride's Dress"
p3600
S'Jenny Packham'
p3601
sS'Florist / Stylist'
p3602
S'Gloriosa Flower House'
p3603
sS'Stop-Motion'
p3604
S'Anna Blackman'
p3605
sS"Bridesmaids' Dresses"
p3606
S'Ted Baker'
p3607
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/09/17/bali-garden-party-inspired-wedding/'
p3608
sg20
(dp3609
g22
(lp3610
S'elegant'
p3611
asg25
(lp3612
S'summer'
p3613
asg28
(lp3614
S'blush'
p3615
aS'navy'
p3616
aS'pink'
p3617
aS'taupe'
p3618
asg33
(lp3619
S'resort'
p3620
assg36
(lp3621
S'When it came time to pick a wedding venue Georgie and Tim wanted something special. A place not only beautiful - trust me, the Amanusa Resort fits that bill   but also somewhere layered with meaning. In a nod to the Bride s Indonesian roots and desire for a garden party vibe, they settled on a Bali-set wedding designed by Asmara Weddings and captured by Thomas Stewart. See the whole day here. '
p3622
aS'We wanted to get married in a place that would not just mean something to us on the day but in the future as well. Georgie s mum is not only Indonesian, but her mum and dad have just moved to Bali. We wanted a garden party style venue and when we saw Amanusa, it was easy decision. Plus, it s Bali.'
p3623
aS'Planning the wedding was interesting to say the least! We planned the whole thing from the States, with the exception of a 4 day trip to Bali. During this time, we also changed jobs and moved to the other side of the States 6 months before the wedding. When you are doing so much via email and Internet searches you really have to trust the people you are working with. '
p3624
aS'When they tell you the day goes fast, they are not lying. I think we were both quite taken aback on the day. To have so many loved ones there for you and to see this event you have been planning everyday, actually happening, even better than you imagined, it was almost too much. Someone described a wedding day to us as being like a soldier returning home from war. You can do no wrong. It s your day to be a hero, so stop for a moment and take the whole thing in.'
p3625
aS'From Thomas Stewart Georgie and Tim s wedding was just epic. I ve never seen a venue as incredible as Amanusa; at night, the reception looked like a scene straight out of a fairy tale. Despite the heat and crazy humidity, and even despite some random lighting problems during speeches, the day was a huge success. I loved Georgie s incredible Jenny Packham gown which was super elegant; I also loved the venue styling. The Balinese love their styling!\n'
p3626
asa(dp3627
g2
(dp3628
S'Live Music'
p3629
S'The Gypsy Kings'
p3630
sS'Wedding Planner'
p3631
S"Autour D'Une Histoire"
p3632
sS'Groom Bow Tie'
p3633
S'Tom Ford'
p3634
sS'Catering & Wedding Cake'
p3635
S'Lenotre'
p3636
sS'Photography'
p3637
S'Aneta Mak'
p3638
sS'Groom Tuxedo & Shirt'
p3639
S'Lanvin'
p3640
sS'Invitations'
p3641
S'Crane & Co.'
p3642
sS'Groom Shoes'
p3643
S'Salvatore Ferragamo'
p3644
sS'Dress Boutique'
p3645
S'Bridal Reflections'
p3646
sS'Music'
p3647
S'Alex Shahabi, Style Events'
p3648
sS'Groom Cufflinks'
p3649
S'Hermes'
p3650
sS'Bride Headpiece'
p3651
S'Jenny Packham'
p3652
sS'Bride Dress Designer'
p3653
S'Ines Di Santo'
p3654
sS'Wedding Venue'
p3655
S"Domaine Des Oliviers De L'Esterel"
p3656
sS'Flowers'
p3657
S'Sabine Flowers'
p3658
sS'Bride Jewellery'
p3659
S'Gumuchian'
p3660
sS'Bride Shoes'
p3661
S'Valentino'
p3662
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/09/16/elegant-provence-wedding-full-of-romance/'
p3663
sg20
(dp3664
g22
(lp3665
S'rustic'
p3666
asg25
(lp3667
S'summer'
p3668
asg28
(lp3669
S'champagne'
p3670
aS'ivory'
p3671
aS'light-pink'
p3672
aS'pink'
p3673
asg33
(lp3674
S'manor'
p3675
assg36
(lp3676
S'The true essence of Provence can be found in this collection of images captured by Aneta Mak. Beautiful scenery is a given but added to that is an open air celebration with an ease and elegance that can only be found in France. Planned by Autour D Une Histoire, with flowers draped at every turn by Sabine Flowers, see this dream wedding weekend in its entirety right here.'
p3677
aS'From The Bride When planning our wedding, it was important that the event was a reflection of us. We wanted it to be elegant and intimate, with an element of romance and rustic charm. With guests travelling from all corners of the earth, it was important for us to create a weekend that would make everyone feel at home.'
p3678
aS'The vision for the wedding came together when we fell in love with the venue, Le Manoir at Domain des Oliviers de l Esterel. Having dated for over 8 years, we spent many summers visiting the groom s grandparents in the South of France, where we immediately fell in love with the Proven al countryside. Travel and food are a big part of our lives, and we were sold on the venue when we saw the olive groves and lavender rows which evoked memories of countless road trips we and had shared together in the local hills.'
p3679
aS'We tried to tie these memories together through the d cor and food at the wedding. The chuppah and floral arrangements were meant to feel as though they had always been there, with flowers grown wild in the nearby fields. Len tre worked with us to translate our memories into a menu that felt reflective of our relationship. They created an olive bar featuring flavors of Provence, prepared a version of the groom s grandmother Charolotte s famous apricot meringue pie for dessert, sourced locally line-caught sea-bass for the entr e, and a presented a selection of our favorite cheese from Herve Mons (a local affineur we discovered while dining at Maison Troisgros). Even our wedding cake was based off of Pierre Herm  s Ispahan macaron, reflecting a small piece of the bride s Persian heritage.'
p3680
aS'More than anything, what made the evening so special was having all of our friends and family there to celebrate with us. Nearly every guest, from the very young to the very old, was out on the dance floor, partying late into the early morning hours. It was incredibly memorable to see all of our friends and family gathered together in a celebration of our love.'
p3681
asa(dp3682
g2
(dp3683
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/09/16/romantic-al-fresco-hawaii-wedding/'
p3684
sg20
(dp3685
g22
(lp3686
S'elegant'
p3687
asg25
(lp3688
S'summer'
p3689
asg28
(lp3690
S'blush'
p3691
aS'gray'
p3692
asg33
(lp3693
S'private-residence'
p3694
assg36
(lp3695
S'The beautiful Bride of this stunning Hawaii soiree said it s hard to put into words the love and joy they felt on their wedding day, but I swear you can almost feel that joy in all of the gorgeous images from James Moes. Their breathtaking day was nothing short of magical, and you can soak up all the sweetness here.'
p3696
aS'We kept the ceremony short but meaningful to allow more time for cocktail hour and the reception. Our dear friend and Doug s roommate throughout college wrote a beautiful ceremony and officiated the wedding. Doug and I selected readings on love and marriage for each of his four sisters to read. We wanted to highlight the natural beauty of our venue by keeping the d cor simple and organic. We also tried to minimize the stress of planning a wedding by hiring our wonderful planner Lauren to guide up through the process and edit down our details to a few select projects. Instead of rented drinking glasses, we hand etched mason jars with the help of my mom and auntie, which also doubled as escort cards and keepsake favors for our guests to take home. Doug made all the wooden signs from old pallets. He also sourced a wooden bench from a local furniture maker to use for guests to sign-in and then engraved our initials into the bench.'
p3697
aS'My bridesmaids and I arranged the flower centerpieces, bouquets, and boutonnieres. A group of our family and friends gathered the night before and morning of the wedding to assist with the set-up and break down. The fact that so many of our loved ones played such a huge role in our wedding made the day all the more special for us and we are forever grateful for their support.'
p3698
aS'Aside from becoming husband and wife, the best part of the day was being able to celebrate love and friendship with all our closest family and friends in one setting. We could not have asked for a more perfect day!\n'
p3699
aS"Photography: James Moes | Flowers: L-4-Love | Catering: Chef Elmer Guzman's Island Cuisine | Hair & Make-up: Sarah La Glam | Rentals: Pacific Party Rentals | Transportation: Gomes School Bus | Venue: Sunset Ranch | Wedding Planning & Coordination: L-4-Love"
p3700
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3701
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3702
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3703
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3704
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3705
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3706
aS'A ...'
p3707
aS'When ...'
p3708
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3709
asa(dp3710
g2
(dp3711
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/09/15/elegant-punta-cana-wedding-at-barcelo-bavaro-palace-deluxe-hotel/'
p3712
sg20
(dp3713
g22
(lp3714
S'destination'
p3715
aS'elegant'
p3716
asg25
(lp3717
S'summer'
p3718
asg28
(lp3719
S'light-pink'
p3720
aS'pink'
p3721
asg33
(lp3722
S'hotel'
p3723
assg36
(lp3724
S'This couple took their destination wedding, sprinkled in a whole lot of romance and covered it in a beautiful pink hue   leaving us with a wedding so gorgeous we could spend our entire day getting lost in Jen + Ashley s images. Planned and hosted by the gorgeous Barcelo Bavaro Palace Deluxe Hotel, Punta Cana, we pretty much love every image sitting in this gallery.'
p3725
aS'From Jen + Ashley We are SO excited to send over this elegant and chic, garden destination wedding! Kim + Clark both live in Chicago, but wanted their wedding to be a celebration not only for them, but for their closest friends and family in a tropical paradise to give all of their guests a chance to step back from the hustle and bustle of city life. With fun activities planned all week, including a catamaran voyage with fresh coconut drinks and dinner served on the sea, they truly wanted their guests to be able to experience all that the gorgeous Punta Cana has to offer. Not wanting their destination wedding to be too  beachy , they opted for a gorgeous, intimate garden setting on the grounds of the Barcelo Bavaro Palace Deluxe hotel, with swaying palm trees and wild peacocks roaming during their heartfelt and sweet ceremony. With their open-air reception space draped in perfect white linens, a whimsical ombre cake, and just the right amount of pink spread around the room, the setting tied in perfectly to the lush gardens that surrounded the venue.'
p3726
aS"Photography: Jen + Ashley | Floral Design: Barcelo Bavaro Palace Deluxe Hotel, Punta Cana | Wedding Dress: Maya Couture | Wedding Dress: Casablanca | Cake: Barcelo Bavaro Palace Deluxe Hotel, Punta Cana | Reception Venue: Barcelo Bavaro Palace Deluxe Hotel, Punta Cana | Bridesmaids' Dresses: Macy's | Cinema: Jeremy Mitchell Cinema | Hair + Makeup: Barcelo Bavaro Palace Dexlue Hotel, Punta Cana"
p3727
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3728
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3729
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3730
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3731
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3732
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3733
aS'A ...'
p3734
aS'When ...'
p3735
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3736
asa(dp3737
g2
(dp3738
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/09/12/elegant-cabo-wedding-at-one-only-palmilla/'
p3739
sg20
(dp3740
g22
(lp3741
S'destination'
p3742
aS'elegant'
p3743
asg25
(lp3744
S'winter'
p3745
asg28
(lp3746
S'green'
p3747
aS'red'
p3748
asg33
(lp3749
S'beach-club'
p3750
assg36
(lp3751
S'Destination weddings like this at the One & Only Palmilla are my dream come true. With the perfect amount of elegance, gorgeous florals from Elena Damy, and that Mexican flair we all love, every image from Sara Richardson feels like a virtual vacation. And you can get lost in all the lovely here.'
p3752
aS'Photography: Sara Richardson | Wedding Coordinator: Arianna O campo For One & Only Palmilla | Floral Design: Elena Damy | Wedding Gown: Rivini - Delicata | Invitations: P.S. The Letter | Bridesmaids Dresses: Two Birds Bridesmaid | Officiant: Diego Vidal | Bride s Boots: M.L. Leddy s Custom Boots | Ceremony & Reception Venue: One & Only Palmilla | Dj : Adan Mijares | Groomsmen Attire: Men s Wearhouse | Groom s Attire: Men s Wearhouse | Guitarist: Francisco Alatorre | Mariachis: Mariachi Diaz | Programs & Menus: Byrd & Bleeker'
p3753
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3754
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3755
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3756
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3757
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3758
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3759
aS'A ...'
p3760
aS'When ...'
p3761
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3762
asa(dp3763
g2
(dp3764
S'Videography'
p3765
S'Bali Metro Digiart'
p3766
sS'Lighting And Sound'
p3767
S'DJ BLeeV'
p3768
sS'Photography'
p3769
S'Jemma Keech'
p3770
sS'Catering'
p3771
S'Fabulous Foods'
p3772
sS'Wedding Gown'
p3773
S'Lazaro'
p3774
sS'Florist'
p3775
S'Gloriosa'
p3776
sS'Wedding Coordinator'
p3777
S'CherAnge'
p3778
sS"Luxury Villa's"
p3779
S'Villa Bayuh Sabbha'
p3780
sS"Bridesmaids' Dresses"
p3781
S'JCrew & Monique Lhuillier'
p3782
ssg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/2014/09/11/romantic-cliff-top-wedding-by-the-sea-in-bali/'
p3783
sg20
(dp3784
g22
(lp3785
S'elegant'
p3786
asg25
(lp3787
S'summer'
p3788
asg28
(lp3789
S'blush'
p3790
aS'gray'
p3791
asg33
(lp3792
S'villa'
p3793
assg36
(lp3794
S'Cliff-top in Bali is a dream destination for most and when you see how that cliff was transformed into a romantic glittering evening under the stars, you might just jump ship and come on over to the destination wedding side. It s travel meets Lazaro gown perfection crafted by CherAnge + Gloriosa and Jemma Keech who takes the most stunning photographs. Have a look right here for the beautiful proof.'
p3795
aS'From The Bride When we got first got engaged, we knew that we wanted to be surrounded by our closest friends and family on the day of our wedding. After careful deliberation, a destination wedding seemed to best fit that bill. When we asked around, everyone said,  Pick somewhere fun!  As native Californians, we both have a deep love for the ocean. Getting married in Bali gave us the chance to start off our marriage with beautiful cliff top views of the ocean surrounded by our amazing families and friends.'
p3796
aS'We are blessed to have friends and family who share our love of travel; our friends traveled from Boston, New York, Los Angeles, San Francisco, Australia, and Taiwan to share the day with us. We wanted to everyone to feel like they were on a family vacation, so we started the events with a beachside welcome dinner the night before the wedding and hosted a BBQ pool party the day after.'
p3797
aS'We wanted our guests to feel like they were celebrating in an intimate backyard party and Villa Bayuh Sabbha turned out to be the perfect venue. The decor and outdoor living spaces of the 5-room estate felt homey and uniquely Balinese. The gorgeous grassy cliff overlooking the ocean gave us the perfect only-in-our-dreams location to hold the ceremony.'
p3798
aS'Even though the international travel made it a bit tricky to add personal touches to the wedding, we managed to bring two suitcases of DIY items, including all the wedding signage and framed family photos. Instead of a formal sit-down dinner, we wanted to pay homage to our Taiwanese roots and had live-cooking stations (one of which featured a full suckling pig!) reminiscent of Asian night markets. I have a personal love of cronuts, so instead of a traditional tiered wedding cake, the guests noshed on cronuts and gelato.'
p3799
aS'With everything lit in fairy lights and golden votives, the night simply glowed. We had our first dance lit by sparklers held by our guests encircling the dance floor. The love surrounding us was truly tangible and we will never forget that amazing day.\n'
p3800
asa(dp3801
g2
(dp3802
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/09/11/classic-al-fresco-wedding-in-crete-greece/'
p3803
sg20
(dp3804
g22
(lp3805
S'elegant'
p3806
asg25
(lp3807
S'spring'
p3808
asg28
(lp3809
S'blue'
p3810
aS'lavender'
p3811
aS'light-pink'
p3812
asg33
(lp3813
S'hotel'
p3814
assg36
(lp3815
S'In addition to the wildly beautiful surroundings of Crete, this wedding is boasting a full on al fresco extravaganza full of peonies, a fresh flower confetti bar and the kind of day that people dream about being a guest at. Crafted by White Ribbon, have a look at all the pretty imagery captured by George Pahountis and you too will be adding Crete to your must see list. Stop by the full gallery for more.'
p3816
aS'From White Ribbon Boutique The couple met during their undergraduate degree in medicine. The groom, Gregory, was so mesmerized by Melanie that he was mistakenly pinching himself with needles during they course practice! The couple comes from two different cultures. The bride is Chinese & English and the groom Greek & English and they therefore wanted their wedding to reflect both these cultures.'
p3817
aS'They chose a beautiful village in the town of Rethymno, Crete for their wedding which was the grooms grandfather s home town. The also incorporated many Chinese elements such as a traditional tea bar and the beautiful silk robes the bride and her bridesmaids wore during their preparation.'
p3818
aS'At the same time the d cor was perfectly in line with the surroundings of this tranquil Cretan village and used local grown flowers and herbs, lavender, garden roses and tulips while the food was based on the traditional Cretan cuisine.'
p3819
aS'80 of the bride and grooms closest friends and family who travelled from New Zeeland, Hong Kong, India and the UK came together to celebrate the couple. The ceremony was held in the venue s stone built square, followed by a champagne reception and dinner. Dinner was followed by a mix of traditional line dancing and modern tunes until down the next day. It was a beautiful day filled with love and joy for the newlyweds and one that they will remember for many years to come.\n'
p3820
aS"Photography: George Pahountis | Event Planning: White Ribbon Boutique Events Coordination | Floral Design: White Ribbon Boutique Events Coordination | Wedding Dress: Naomi Neoh | Invitations: Cartoules Press | Ceremony Venue: Kapsaliana Village Hotel | Reception Venue: Kapsaliana Village Hotel | Bridesmaids' Dresses: Amsale | Catering: Kapsaliana Village Hotel | Grooms Attire: Reiss"
p3821
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3822
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3823
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3824
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3825
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3826
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3827
aS'A ...'
p3828
aS'When ...'
p3829
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3830
asa(dp3831
g2
(dp3832
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/09/09/destination-mexico-wedding-at-hyatt-ziva-puerto-vallarta/'
p3833
sg20
(dp3834
g22
(lp3835
S'destination'
p3836
asg25
(lp3837
S'spring'
p3838
asg28
(lp3839
S'light-pink'
p3840
aS'pink'
p3841
asg33
(lp3842
S'beach'
p3843
assg36
(lp3844
S'Tucked in this gallery is image after image of pure destination perfection. Between the gorgeous florals, the stunning styling by the Bride herself (who happens to be the talent behind Savvy Events, LLC), and lovely images by Nicole Lennox - this gallery is a virtual vacation in itself. Get lost in all the lovely here.'
p3845
aS'From Nicole Lennox DeNeitra and Lawrence met in high school, but their love story didn t begin until years later when they reconnected on Facebook. After dating for a few years, Lawrence proposed by serenading his future bride-to-be on the beach with a song he had written.'
p3846
aS'Their wedding weekend took place at the stunning Hyatt Ziva Puerto Vallarta. DeNeitra, an experienced event planner made sure that the decor and details throughout the wedding day and the entire weekend were simply beautiful and perfectly executed.'
p3847
aS'From the Bride Prior to Lawrence proposing we knew we wanted a destination wedding in Puerto Vallarta. We took our first vacation to Puerto Vallarta in 2011 and totally fell in love with the city, the people and the culture. The day Lawrence proposed I emailed Dreams Puerto Vallarta, now Hyatt Ziva Puerto Vallarta to inquire on availability for our selected wedding date. Just like that a whirlwind 8 months of planning ensued.'
p3848
aS"Photography: Nicole Lennox | Videography: Cinevent Productions | Event Design: Savvy Events, LLC | Wedding Dress: Galina Signature For David's Bridal | Invitations: The Stylish Scribe | Stationary: Jax Designs | Ceremony Venue: Hyatt Ziva Puerto Vallarta (Formerly Dreams Puerto Vallarta Resort & Spa) | Bridesmaids' Dresses: Allure Bridesmaids - Mon Amie Bridal Salon | Cake Topper: Better Off Wed | Coordination: Weddings Vallarta By Barbara | Coordination: Weddings Vallarta | Hair/Make-Up: Hyatt Ziva Puerto Vallarta Spa"
p3849
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3850
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3851
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3852
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3853
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3854
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3855
aS'A ...'
p3856
aS'When ...'
p3857
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3858
asa(dp3859
g2
(dp3860
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/09/08/destination-mexico-wedding-at-generations-riviera-maya/'
p3861
sg20
(dp3862
g22
(lp3863
S'destination'
p3864
asg25
(lp3865
S'spring'
p3866
asg28
(lp3867
S'pink'
p3868
asg33
(lp3869
S'beach'
p3870
assg36
(lp3871
S'I treat gorgeous destination weddings like this one from Fondly Forever Photography like a little virtual vacation. I allow myself a little extra time to really get lost in all the lovely images and devour every pretty detail. Before I know it, I feel like I am there, with my toes in the sand listening to these two cuties say I do, and you can join me in the day dream right here.'
p3872
aS'From Fondly Forever Photography Jeannie + Neal live in LA but wanted a destination wedding to celebration their big day. After touring around the east coast of Mexico, they decided on a brand new hotel in Riviera Maya called Generations. Jeannie is a makeup artist and not only did her makeup, but all of her bridesmaids makeup as well! She is one of the sweetest people I know and her smile radiated the entire day! The wedding ceremony took place in a small chapel right off the beach and the reception was in a pier over the water. I realize this wedding does not have as many details as some of the weddings you feature but I thought it might be a good fit for your destination blog.'
p3873
aS'From the Bride What was your inspiration for the day/How did you make the day about the two of you?'
p3874
aS'   We wanted to have a simple, light-hearted, stress-free day surrounded by family and friends. At our ceremony, we wanted all our guests to be present with us and not worry about taking photos, so we decided to have an unplugged wedding. It was one of the best decisions we made. Everyone was in the moment with us and we felt so much love in the room. We wanted our vows to be meaningful, but I also knew that if we surprised each other with our own vows at the altar, I would cry and not be able to say my part. So in order to ease my nervousness, Neal and I decided to write our vows together and take turns saying each line to each other. I love that we started our marriage as a team.'
p3875
aS'What is your most memorable moment from the day?\n   Looking out and seeing our closest friends and family all under one roof. Over the years, we ve hung out with them individually and in small groups, but never all together in one place. That moment comes once in a lifetime and it made our hearts happy knowing that they all traveled there to celebrate with us.'
p3876
aS'- What DIY projects did you do for your wedding?\n I wanted to stay away from DIY (aka stress) projects as much as possible, so I limited the DIY project to 1. We made our own fabric bouquets/boutonnieres from scratch. It was a long process filled with good times, laughter, and love   all my bridesmaids and my Man of Honor worked so hard on them, I m so grateful.\n'
p3877
aS"Photography: Fondly Forever Photography | Cinematography: Jeffery Mathis | Event Planning: Lomas Travel  | Wedding Dress: Custom Design | Hair: The Bridesmaids | Groom's Suit: Express | Bridesmiad Dresses : Ark & Co | Floral Designer : Melissa Pladsri | Invitations/Paper Goods: Melissa Yan | Makeup: The Bride Jeannie | Music : Mega DJ | Shoes : Valentino | Venue And Caterting: Generations Riviera Maya"
p3878
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3879
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3880
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3881
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3882
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3883
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3884
aS'A ...'
p3885
aS'When ...'
p3886
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3887
asa(dp3888
g2
(dp3889
sg18
S'http://www.stylemepretty.com/destination-weddings/2014/09/05/elegant-english-country-wedding-at-sibton-park/'
p3890
sg20
(dp3891
g22
(lp3892
S'elegant'
p3893
asg25
(lp3894
S'summer'
p3895
asg28
(lp3896
S'blue'
p3897
aS'blush'
p3898
aS'silver-2'
p3899
asg33
(lp3900
S'estate'
p3901
aS'park'
p3902
assg36
(lp3903
S'I love this wedding more than I ll ever be able to put into words. I adore it s timeless style, the Bride s stunning gown from Temperley & Temperley is beyond, and I basically want to cover my entire house in that ridiculously steal-worthy wallpaper in the dining room   there honestly isn t a single thing sitting pretty in this gallery that didn t make my jaw drop, and you can see all the gorgeous captured by Caught The Light right here.'
p3904
aS'We had been together 7 and a half years when Joe proposed; I had just got back from a week in Paris for work and Joe surprised me with a trip away to a lovely little hotel called Tuddenham Mill. We set off for a weekend of relaxing pub suppers and long walks and it was on one of those walks at Dunwich Beach that I turned around and Joe was on bended knee.'
p3905
aS'We were engaged for 15 months before getting married and I felt that would give plenty of time to organise everything, however, after an initial blitz of booking the venues and our photographer, we both got rather complacent over winter and left ourselves a lot to do in the final 5 months.'
p3906
aS'We fell in love with Sibton Park and the beautiful wallpaper in the dining room although as a private house they were not licensed for weddings so we set about looking for somewhere nearby we could hold the ceremony. Fortunately a short drive away was Glemham Hall, a beautiful Elizabethan estate used in the past by Tim Walker in photo shoots for Vogue which made it doubly exciting for me if not for Joe! Donna at Glemham was really wonderful and ensured the room looked beautiful for us with a roaring fire and candles   she even helped guide my highly impractical chapel length veil around the corner as I made my way down the aisle which was truly above and beyond!'
p3907
aS'We wanted to have as intimate day as possible and hiring Sibton for the whole weekend meant both our friends and families could stay with us throughout. Having everyone mingling and pitching in the day before definitely made the day itself feel much more relaxed. The main setback we encountered was that had we grossly over-estimated how many of our nearest and dearest we could squeeze into the dining room and after numerous scale drawings decided the best option was to throw a separate party for the children downstairs in the converted cellar. Luckily for us (and the children) there was a fantastic banquet length table in position next to a games room and cinema so they had a great time and didn t miss us one bit. The house also came with its own catering kitchen and as we weren t tied to a supplier list it enabled us to have my bridesmaid s amazing chef mother Penny Campbell provide the delicious food.'
p3908
aS'I was quite determined from the outset that we do as much as possible ourselves in order to stretch our budget as far as possible. Looking back we probably took on too much but it all came together in the end mainly due to our friends and family diving in to save us. The invites, menus, favour labels and signage were a joint effort by myself and my mother and it was great fun designing and painting everything before having it printed locally. Joseph went to a local bee keeper for our wedding favours who kindly filled dozens of little pots with our favourite honey. We chose hand printed papers and wrapped the lids in these fastening with household string and adding a little thank you label.'
p3909
aS'For the evening we left an instant camera in the Library with lots of spare films and fancy dress paraphernalia asking guests to take a few photos   some for them to take away and some to leave for us. This turned out to be a surprise hit and we got some fantastically silly photos at the end of it!'
p3910
aS'I had always wanted peonies and we are lucky enough to live near a peony farm so I thought the flowers would be a simple task however with a wedding on 1st June at the very beginning of the season and the great British weather being as cold and miserable as possible throughout spring the season was late to start so we had to source a last minute plan B. We were recommended the family run flower stall at a local market and they couldn t have been more helpful. Luckily not only were they able to source peonies but also the bad weather had extended the season for ranunculus, which I thought we were going to miss, and so we managed to have both. The table displays were relatively simple as we opted for potted orchids to give good height to the tables whilst not detracting from the elaborate Chinese wallpaper in the dining room. My chief bridesmaid took on the responsibility of bouquets in between her hairdressing duties for all of us on the morning of the wedding so was a bit of a hero and put them together beautifully.'
p3911
aS'The bridesmaids dresses were from Mango and then customised by my mother with some aspirin dot vintage tulle we found at a vintage fair. Of course I had to design the shoes for myself and my  bridesmates  as they became known and as I wanted them to be comfortable for the whole day and night I went for a slightly lower 85mm heel for their pairs (which is perfect dancing height).'
p3912
aS'I originally wanted a very pale blue laser-cut suede pair for myself but had difficulty finding the perfect shade so in the end went for a safer off-white suede which matched the beading on my dress. I then switched into a much less-safe golden pair for the evening which my factory had painstakingly crafted using some antique sequin tulle which was a remnant from my dressing up box as a child. I was very grateful to my factory who not only travelled all the way over from Italy to share the day with us but also gave all our shoes as a wedding gift (on the proviso I promised never to make them use fragile antique fabrics again!).'
p3913
aS'My maid of honour and bridesmaids were Bex, Maria and Phoebe, my closest and oldest friends. They were all brilliant and worked really hard to ensure Joe and I had an amazing day. Joseph s oldest friend Matthew was his best man who looked terribly smart in his army uniform and surprised us by organising a traditional army  Loyal Toast  of port for the start of dinner. We asked our dear friend Daisy to deliver a reading at the ceremony which she did wonderfully.'
p3914
aS'There were many lovely moments, after running twenty minutes late and being horrendously nervous actually standing holding hands with Joe in front of our friends and family to exchange our vows was a strangely calming experience.'
p3915
aS'I knew after I had bought my main dress that I would like to also have something glittering for the evening as I have magpie tendencies. I fell completely in love with a beautiful golden Temperley gown and the fact it had a white tulle hem kept it bridal in my mind at least! I struggled to find jewellery to accompany it and searched everywhere for some emerald green drop earrings but in the end found a pair of golden sunburst earrings with black pearls and little orange sapphires which mirrored the sequin trails towards the hem. I had managed to keep it completely quiet that I was getting changed into an evening gown and Joe s face when he realised was super as I m normally useless at keeping secrets.'
p3916
aS'Rather than presenting gifts during dinner Joe and I took the opportunity to run away later in the evening and leave little thank you notes and gifts on our respective mothers  bedside tables. This gave us time to ourselves to briefly reflect on the day together before rejoining the party.'
p3917
aS'We had a mixed bag of weather with a particularly cold and overcast day which made us all the more grateful for the glorious sunshine that arrived in the evening. I ve never seen anyone move as fast as Chloe when she ran to grab us both and we made our way out into the beautiful parklands surrounding the house. Traipsing through the fields in the sunshine together was definitely a lasting memory of the day and it was lovely to be able to look back towards the house and hear everyone talking and laughing in the distance.'
p3918
aS'The simplest advice I could give is to make a list in priority order of the things you care about the most such as venue/photographer and work your way down. This helps in both budgeting terms and organise what order you should tackle the very long list in. Obviously it makes sense to invest most, be it time or money, in the things that you care about most. On the day itself chances are you ll feel so happy to be married that minor mishaps, imperfections or problems won t worry you. I managed to lose an earring straight after the ceremony and put my heel through my evening gown within about five minutes of putting it on but it just didn t matter so you have to laugh.'
p3919
aS'Definitely allocate days where the W word is off limits as planning everything can easily become all-consuming.'
p3920
aS'Choosing the right photographer is so important as it made a world of difference to us that we got on so well with Chloe. Her warmth and wit enabled us to completely relax which in turn enabled Chloe to capture the beautiful natural photographs we hoped she would.'
p3921
aS'My father and Joseph s speeches were very special as I know how they had agonised over them and their kind words managed to have not only myself but the bridesmaids in tears which surely must be considered a success! Having the speeches at the beginning of the dinner definitely worked well. We had been to Joseph s step-brother s wedding the year before where they had done this and thought it was a fantastic idea. It meant my father, Joe and Matt could breathe a sigh of relief and enjoy their food without the pressure hanging over them so it is definitely a break in tradition worth giving consideration to.\n'
p3922
aS"Photography: Caught The Light | Wedding Gown: Temperley & Temperley | Stationery: BHLDN | Ceremony Venue: Glemhall Hall, Suffolk, England | Reception Venue: Sibton Park, Suffolk, England | Bride's Shoes: Sophie Gittins | Engagement Ring: Berganza, Hatton Gardens In London | Bridesmaids Dresses: Mango | Catering: Penny Campbell | Hair Stylist: Rebecca MacLean | Groom's Shoes: Loakes | Groom's Suit: Jaeger | Evening Jewellery: Lana | Groom's Shirt, Tie & Pocket Square: Trotter & Deane | Headpiece : Jennifer Behr | Jewellery: Vintage Deco Earrings & Bracelet | Le Baron Wedding Car : Bentley 1958 S1 Saloon In Pearl Grey | Make Up Artist: Giselle Ali | Wedding Musicians: The Modern Way | Wedding Ring: Addy Vintage On Etsy"
p3923
aS"If you've ever wondered what it's like to marry with an Irish..."
p3924
aS"I'm kind of wishing this rosy pink..."
p3925
aS'If being barefoot on sand with the waves behind you sounds ideal, look no further than...'
p3926
aS'Excuse me while I pack up my belongings and catch the next flight to Florence. This...'
p3927
aS'I spent my entire childhood at a horse stable, so this wedding captured by ...'
p3928
aS'Take two native Irish cuties turned Aussies and pair them with the talented planning team...'
p3929
aS'A ...'
p3930
aS'When ...'
p3931
aS"Winter is upon us New Englanders so I'm officially in hibernation mode. For the next..."
p3932
asa.